1*
LIONEL LINCOLN;
or,
THE LEAGUER OF BOSTON., VOL. II.
CHAPTER I.
She speaks, yet she says nothing; what of that?
Her eye discoursesI will answer it.
Romeo
.
Although
the battle of Bunker-hill was fought
while the grass yet lay on the meadows, the heats
of summer had been followed by the nipping frosts
of November; the leaf had fallen in its hour, and
the tempests and biting colds of February had
succeeded, before Major Lincoln left that couch
where he had been laid, when carried, in
total
helplessness, from the fatal heights of the
peninsula. Throughout the whole of that long
period, the hidden bullet had defied the utmost
skill of the British surgeons; nor could all their
science and experience embolden them to risk
cutting certain arteries and tendons in the body
of the heir of Lincoln, which were thought
to obstruct the passage to that obstinate lead,
which, all agreed, alone impeded the recovery of
the unfortunate sufferer. This indecision was
one of the penalties that poor Lionel paid for
his greatness; for had it been Meriton who
lingered
,
instead of his master, it is quite
probable
the case would have been determined at a
much earlier hour. At length a young and
enterprising
leech, with the world before him, arrived
from Europe, who, possessing greater skill or more
effrontery (the effects are sometimes the same) than
his fellows, did not hesitate to decide at once on
the expediency of an operation. The medical staff
of the army sneered at this bold innovator, and
at first were content with such silent testimonials
of their contempt. But when the friends of the
patient, listening, as usual, to the whisperings of
hope, consented that the confident man of probes
should use his instruments, the voices of his
contemporaries
became not only loud, but clamorous.
There was a day or two when even the
watch-worn
and jaded subalterns of the army forgot
the dangers and hardships of the siege, to attend
with demure and instructed countenances to the
unintelligible jargon of the Medici of their
camp; and men grew pale, as they listened, who
had never been known to exhibit any symptoms
of the disgraceful passion before their more
acknowledged enemies. But when it became
known that the ball was safely extracted, and
the patient was pronounced convalescent, a calm
succeeded that was much more portentous to the
human race than the preceding tempest; and in
a short time the daring practitioner was
universally
acknowledged to be the founder of a new
theory. The degrees of M. D. were showered
upon his honoured head from half the learned
bodies in Christendom, while many of his
enthusiastic
admirers and imitators became justly
entitled
to the use of the same magical symbols, as
annexments
to their patrony micks, with the addition
of the first letter in the alphabet. The ancient
reasoning was altered to suit the modern facts, and
before the war was ended, some thousands of the
servants of the crown, and not a few of the
patriotic
colonists, were thought to have died,
scientifically
,
under the favour of this important
discovery
.
We might devote a chapter to the minute
promulgation
of such an event, had not more recent
philosophers long since upset the practice, (in
which case the theory seems to fall, as a matter of
course,) by a renewal of those bold adventures,
which teach us, occasionally, something new in the
anatomy of man; as in the science of geography,
the sealers of New-England have been able to
discover
Terra Australis, where Cook saw nothing
but water; or Parry finds veins and arteries in that
part of the American continent which had so long
been thought to consist of worthless cartilage.
Whatever may have been the effects of the
operation on the surgical science, it was
healthful
,
in the first degree, to its subject. For seven
weary months Lionel lay in a state in which
he might be said to exist, instead of live, but
little conscious of surrounding occurrences; and
happily for himself, nearly insensible to pain and
anxiety. At moments the flame of life would
apparently glimmer like the dying lamp, and
then both the fears and hopes of his attendants
were disappointed, as the patient dropped again
into that state of apathy in which so much of
his time was wasted. From an erroneous
opinion
of his master's sufferings, Meriton had been
induced to make a free use of soporifics, and no
small part of Lionel's insensibility was
produced
by an excessive use of that laudanum for
which he was indebted to the mistaken humanity
of his valet. At the moment of the operation the
adventurous surgeon had availed himself of the
same stupifying drug, and many days of dull,
heavy, and alarming apathy succeeded, before
his system, finding itself relieved from its
unnatural
inmate, resumed its healthful functions, and
began to renew its powers. By a singular
good-fortune
his leech was too much occupied by
his own novel honours, to follow up his success,
secundem artem
, as a great general pushes a
victory
to the utmost; and that matchless doctor,
Nature, was permitted to complete the cure.
When the effects of the anodynes had
subsided
,
the patient found himself entirely free from
uneasiness, and dropped into a sweet and
refreshing
sleep that lasted for many hours
without
interruption. He awoke a new man; with
his body renovated, his head clear, and his
recollections
,
though a little confused and
wandering
,
certainly better than they had been since
the moment when he fell in the mle on Breeds.
This restoration to all the nobler properties of
life occurred about the tenth hour of the day;
and as Lionel opened his eyes, with
understanding
in their expression, they fell upon the
cheerfulness
which a bright sun, assisted by the
dazzling
light of the masses of snow without, had lent
to every object in his apartment. The curtains
of the windows had been opened, and every
article of the furniture was arranged with a
neatness
that manifested the studied care which
presided
over his illness. In one corner, it is true,
Meriton had established himself in an easy-chair,
with an arrangement of attitude which spoke
more in favour of his consideration for the valet
than the master, while he was comforting his
faculties
for a night of watchfulness, by the sweet,
because stolen, slumbers of the morning.
A flood of recollections broke into the mind
of Lionel together, and it was some little time
before
he could so far separate the true from the
imaginary, as to attain a tolerably clear
comprehension
of what had occurred in the little
age he had been dozing. Raising himself on
one elbow, without difficulty, he passed his hand
once or twice slowly over his face, and then
trusted his voice in a summons to his man.
Meriton
started at the well-known sounds, and after
diligently rubbing his eyes, like one who awakes
by surprise, he arose and gave the customary
reply.
How now, Meriton! exclaimed Major
Lincoln
;
you sleep as sound as a recruit on post,
and I suppose you have been stationed like one,
with twice-told orders to be vigilant.
The valet stood with open mouth, as if ready to
devour his master's words with more senses than
one, and then, as Lionel concluded, passed his
hands in quick succession over his eyes, as before,
though with a very different object, ere he
answered
Thank God, sir, thank God! you look
like yourself once more, and we shall live again
as we used to. Yes, yes, siryou'll do now
you'll do this time. That's a miracle of a man,
is the great Lon'non surgeon! and now we shall
go back to Soho, and live like civilizers. Thank
God, sir, thank God! you smile again, and I hope
if any thing should go wrong you'll soon be able
to give me one of those awful looks that I am so
used to, and which makes my heart jump into my
mouth, when I know I've been forgetful!
The poor fellow, in whom long service had
created
a deep attachment to his master, which had
been greatly increased by the solicitude of a nurse,
was compelied to cease his unconnected
expressions
of joy, while he actually wept. Lionel was
too much affected by this evidence of feeling, to
continue the dialogue, for several minutes;
during
which time he employed himself in putting on
part of his attire, assisted by the gulping valet,
when, drawing his robe-de-chambre around his
person, he leaned on the shoulder of his man, and
took the seat which the other had so recently
quitted.
Well, well, Meriton, that will do, said
Lionel
,
giving a deep hem, as though his
breathing
was obstructed; that will do, silly fellow;
I trust I shall live to give you many a frown, and
some few guineas, yet.I have been shot, I
know
Shot, sir! interrupted the valetyou
have been downright and unlawfully murdered!
you were first shot, and then baggoneted, and after
that a troop of horse rode over you.I had it
from one of the royal Irish, who lay by your side
the whole time, and who now lives to tell of it
a good honest fellow is Terence, and if such a
thing was possible that your honour was poor
enough to need a pension, he would cheerfully
swear to your hurts at the King's Bench, or
War-office; Bridewell, or St. James', its all one
to the like of him.
I dare say, I dare say, said Lionel, smiling,
though he mechanically passed his hand over his
body, as his valet spoke of the bayonetbut the
poor fellow must have transferred some of his
own wounds to my personI own the bullet, but
object to the cavalry and the steel.
No, sir,
I
own the bullet, and it shall be
buried
with me in my dressing-box, at the head of
my grave, said Meriton, exhibiting the flattened
bit of lead, exultingly, in the palm of his hand
it has been in my pocket these thirteen days,
after tormenting your honour for six long months,
hid in the what d'ye call 'em muscles, away behind
the thingumy artery. But snug as it was, we got
it out! he is a miracle is the great Lon'non
surgeon
!
Lionel reached over to his purse, which Meriton
had placed regularly on the table, each morning,
in order to remove again at night, and dropping
several guineas in the hand of his valet, said
So much lead must need some gold to
sweeten
it. Put up the unseemly thing, and never let
me see it again!
Meriton coolly took the opposing metals, and
after glancing his eyes at the guineas, with a
readiness
that embraced their amount in a single
look, he dropped them carelessly into one pocket,
while he restored the lead to the other with an
exceeding attention to its preservation. He then
turned his hand to the customary duties of his
station.
I remember well to have been in a fight on
the heights of Charlestown, even to the instant
when I got my hurt, continued his masterand
I even recollect many things that have occurred
since; a period which appears like a whole life to
me. But after all, Meriton, I believe my ideas
have not been remarkable for their clearness.
Lord, sir, you have talked to me, and
scolded
me, and praised me a hundred and a hundred
times over again; but you have never scolded as
sharp like as you can, nor have you ever spoken
and looked as bright as you do this morning!
I am in the house of Mrs. Lechmere, again,
continued Lionel, examining the roomI know
this apartment, and those private doors too well
to be mistaken.
To be sure you are, sir; Madam Lechmere
had you brought here from the field to her own
house, and one of the best it is in Boston, too: and
I expect that Madam would some how lose her
title to it, if any thing serious should happen to
us?
Such as a bayonet, or a troop of horse! but
why do you fancy any such thing?
Because, sir, when Madam comes here of an
afternoon, which she did daily, before she
sickened
,
I heard her very often say to herself, if you
should be so unfortunate as to die, there would
be an end to all her hopes of her house.
Then it is Mrs. Lechmere who visits me
daily
,
said Lionel, thoughtfully; I have
recollections
of a female form hovering around my bed,
though I had supposed it more youthful and active
than that of my aunt.
And you are quite right, siryou have had
such a nurse the whole time as is seldom to be
met with. For making a posset or a gruel, I'll
match her with the oldest woman in the wards of
Guy's; and, to my taste, the best bar-keeper at
the Lon'non is a fool to her at a negus.
These are high accomplishments, indeed!
and who may be their mistress?
Miss Agnus, sir; a rare good nurse is Miss
Agnus Danforth! though in point of regard to the
troops, I shouldn't presume to call her at all
distinguishable
.
Miss Danforth, repeated Lionel, dropping
his expecting eyes in disappointment, from the
face of Meriton to the floorI hope she has
not sustained all this trouble on my account
alone. There are women enough in the
establishment
one
would think such offices might be
borne by the domesticsin short, Meriton, was
she without an assistant in all these little
kindnesses
?
I
helped her, you know, sir, all I could;
though my neguses never touch the right spot,
like Miss Agnus's.
VOL. II. 2
One would think, by your account, that I
have done little else than guzzle port wine, for
six months, said Lionel, pettishly.
Lord, sir, you wouldn't drink a thimblefull
from a glass, often; which I always took for a bad
symptom; for I'm certain 'twas no fault of the
liquor, if it wasn't drunk.
Well, enough of your favourite beverage! I
sicken at the name alreadybut, Meriton, have
not others of my friends called to inquire after
my fate?
Certainly, sirthe commander-in-chief sends
an aid or a servant every day; and Lord Percy
left his card more than
Poh! these are calls of courtesy; but I have
relatives in BostonMiss Dynevor, has she left
the town?
No, sir, said the valet, very coolly resuming
the duty of arranging the phials on the
night-table
;
she is not much of a moving body, is
that Miss Cecil.
She is not ill, I trust? demanded Lionel.
Lord, it goes through me, part joy and part
fear, to hear you speak again so quick and brisk,
sir! No, she isn't downright ailing, but she hasn't
the life and knowledge of things, as her cousin,
Miss Agnus.
Why do you think so, fellow?
Because, sir, she is mopy, and don't turn her
hand to any of the light lady's work in the
family
.
I have seen her sit in that very chair, where
you are now, sir, for hours together, without
moving; unless it was some nervous start when
you groaned, or breathed a little upward through
your honour's noseI have taken it into my
consideration
,
sir, that she poetizes; at all events,
she likes what I calls quietude!
Indeed! said Lionel, pursuing the
conversation
with an interest that would have struck
a more observant man as remarkablewhat
reason have you for suspecting Miss Dynevor of
manufacturing rhymes?
Because, sir, she has often a bit of paper in
her hand; and I have seen her read the same
thing over and over again, till I'm sure she must
know it by heart; which your poetizers always do
with what they writes.
Perhaps it was a letter? cried Lionel, with
a quickness that caused Meriton to drop a phial
he was dusting, at the expense of its contents.
Bless me, master Lionel, how strong, and
like old times you speak!
I believe I am amazed to find you know so
much of the divine art, Meriton.
Practice makes perfect, you know, sir, said
the simpering valetI can't say I ever did
much in that way, though I wrote some verses on
a pet pig, as died down at Ravenscliffe, the last
time we was there; and I got considerable eclaw
for a few lines on a vase which lady Bab's woman
broke one day, in a scuffle when the foolish
creature
said as I wanted to kiss her; though all that
knows me, knows that I needn't break vases to
get kisses from the like of her!
Very well, said Lionel; some day when I
am stronger, I may like to be indulged with a
perusal
go
now, Meriton, to the larder, and look
about you; I feel the symptoms of returning
health grow strong upon me.
The gratified valet instantly departed, leaving
his master to the musings of his own busy
fancy
.
Several minutes passed away before the
young man raised his head from the hand that
supported it, and then it was only done when he
thought he heard a light footstep near him. His
ear had not deceived him, for Cecil Dynevor
herself, stood within a few feet of the chair, which
concealed, in a great measure, his person from
her view. It was apparent, by her attitude and
her tread, that she expected to find the sick
where she had seen him last, and where, for so
many dreary months, his listless form had been
stretched in apathy. Lionel followed her
graceful
movements with his eyes, and as the airy band
of her morning cap waved aside at her own
breathing
,
he discovered the unnatural paleness that was
seated on her speaking features. But when she
drew the folds of the bed curtains, and missed the
invalid, thought is not quicker than the motion
with which she turned her light person towards
the chair. Here she encountered the eyes of the
young man, beaming on her with delight, and
expressing all that animation and intelligence
to which they had so long been strangers.
Yielding to the surprise and the gush of her
feelings, Cecil flew to his feet, and clasping
one of his extended hands in both her own, she
cried
Lionel, dear Lionel, you are better! God be
praised, you look well again!
Lionel gently extricated his hand from the
warm and unguarded pressure of her soft
fingers
,
and drew forth a paper which she had
unconsciously committed to his keeping.
This, dearest Cecil, he whispered to the
blushing maiden, this is my own letter, written
when I knew my life to be at imminent hazard,
and speaking the purest thoughts of my heart
tell me, then, it has not been thus kept for
nothing
?
Cecil dropped her face between her hands for
a moment, in burning shame, and then, as all the
emotions of the moment crowded around her
heart, she yielded to them as a woman, and burst
into a paroxysm of tears. It is needless to dwell
on those consoling and seducing speeches of the
young man, which soon succeeded in luring his
companion not only from her sobs, but even from
her confusion, and permitted her to raise her
beautiful countenance to his ardent gaze, bright and
confiding as his fondest wishes could have made it.
The letter of Lionel was too direct, not to save
her pride, and it had been too often perused for
a single sentence to be soon forgotten. Besides,
Cecil had watched over his couch too fondly and
too long to indulge in any of those little
coquetries
which are sometimes met with in similar
scenes. She said all that an affectionate,
generous
,
and modest female would say on such
an occasion; and it is certain, that well as
Lionel
looked on waking, the little she uttered
had the effect to improve his appearance ten-fold.
And you received my letter on the
morning
after the battle? said Lionel, leaning fondly
over her, as she still, unconsciously, kneeled by
his side.
Yesyesit was your order that it should
be sent to me only in case of your death; but
for more than a month you were numbered as
among the dead by us all.Oh! what a month
was that!
Tis past, my sweet friend, and, God be
praised
,
I may now look forward to health and
happiness
.
God be praised, indeed, murmured Cecil,
the tears again rushing to her eyesI would
not live that month over again, Lionel, for all
that this world can offer!
Dearest Cecil, he replied, I can only
repay this kindness and suffering on my account,
by shielding you from the rude contact of the
world, even as your father would protect you,
were he again in being.
She looked up in his face with all the soul of
a woman's confidence beaming in her eyes, as she
answered
You will, Lincoln, I know you willyou
have sworn it, and I should be a wretch to doubt
you.
He drew her unresisting form into his arms, and
folded her to his bosom. In another moment a
noise, like one ascending the stairs, was heard
through the open door of the room, when all the
feelings of her sex rushed to the breast of Cecil.
She sprung on her feet, and hardly allowing time
to the delighted Lionel to note the burning tints
that suffused her whole face, she darted from the
room with the rapidity and lightness of an
antelope
.
CHAPTER II.
Dead, for a ducat, dead.
Hamlet
.
While
Lionel was in the confusion of
feeling
produced by the foregoing scene, the intruder,
after a prelude of singularly heavy and loud steps,
on the floor, as if some one approached on
crutches, entered by a door opposite to the one
through which Cecil had so suddenly vanished.
At the next moment the convalescent was saluted
by the full, cheerful voice of his visiter
God bless you, Leo, and bless the whole of
us, for we need it, cried Polwarth, eagerly
advancing
to grasp the extended hands of his friend.
Meriton has told me that you have got the
true marks of healtha good appetite, at last.
I should have broken my neck in hurrying up
to wish you joy on the moment, but I just stepped
into the kitchen, without Mrs. Lechmere's leave,
to show her cook how to broil the steak they are
warming through for youa capital thing after
a long nap, and full of nutrimentGod bless
you, my dear Leo; the look of your bright eye is
as stimulating to my spirits as a West-India
pepper
is to the stomach.
Polwarth ceased shaking the hands of his
reanimated
friend, as with a husky voice he
concluded
,
and turning aside under the pretence of
reaching a chair, he dashed his hand before
his eyes, gave a loud hem, and took his seat
in silence. During the performance of this
evolution
,
Lionel had leisure to observe the
altered
person of the captain. His form, though
still rotund and even corpulent, was much
reduced
in dimensions, while in the place of one
of those lower members with which nature
furnishes
the human race, he had been compelled
to substitute a leg of wood, somewhat
inartificially
made, and roughly shed with iron. This
last sad alteration, in particular, attracted the
look of Major Lincoln, who continued to gaze
at it with glistening eyes, for some time after
the other had established himself, to his entire
satisfaction, in one of the cushioned seats of the
apartment.
I see my frame-work has caught your eye,
Leo, said Polwarth, raising the wooden
substitute
,
with an air of affected indifference, and
tapping it lightly with his cane. 'Tis not as
gracefully cut, perhaps, as if it had been turned
from the hands of master Phidias, but in a place
like Boston, it is an invaluable member, inasmuch
as it knows neither hunger nor cold!
The Americans, then, press the town, said
Lionel, glad to turn the subject, and
maintain
the siege with vigour?
They have kept us in horrible bodily terror,
ever since the shallow waters toward the
mainland
have been frozen, and opened a path directly
into the heart of the place. Their Virginian
generalissimo
,
Washington, appeared a short time
after
the affair over on the other peninsula, (a
cursed
business, that Leo!) and with him came all
the trimmings of a large army. Since that time
they have worn a more military front, though little
else has been done, excepting an occasional
skirmish
,
but cooping us up like so many uneasy
pigeons in our cage.
And Gage chafes not at the confinement?
Gage!we sent him off like the soups,
months ago. No, nothe moment the ministry
discovered that we had come to our forks, in good
earnest, they chose black Billy to preside: and
now we stand at bay with the rebels, who have
already learnt that our leader is not a child at the
grand entertainment of war.
Yes, seconded by such men as Clinton and
Burgoyne, and supported by the flower of our
troops, the position can be easily maintained.
No position can be easily maintained, Major
Lincoln, said Polwarth, promptly, in the face
of starvation, both internal and external.
And is the case so desperate?
Of that you shall judge yourself, my friend.
When Parliament shut the port of Boston, the
colonies were filled with grumblers; and now we
have opened it, and would be glad to see their
supplies, the devil a craft enters the harbour
willinglyah! Meriton, you have the steak, I
see; put it here, where your master can have
it at his elbow, and bring another plateI
breakfasted but indifferently well this morning.
So we are thrown completely on our own
resources
.
But the rebels do not let us enjoy even them
in peace. This thing is done to a turn
how charmingly the blood follows the knife!
They have gone so far as to equip privateers,
who cut off our necessaries, and he is a lucky
man who can get a meal like the one before us.
I had not thought the power of the
Americans
could have forced matters to such a pass.
What I have mentioned, though of vital
importance
,
is not half. If a man is happy enough
to obtain the materials for a good dishyou
should have rubbed an onion over these plates,
Mr. Meritonhe don't know where he is to find
fuel to cook it withal.
Looking at the comforts with which I am
surrounded, my good friend, I cannot but fancy
your imagination heightens the distress.
Fancy no such silly thing, for when you get
abroad, you will find it but too exact. In the
article of food, if we are not reduced, like the
men of Jerusalem, to eating one another, we are,
half the time, rather worse off, being entirely
destitute of wholesome nutriment. Let but an
unlucky
log float by the town, among the ice, and
go forth and witness the struggling and
skirmishing
between the Yankees and our frozen
fingers for its possession, and you will become a
believer! 'Twill be lucky if the water-soaked
relic of some wharf should escape without a
cannonade! I don't tell you these things as a
grumbler, Leo; for thank God, I have only half as
many toes as other men to keep warmth in; and
as for eating, a little will suffice for me, now my
corporeal establishment is so sadly reduced.
Lionel paused, in melancholy, as his friend
attempted
to jest at his misfortune, and then, by a
very natural transition for a young man in his
situation, he proudly exclaimed
But we gained the day, Polwarth! and drove
the rebels from their entrenchments, like chaff
before a whirlwind!
Humph! ejaculated the captain, laying his
wooden leg carefully over its more valuable
fellow, and regarding it ruefully, while he
spokehad we made a suitable use of the
bounties of nature, and turned their position,
instead
of running into the jaws of the beast, many
might have left the field better supplied with
appurtenances than are some among us at present.
But dark William loves a brush, they say, and
he enjoyed it, on that occasion, to his heart's
content
!
He must be grateful to Clinton for his timely
presence?
Does the devil delight in martyrdom! The
presence of a thousand rebels would have been
more welcome, even at that moment; nor has he
smiled once, on his good natured assistant, since
he thrust himself, in that unwelcome manner,
between
him and his enemy. We had enough to
think of with our dead and wounded, and in
maintaining
our conquest, or something more than
black looks and unkind eyes would have
followed
the deed.
I fear to inquire into the fortunes of the field,
so many names of worth must be numbered in the
loss.
Twelve or fifteen hundred men are not to be
knocked on the head out of such an army and
all the clever fellows escape. Gage, I know, calls
the loss something like eleven hundred; but after
vaporing so much about the yankees, their
prowess is not to be acknowledged in its bloom
at once. A man seldom goes on one leg, but he
halts a little at first, as I can say from experience
put down thirteen, Leo, as a medium, and
you'll not miscalculate largelyyes, indeed, there
were some brave young men amongst them! those
rascally light-footed gentry that I gave up so
opportunely
,
were finely pepperedand there were
the Fusilleers had hardly men enough left to
saddle their goat!
*
*
This regiment, in consequence of some tradition, kept a
goat, with gilded horns, as a memorial. Once a year it
celebrated
a festival in which the bearded quadroped acted a conspicous
part. In the battle of Bunker-hill, the corps was distinguished
alike for its courage and its losses.
And the marines! they must have suffered
heavily; I saw Pitcairn fall before me; said
Lionel, speaking with hesitationI greatly
fear our old comrade, the grenadier, did not
escape with better fortune.
Mac! exclaimed Polwarth, casting a
furtive
glance at his companion.Ay, Mac was
not as lucky in that business as he was in
Germanyhe-emMachad an obstinate way
with him, Leo, a damn'd obstinate fellow in all
military matters, but as generous a heart and as
free in sharing a mess-hill as any man in his
majesty's service! I crossed the river in the same
boat with him, and he entertained us with his
queer thoughts on the art of war. According to
Mac's notions of things, the grenadiers were to
do all the fightinga damn'd odd way with him
had Mac!
There are few of us without peculiarities,
and I could wish that none of them were more
offensive than the trifling prejudices of poor
Dennis
M`Fuse.
Yes, yes, added Polwarth, hemming
violently
,
as if determined to clear his throat at every
hazard; he was a little opinionated in trifles,
such as a knowledge of war, and matters of
discipline
,
but in all important things as tractable as
a child. He loved his joke, but it was impossible
to have a less difficult or a more unpretending
palate in one's mess! The greatest evil I can wish
him was breath in his body, to live and enjoy, in
these hard times, when things become excellent
by comparison, the sagacious provision which his
own ingenuity contrived to secure out of the
cupidity of our ancient landlord, Mister Seth
Sage.
Then that notable scheme did not entirely
fall to the ground, said Lionel, with a feverish
desire to change the subject once more. I had
thought the Americans were too vigilant to
admit
the intercourse.
Seth has been too sagacious to permit them
to obstruct it. The prices acted like a
soporific
on his conscience, and, by using your name I
believe, he has formed some friend of sufficient
importance amongst the rebels to protect him
in his trade. His supplies make their
appearance
twice a-week as regularly as the meats
follow
the soups in a well-ordered banquet.
You then can communicate with the country,
and the country with the town! Although
Washington
may wink at the proceeding, I should fear
the scowl of Howe.
Why, in order to prevent suspicions of unfair
practices, and at the same time to serve the cause
of humanity, so the explanation reads, you know,
our sapient host, has seen fit to employ a fool as
his agent in the intercourse. A fellow, as you
may remember, of some notoriety; a certain
simpleton
,
who calls himself Job Pray.
Lionel continued silent for many moments,
during
which time his recollections began to
revive
,
and his thoughts glanced over the scenes
that occurred in the first months of his residence
in Boston. It is quite possible that a painful,
though still general and indefinite feeling
mingled
with his musings, for he evidently strove
to expel some such unwelcome intruder, as he
resumed the discourse with a strong appearance
of forced gayety.
Ay, ay, I well remember poor Joba fellow
once seen and known, not easily to be
forgotten
.
He used, of old, to attach himself greatly
to my person, but I suppose, like the rest of the
world, I am neglected when in retirement.
You do the lad injustice; he not only makes
VOL. II. S
frequent inquiries, after his slovenly manner I
acknowledge
,
concerning your condition, but
sometimes
he seems better informed in the
matter
than myself, and can requite my frequent
answers
to his questions, by imparting, instead of
receiving, intelligence of your improvement; more
especially since the ball has been extracted.
That should be very singular, too, said
Lionel
,
with a still more thoughtful brow.
Not so very remarkable, Leo, as one would
at first imagine, interrupted his companion
the lad is not wanting in sagacity, as he
manifested
by his choice of dishes at our old
mess-table
Ah!
Leo, Leo, we may see many a
discriminating
palate, but where shall we go to
find another such a friend! one who could eat
and' jokedrink and quarrel with a man in a
breath, like poor Dennis, who is gone from
among us for ever! There was a piquancy about
poor Mac that acted on the dullness of life like
condiments on the natural appetite!
Meriton, who was diligently brushing his
master's
coat, an office that he performed daily,
though the garment had not been worn in so
long a period, stole a glance at the averted eye
of the Major, and understanding its expression to
indicate a determined silence, he ventured to
maintain
the discourse in his own unworthy person.
Yes, sir, a nice gentleman was captain
M`Fuse, and one as fought as stoutly for the king
as any gentleman in the army, all agrees.It was
a thousand pities such a fine figure of a man
hadn't a better idea of dress; it isn't all, sir,
as is gifted in that way! But every body says he's
a detrimental loss, though there's some officers in
town who consider so little how to wear their,
ornaments, that if they were to be shot I am sure
no one would miss them.
Ah! Meriton, cried the full-hearted
Polwartb
,
I see you are a youth of more
observation
than I had suspected! Mac had all the
seeds of a man in him, though some of them might
not have come to maturity. There was a flavour
in his humour that served as a relish to every
conversation
in which he mingled. Did you serve
the poor fellow up in handsome style, Meriton, for
his last worldly exhibition?
Yes, indeed, sir, we gave him as ornamental
a funeral as can be seen out of Lon'non.
Besides
the Royal Irish, all the grenadiers was
out; that is all as wasn't hurt, which was near
half of them. As I knowed the regard
Master
Lionel had for the captain, I dressed him
with my own handsI trimmed his whiskers, sir,
and altered his hair more in front, and seeing that
his honour was getting a little gray, I threw on a
sprinkling of powder, and as handsome a corpse
was captain M`Fuse as any gentleman in the army,
let the other be who he may!
The eyes of Polwarth twinkled, and he blew
his nose with a noise not unlike the sound of a
clarion ere he rejoined
Yes, yes, time and hardships had given a
touch of frost to the head of the poor fellow;
but it is a consolation to know that he died like a
soldier, and not by the hands of that vulgar
butcher, Nature; and that being dead, he was
removed
according to his deserts!
Indeed, sir, said Meriton, with a
solemnity
worthy of the occasion, we gave him a great
processiona great deal can be made out of
his majesty's uniform, on such festivities, and it
had a wonderful look about it!Did you speak,
sir?
Yes, added Lionel, impatiently, remove
the cloth; and go, inquire if there be letters for
me.
The valet submissively obeyed, and after a
short pause the dialogue was resumed by the
gentlemen
on subjects of a less painful nature.
As Polwarth was exceedingly communicative,
Lionel soon obtained a very general, and to do the
captain suitable justice, an extremely impartial
account of the situation of the hostile forces, as
well as of all the leading events that had transpired
since the day of Breeds. Once or twice the invalid
ventured an allusion to the spirit of the rebels,
and to the unexpected energy they had
discovered
;
but Polwarth heard them all in silence,
answering
only by a melancholy smile, and, in the
last instance, by a significant gesture towards his
unnatural supporter. Of course, after this
touching
acknowledgment of his former error, his friend
waved the subject for others less personal.
He learned that the royal general maintained
his hardly-earned conquest on the opposite
peninsula
,
where he was as effectually beleaguered,
however, as in the town of Boston itself. In
the meantime, while the war was conducted in
earnest at the point where it commenced,
hostilities
had broken out in every one of those
colonies
south of the St. Lawrence and the Great
Lakes, where the presence of the royal troops
invited
an appeal to force. At first, while the colonists
acted under the impulses of the high enthusiasm of
a sudden rising, they had been everywhere
successful
.
A general army had been organized, as
already
related, and divisions were employed at
different
points to effect those conquests, which, in that
early state of the struggle, were thought to be
important
to the main result. But the effects of their
imperfect means and divided power were already
becoming visible. After a series of minor
victories
,
Montgomery had fallen in a most
desperate
but unsuccessful attempt to carry the
impregnable
fortress of Quebec; and ceasing to be
the assailants, the Americans were gradually
compelled to collect their resources to meet that
mighty effort of the crown which was known
to be not far distant. As thousands of their
fellow-subjects in the mother country manifested
a strong repugnance to the war, the Ministry
so far submitted to the influence of that free
spirit which first took deep root in Britain, as
to turn their eyes to those states of Europe, who
made a trade in human life, in quest of
mercenaries
to quell the temper of the colonists. In
consequence, the fears of the timid amongst the
Americans were excited by rumours of the vast
hordes of Russians and Germans who were to
be poured into their country with the fell intent
to make them slaves. Perhaps no step of their
enemies had a greater tendency to render them
odious in the eyes of the Americans, than this
measure of introducing foreigners to decide a
quarrel purely domestic. So long as none but
men who had been educated in those
acknowledged
principles of justice and law, known to both
people, were admitted to the contest, there were
visible points common to each, which might
render
the struggle less fierce, and in time lead to a
permanent reconciliation. But they reasoned
not inaptly when they asserted that in a
contest
rendered triumphant by slaves, nothing
but abject submission could ensue to the
conquered
.
It was like throwing away the
scabbard
,
and, by abandoning reason, submitting the
result to the sword alone. In addition to the
estrangement these measures were gradually
increasing
between the people of the
mother-country
and the colonies, must be added the change
it produced amongst the latter in their habits of
regarding the person of their prince.
3*
During the whole of the angry discussion, and
the recriminations which preceded the drawing
of blood, the colonists had admitted, to the
fullest
extent, not only in their language, but in
their feelings, that fiction of the British law
which says the king can do no wrong.
Throughout the wide extent of an empire, on
which the sun was never known to set, the
English
monarch could boast of no subjects more
devoted
to his family and person, than the men who
now stood in arms against what they honestly
believed to be the unconstitutional encroachments
of his power. Hitherto the whole weight of their
resentment had justly fallen on the advisers of
the Prince, who himself was thought to be
ignorant
,
as he was probably innocent, of the abuses
so generally practised in his name. But as the
contest thickened, the natural feelings of the man
were thought to savour of the political acts he was
required to sanction with his name. It was soon
whispered amongst those who had the best means
of intelligence, that the feelings of the sovereign
were deeply interested in the maintenance of
what he deemed his prerogative, and the
ascendency
of that body of the representatives of
his empire, which he met in person and influenced
by his presence. Ere long this opinion was
rumoured
abroad, and as the minds of men
began
to loosen from their ancient attachments
and prejudices, they confounded, by a very
natural
feeling, the head with the members;
forgetting
that Liberty and Equality formed no
part of the trade of Princes. The name of the
monarch was daily falling into disrepute; and as
the colonial writers ventured to allude more
freely
to his person and power, the glimmerings
of that light were seen, which was a precursor of
the rise of `the stars of the west' amongst the na
tional symbols of the earth. Until then, few had
thought, and none had ventured to speak openly
of independence, though events had been silently
preparing the colonists for such a final measure.
Allegiance to the Prince was the last and only
tie to be severed, for the colonies already governed
themselves in all matters, whether of internal or
foreign policy, as effectually as any people could,
whose right to do so was not generally
acknowledged
.
But as the honest nature of George
IIId. admitted of no disguise, mutual disgust
and alienation were the natural consequences of
the reaction of sentiment between the Prince and
his western people.
*
*
Note
.The prejudices of the king of England were
unavoidable
in his insulated situation, but his virtues and
integrity
were exclusively the property of the man. His speech to
our first minister after the peace cannot be too often recorded.
I was the last man in my kingdom to acknowledge your
independence
,
and I shall be the last to violate it.
All this, and much more of minute detail, was
hastily commented on by Polwarth, who
possessed
,
in the midst of his epicurean propensities,
sterling good-sense, and great integrity of
intention
.
Lionel was chiefly a listener, nor did he
cease the greedy and interesting employment
until
warned by his weakness, and the stroke of a
neighbouring clock, that he was trespassing too
far on prudence. His friend then assisted the
exhausted
invalid to his bed, and after giving him a
world of good advice, together with a warm
pressure
of the hand, he stumped his way out of the
room, with a noise that brought, at every tread,
an echo from the heart of Major Lincoln.
CHAPTER III.
God never meant that man should scale the heavens
By strides of human wisdom.
Cowper
.
A VERY few days of gentle exercise in the
bracing air of the season, were sufficient to
restore
the strength of the invalid, whose wounds
had healed while he lay slumbering under the
influence of the anodynes prescribed by his leech.
Polwarth, in consideration of the dilapidated
state of his own limbs, together with the
debility
of Lionel, had so far braved the ridicule
of the army, as to set up one of those
comfortable
and easy conveyances, which, in the good
old times of colonial humility, were known by
the quaint and unpretending title of tom-pungs.
To equip this establishment, he had been
compelled
to impress one of the fine hunters of
his friend. The animal had been taught, by
virtue of much training from his groom, aided a
little, perhaps, by the low state of the garners of
the place, to amble through the snow as
quietly
as if he were conscious of the altered condition
of his master's health. In this safe vehicle the
two gentlemen might be seen daily gliding along
the upper streets of the town, and moving through
the winding paths of the common, receiving the
congratulations of their friends; or, in their turn,
visiting others, who, like themselves, had been
wounded in the murderous battle of the
preceding
summer, but who, less fortunate than they,
were still compelled to submit to the lingering
confinement of their quarters.
It was not difficult to persuade Cecil and
Agnes
to join in many of their short excursions,
though no temptation could induce the latter
to still the frown that habitually settled on her
beautiful brow, whenever chance or intention
brought them in contact with any of the
gentlemen
of the army. Miss Dynevor was,
however
,
much more conciliating in her deportment,
and even at times, so gracious as to incur the
private
reproaches of her friend.
Surely, Cecil, you forget how much our poor
country men are suffering in their miserable
lodgings
without the town, or you would be less
prodigal
of your condescension to these butterflies
of the army, cried Agnes, pettishly, while they
were uncloaking after one of these rides,
during
which the latter thought her cousin had lost
sight of that tacit compact, by which most of the
women of the colonies deemed themselves bound
to exhibit their feminine resentments to their
invaderswere a chief from our own army
presented to you, he could not have been
received
in a sweeter manner than you bestowed
your smile to-day on that sir Digby Dent!
I can say nothing in favour of its sweetness,
my acid cousin, but
that
sir Digby Dent is a
gentleman
A gentleman! yesso is every Englishman
who wears a scarlet coat, and knows how to play
off his airs in the colonies!
And as I hope I have some claims to be called
a lady, continued Cecil, quietly, I do not know
why in the little intercourse we have, I should
be rude to him.
Cecil Dynevor! exclaimed Agnes, with a
sparkling eye, and with a woman's intuitive
perception
of the other's motives, all Englishmen
are not Lionel Lincolns.
Nor is Major Lincoln an Englishman,
returned Cecil, laughing, while she blushed;
though I have reason to think that captain
Polwarth
may be.
Silly, child, silly; the poor man has paid the
penalty of his offence, and is to be regarded with
pity.
Have a care, my coz.Pity is one of a large
connexion of gentle feelings; when you once
admit the first-born, you may leave open your
doors to the whole family.
Now that is exactly the point in question,
Cecilbecause you esteem Major Lincoln, you
are willing to admire Howe and all his
myrmidons
;
but I can pity, and still be firm.
Le bon temps viendra!
Never, interrupted Agnes, with a warmth
that prevented her perceiving how much she
admittedNever, at least, under the guise of a
scarlet coat.
Cecil smiled, but having completed her toilet,
she withdrew without making any reply.
Such little discussions, enlivened more or less
by the peculiar spirit of Agnes, were of frequent
occurrence, though the eye of her cousin became
daily more thoughtful, and the indifference with
which she listened, was more apparent in each
succeeding dialogue.
In the meantime, the affairs of the siege, though
conducted with extreme caution, amounted only
to a vigilant blockade.
The Americans lay by thousands in the
surrounding
villages, or were hutted in strong bands
nigh the batteries which commanded the
approaches
to the place. Notwithstanding, their
means had been greatly increased, by the
capture
of several vessels, loaded with warlike stores,
as well as by the reduction of two important
fortresses
towards the Canadian frontiers, they were
still too scanty to admit of that wasteful
expenditure
which is the usual accompaniment of
war. In addition to their necessities, as a
reason
for forbearance, might also be mentioned
the feelings of the colonists, who were anxious, in
mercy to themselves, to regain their town as little
injured as possible. On the other hand, the
impression
made by the battle of Bunker-hill was
still so vivid as to curb the enterprise of the royal
commanders, and Washington had been
permitted
to hold their powerful forces in check, by
an untrained and half-armed multitude, that was,
at times, absolutely destitute of the means of
maintaining even a momentary contest.
As, however, a show of hostilities was
maintained
,
the reports of cannon were frequently
heard, and there were days when skirmishes
between the advanced parties of the two hosts,
brought on more heavy firings, which
continued
for longer periods. The ears of the ladies
had been long accustomed to these rude sounds,
and as the trifling loss which followed was
altogether
confined to the outworks, they were
listened
to with but little or no terror.
In this manner a fortnight flew swiftly away,
without an incident to be related. One fine
morning
,
at the end of that period, Polwarth drove into
the little court-yard of Mrs. Lechmere's residence,
with all those knowing flourishes he could
command
,
and which in the year 1775 were thought
to indicate the greatest familiarity with the
properties
of a tom-pung. In another minute his
wooden member was heard in the passage, timing
his steps as he approached the room where the
rest of the party were waiting his appearance.
The two cousins stood wrapped in furs, with
their smiling faces blooming beneath double rows
of lace to soften the pictures, while Major
Lincoln
was in the act of taking his cloak from
Meriton as the door opened for the admission of
the captain.
What, already dished! exclaimed the
good-natured
Polwarth, glancing his eyes from one
to the otherso much the better;
punctuality
is the true leaven of lifea good watch is as
necessary to the guest as the host, and to the host
as his cook. Miss Agnes, you are amazingly
murderous
to-day! If Howe expects his subalterns
to do their duty, he should not suffer you to go
at large in his camp.
The fine eye of Miss Danforth sparkled as he
proceeded, but happening to fall on his mutilated
person, its expression softened, and she was
content
with answering with a smile
Let your general look to himself; I seldom
go abroad but to espy his weakness!
The captain gave an expressive shrug of his
shoulder, and turning aside to his friend, said
in an under tone
You see how it is, Major Lincoln; ever
since I have been compelled to serve myself
up, like a turkey from yesterday's dinner, with a
single leg, I have not been able to get a sharp
reply from the young womanshe has grown an
even-tempered, tasteless morsel! and I am like a
two-prong fork; only fit for carving! well, I care
not how soon they cut me up entirely, since she
has lost her piquancybut shall we to the
church?
Lionel looked a little embarrassed, and
fingered
a paper he held in his hand, for a moment,
before
he handed it to the other for his perusal.
What have we here? continued Polwarth
Two officers wounded in the late battle,
desire
to return thanks for their recoveryhum
humhumtwo?yourself, and who is the
other?
I had hoped it would be my old companion
and school-fellow?
Ha! what, me! exclaimed the captain,
unconsciously
elevating his wooden-leg, and
examining
it with a rueful eyeumph! Leo, do
you think a man has a particular reason to be
grateful for the loss of a leg?
It might have been worse.
I don't know, interrupted Polwarth, a
little
obstinatelythere would have been more
symmetry in it, if it had been both.
You forget your mother, continued Lionel,
as though the other had not spoken; I am very
sure it will give her heartfelt pleasure.
Polwarth gave a loud hem, rubbed his hand
over his face once or twice, gave another furtive
glance at his solitary limb, and then answered,
with a little tremour in his voice
Yes, yesI believe you are quite righta
mother can love her child, though he should be
chopped into mince-meat! The sex get that
generous feeling after they are turned of forty
it's your young woman that is particular about
proportions and correspondents.
You consent, then, that Meriton shall hand
in the request as it reads?
Polwarth hesitated a single instant longer, and
then, as he remembered his distant mother, for
Lionel had touched the right chord, his heart
melted within him.
Certainly, certainlyit might have been
worse, as it was with poor Dennisay, let
it pass for two; it shall go hard but I find
VOL. II. 4
a knee to bend on the occasion. Perhaps, Leo,
when a certain young lady sees I can have
a `te deum' for my adventure, she may cease to
think me such an object of pity as at present?
Lionel bowed in silence, and the captain,
turning
to Agnes, conducted her to the sleigh with a
particularly lofty air, that he intended should
indicate
his perfect superiority to the casualties of
war. Cecil took the arm of Major Lincoln, and
the whole party were soon seated in the vehicle
that was in waiting.
Until this day, which was the second Sunday
since his reappearance, and the first on which
the weather permitted him to go abroad, Lionel
had no opportunity to observe the altered
population
of the town. The inhabitants had gradually
left the place, some clandestinely, and others
under favour of passes from the royal general,
until those who remained were actually
outnumbered
by the army and its dependents. As the
party approached the King's Chapel, the street
was crowded by military men, collected in groups,
who indulged in thoughtless merriment, reckless
of the wounds their light conversation inflicted
on the few townsmen who might be seen moving
towards the church, with deportments suited to the
solemnity of their purpose, and countenances
severely chastened by a remembrance of the day,
and its serious duties. Indeed, so completely had
Boston lost that distinctive appearance of
sobriety
,
which had ever been the care and pride of
its people, in the levity of a garrison, that even
the immediate precincts of the temple were not
protected from the passing jest or rude mirth
of the gay and unreflecting, at an hour when a
quiet was wont to settle on the whole province,
as deep as if Nature had ceased her ordinary
functions to unite in the worship of man. Lionel
observed the change with mortification, nor
did it escape his uneasy glances, that his
two female companions concealed their faces in
their muffs, as if to exclude a view that brought
still more painful recollections to minds early
trained in the reflecting habits of the country.
When the sleigh drew up before the edifice, a
dozen hands were extended to assist the ladies
in their short but difficult passage into the
heavy
portico. Agnes coldly bowed her
acknowledgments
,
observing, with an extremely
equivocal
smile, to one of the most assiduous of the
young men
We, who are accustomed to the climate, find
no difficulty in walking on ice, though to you
foreigners it may seem so hazardous.She then
bowed, and walked gravely into the bosom of the
church, without deigning to bestow another
glance to her right hand or her left.
The manner of Cecil, though more chastened
and feminine, and consequently more impressive,
was equally reserved. Like her cousin, she
proceeded
directly to her pew, repulsing the attempts
of those who wished to detain her a moment in
idle discourse, by a lady-like propriety that
checked the advance of all who approached her.
In consequence of the rapid movement of their
companions, Lionel and Polwarth were left among
the crowd of officers who thronged the entrance
of the church. The former moved up within the
colonnade, and passed from group to group,
answering
and making the customary inquiries of
men engaged in the business of war. Here, three
or four veterans were clustered about one of those
heavy columns, that were arranged in
formidable
show on three faces of the building,
discussing
,
with becoming gravity, the political signs
of the times, or the military condition of their
respective
corps. There, three or four unfledged
boys, tricked in all the vain emblems of their
profession, impeded the entrance of the few
women
who appeared, under the pretence of
admiration
for the sex, while they secretly dwelt on
the glitter of their own ornaments. Scattered along
the whole extent of the entrance were other little
knots; some listening to the idle tale of a
professed
jester, some abusing the land in which
it was their fate to serve, and others recounting
the marvels they had witnessed in distant climes,
and in scenes of peril which beggared their utmost
powers of description.
Among such a collection it was not difficult,
however, to find a few whose views were more
elevated, and whose deportment might be
termed
less offensive, either to breeding or principles.
With one of the gentlemen of the latter class
Lionel was held for some time in discourse, in
a distant part of the portico. At length the sounds
of the organ were heard issuing from the church,
and the gay parties began to separate, like men
suddenly reminded why they were collected in that
unusual place. The companion of Major Lincoln
had left him, and he was himself following along
the colonnade, which was now but thinly peopled,
when his ear was saluted by a low voice, singing
in a sort of nasal chant at his very elbow
Wo unto you, Pharisees! for ye love the
uppermost
seats in the Synagogues, and greetings
in the market!
Though Lionel had not heard the voice since
the echoing cry had issued out of the fatal
redoubt
,
he knew its first tones on the instant.
Turning at this singular denunciation, he beheld
Job Pray, erect and immovable as a statue,
in one of the niches, in front of the building,
whence he gave forth his warning voice, like some
oracle speaking to its devotees.
Fellow, will no peril teach you wisdom!
demanded Lionelhow dare you brave our
resentment
so wantonly?
But his questions were unheeded. The young
man, whose features looked pale and emaciated,
as if he had endured recent bodily disease, whose
eye was glazed and vacant, and whose whole
appearance
was more squalid and miserable than
usual, appeared perfectly indifferent to all around
him. Without even altering the riveted gaze of
his unmeaning eye, he continued
Wo unto you! for ye neither go in yourselves;
neither suffer ye them that are entering to go in!
Art deaf, fool! demanded Lionel.
In an instant the eye of the other was turned
on his interrogator, and Major Lincoln felt a
thrill pass through him, when he met the wild
gleam of intelligence that lighted the
countenance
of the changeling, as he continued in the
same ominous tones
Whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca,
shall be in danger of the council; but whosoever
shall say, Thou fool, is in danger of hell-fire.
For a moment Lionel stood as if spell-bound, by
the manner of Job, while he uttered this dreadful
anathema. But the instant the secret influence
ceased, he tapped the lad lightly with his cane,
and bid him descend from the niche.
Job's a prophet, returned the other,
dishonouring
his declaration at the same time, by losing
the singular air of momentary intelligence, in
his usual appearance of mental imbecilityit's
wicked to strike a prophet. The Jews stoned
the prophets, and beat them too.
Do then as I bid youwould you stay here
to be beaten by the soldiers? Go now, away;
4*
after service come to me, and I will furnish
you with a better coat than the garment you
wear.
Did you never read the good book, said Job,
where it tells how you mus'n't take heed for
food nor raiment? Nab says when Job dies he'll
go to heaven, for he gets nothing to wear, and but
little to eat. Kings wear their di'mond crowns
and golden flauntiness; and kings always go
to the dark place.
The lad suddenly ceased, and crouching into
the very bottom of his niche, he began to play
with his fingers, like an infant amused with the
power of exercising its own members. At the same
moment Lionel turned from him, attracted by the
rattling of side arms, and the tread of many feet
behind him. A large party of officers
belonging
to the staff of the army had paused to
listen
to what was passing. Amongst them
Lionel
recognised, at the first glance, two of the
chieftains, who, a little in advance of their
attendants
,
were keenly eyeing the singular being that
was squatted in the niche. Notwithstanding his
surprise, Major Lincoln detected the scowl that
impended over the dark brow of the
commander-in-chief
,
while he bowed low, in deference to his
rank.
Who is this fellow, that dare condemn the
mighty of the earth to such sweeping
perdition
?
demanded Howehis own sovereign
amongst the number!
'Tis an unfortunate being, wanting in
intellect
,
with whom accident has made me
acquainted
,
returned Major Lincoln; who hardly knows
what he utters, and least of all, in whose presence
he has been speaking.
It is to such idle opinions, which are
conceived
by the designing, and circulated by the
ignorant, that we may ascribe the wavering
allegiance
of the colonies, said the British General.
I hope you can answer for the loyalty of your
singular acquaintance, Major Lincoln?
Lionel was about to reply with some little
spirit
,
when the companion of the frowning chief
suddenly exclaimed
By the feats of the feathered Hermes, but this
is the identical Merry Andrew who took the
flying
leap from Copp's, of which I have already
spoken to you.Am I in error, Lincoln? Is not
this the shouting philosopher, whose feelings were
so elevated on the day of Breeds, that he could
not refrain from flying, but who, less fortunate
than Icarus, made his descent on terra firma?
I believe your memory is faithful, sir, said
Lionel, answering the smile of the otherthe
lad is often brought to trouble by his simplicity?
Burgoyne gave a gentle impulse to the arm
he held, as if he thought the wretched being
before
them unworthy of further consideration;
though secretly with a view to prevent an
impolitic
exhibition of the well-known propensity of his
senior to push his notions of military ascendency
to the extreme. Perceiving, by the still
darkening
look of the other, that he hesitated, his ready
lieutenant observed
Poor fellow! his treason was doubly
punished
,
by a flight of some fifty feet down the
declivity
of Copp's, and the mortification of
witnessing
the glorious triumph of his majesty's
troops.To such a wretch we may well afford
forgiveness.
Howe insensibly yielded to the continued
pressure of the other, and his hard features even
relaxed into a scowling smile, as he said, while
turning away
Look to your acquaintance, Major Lincoln,
or bad as his present condition seems, he may
make it worse. Such language cannot be
tolerated
in a place besieged. That is the word, I
believe
the
rebels call their mob a besieging army,
do they not?
They do gather round our winter-quarters,
and claim some such distinction
It must be acknowledged they did well on
Breeds too! The shabby rascals fought like true
men.
Desperately, and with some discretion,
answered
Burgoyne; but it was their fortune to
meet those who fought better, and with greater
skillshall we enter?
The frown was now entirely chased from the
brow of the chief, who said complacently
Come, gentlemen, we are tardy; unless more
industrious we shall not be in season to pray for
the king, much less ourselves.
The whole party advanced a step, when a
bustle
in the rear announced the approach of another
officer of high rank, and the second in command
entered into the colonnade, followed also by the
gentlemen of his family. The instant he
appeared
the self-contented look vanished from the
features
of Howe, who returned his salute with cold
civility, and immediately entered the church.
The quick-witted Burgoyne again interposed,
and as he made way in his turn, he found means
to whisper into the ear of Clinton some
well-imagined
allusion to the events of that very field
which had given birth to the heart-burnings
between
his brother generals, and had caused
the feelings of Howe to be estranged from
the man to whose assistance he owed so much.
Clinton yielded to the subtle influence of the
flattery, and followed his commander into the
house of God, with a bland contentment that he
probably mistook for a feeling much better
suited
to the place and the occasion. As the whole
group of spectators, consisting of aids, secretaries,
and idlers, without, immediately imitated the
example
of the generals, Lionel found himself alone
with the changeling.
From the moment that Job discovered the
vicinity
of the English leader, to that of his
disappearance
,
the lad remained literally immovable. His
eye was fastened on vacancy, his jaw had fallen in
a manner to give a look of utter mental
alienation
to his countenance; and, in short, he
exhibited
the degraded lineaments and figure of a
man, without his animation or intelligence. But
as the last footsteps of the retiring party became
inaudible, the fear which had put to flight the
feeble intellects of the simpleton, slowly left him,
and raising his face, he said, in a low, growling
voice
Let him go out to Prospect; the people will
teach him the law!
Perverse and obstinate simpleton! cried
Lionel, dragging him, without further ceremony,
from the nichewill you persevere in that
foolish
cry until you are whipped from regiment to
regiment for your pains!
You promised Job the grannies shouldn't
beat him any more, and Job promised to run
your ar'n'ds.
Ay! but unless you learn to keep silence,
boy, I shall forget my promise, and give you up to
the anger of all the grannies in town.
Well, said Job, brightening in his look, like a
fool in his exultation, they are half of them dead,
at any rate; Job heard the biggest man among 'em
roar like a ravenous lion, `hurrah for the royal
Irish,' but he never spoke ag'in; though there
wasn't any better rest for Job's gun than a dead
man's shoulder!
Wretch! cried Lionel, recoiling from him
in horror, are your hands then stained with the
blood of M`Fuse!
Job didn't touch him with his hands,
returned
the undisturbed simpletonfor he died like a
dog, where he fell!
Lionel stood a moment in utter confusion
of thought; but hearing the infallible evidence
of the near approach of Polwarth in his tread,
he said, in a hurried manner, and in a voice half
choked by his emotions
Go, fellow, go to Mrs. Lechmere's, as I bid
youtelltell Meriton to look to my fire.
The lad made a motion towards obeying, but
checking himself, he looked up into the face of
the other with a piteous and suffering look, and
said
See, Job's numb with cold! Nab and Job
can't get wood now; the king keeps men to fight
for itlet Job warm his flesh a little; his body is
cold as the dead!
Touched to the heart by the request, and the
helpless aspect of the lad, Lionel made a silent
signal of assent, and turned quickly to meet his
friend. It was not necessary for Polwarth to
speak, in order to apprise Major Lincoln that he
had overheard part of the dialogue between him
and Job. His countenance and attitude
sufficiently
betrayed his knowledge, as well as the
effect it had produced on his feelings. He kept
his eyes on the form of the simpleton, as the lad
shuffled his way along the icy street, with an
expression
that could not easily be mistaken.
Did I not hear the name of poor Dennis?
at length he asked.
'Twas some of the idle boasting of the fool.
But why are you not in the pew?
The fellow is a protg of yours, Major
Lincoln
;
but you may carry forbearance too far,
returned Polwarth, gravely. I come for you, at
the request of a pair of beautiful blue eyes, that
have inquired of each one that has entered the
church, this half-hour, where and why Major
Lincoln has tarried.
Lionel bowed his thanks, and affected to laugh
at the humour of his friend, while they proceeded
together to the pew of Mrs. Lechmere without
further delay.
The painful reflections excited by this
interview
with Job, gradually vanished from the mind
of Lionel, as he yielded to the influence of the
solemn
service of the church. He heard the
difficult
and suppressed breathing of the fair being
who kneeled by his side, while the minister read
those thanksgivings which personally concerned
himself, and no little of earthly gratitude mingled
with the loftier aspirations of the youth, as he
listened. He caught the timid glance of the soft
eye from behind the folds of Cecil's veil, as they
rose, and he took his seat as happy as an ardent
young man might well be fancied, under the
consciousness
of possessing the best affections of a
female so youthful, so lovely, and so pure.
Perhaps the service was not altogether so
consoling
to the feelings of Polwarth. As he
recovered
his solitary foot again, with some little
difficulty
,
he cast a very equivocal glance at his
dismembered person, hemmed aloud, and
finished
with a rattling of his wooden-leg about the
pew, that attracted the eyes of the whole
congregation
,
as if he intended the ears of all present
should bear testimony in whose behalf their
owners
had uttered their extraordinary thanksgivings.
The officiating minister was far too discreet to
vex the attention of his superiors with any prolix
and unwelcome exhibitions of the Christian's
duty
.
The impressive delivery of his text
required
one minute. Four were consumed in the
exordium. The argument was ingeniously
condensed
into ten more; and the peroration of his
essay was happily concluded in four minutes and
a half; leaving him the satisfaction of knowing,
as he was assured by fifty watches, and twice that
number of contented faces, that he had
accomplished
his task by half a minute within the
orthodox
period.
For this exactitude he doubtless had his
reward
.
Among other testimonials in his favour,
when Polwarth shook his hand to thank him for
his kind offices in his own behalf, he found room
for a high compliment to the discourse, concluding
by assuring the flattered divine, that in addition
to its other great merits, it was done in beautiful
time!
CHAPTER IV.
Away; let naught to love displeasing,
My Winifreda, move your care:
Let naught delay the heavenly blessing,
Nor squeamish pride, nor gloomy fear.
Anonymous
.
It
was perhaps fortunate for the tranquillity
of all concerned, that during this period of their
opening confidence, the person of Mrs.
Lechmere
came not between the bright image of
purity and happiness that Cecil presented in
each lineament and action, and the eyes of her
lover. The singular, and somewhat
contradictory
interests that lady had so often betrayed in
the movements of her young kinsman, were
no longer visible to awaken his slumbering
suspicious
.
Even those inexplicable scenes in which
his aunt had so strangely been an actor, were
forgotten
in the engrossing feelings of the hour; or,
if remembered at all, were only suffered to dim
the pleasing pictures of his imagination, as an airy
cloud throws his passing shadows across some
cheerful and lovely landscape. In addition to
those very natural auxiliaries, love and hope,
the cause of Mrs. Lechmere had found a very
powerful assistant, in the bosom of Lionel, through
an accident which had confined her for a long
period, not only to her apartment, but to her
bed.
VOL. II. 5
On that day, when the critical operation was
performed on the person of Major Lincoln, his
aunt was known to have awaited the result in
intense
anxiety. As soon as the favourable
termination
was reported to her, she hastened towards
his room with an unguarded eagerness, which,
added
to the general infirmities of her years, had
nearly
cost the price of her life. Her foot became
entangled
in her train, in ascending the stairs, but
disregarding the warning cry of Agnes Danforth,
with that sort of reckless vehemence that
sometimes
broke through the formal decorum of her
manners, she sustained. in consequence, a fall
that might well have proved fatal to a much
younger woman. The injury she received was
severe
and internal; and the inflammation, though
not high, was sufficiently protracted to arouse the
apprehensions of her attendants. The symptoms
were, however, now abating, and her recovery no
longer a matter of question.
As Lionel heard this from the lips of Cecil,
the reader will not imagine the effect
produced
by the interest his aunt took in his welfare,
was at all lessened by the source whence he
derived
his knowledge. Notwithstanding Cecil
dwelt on such a particular evidence of Mrs.
Lechmere's
attachment to her nephew, with much
earnestness
,
it had not escaped Major Lincoln that
her name was but seldom introduced in their
frequent
conversations, and never, on the part of his
companion, without a guarded delicacy that
appeared
sensitive in the extreme. As their
confidence
,
however, increased with their hourly
communications
,
he began gently to lift the veil which
female reserve had drawn before her inmost
feelings
,
and to read a heart whose purity and truth
would have repaid a more difficult investigation.
When the party returned from the church,
Cecil
and Agnes immediately hastened to the
apartment
of the invalid, leaving Lionel in possession
of the little wainscoted parlour by himself;
Polwarth
having proceeded to his own quarters, with
the assistance of the hunter. The young man
passed a few minutes in pacing the room, musing
deeply on the scene he had witnessed before the
church; now and then casting a vacant look on
the fanciful ornaments of the walls, among
which the armorial bearings of his own name
were so frequent, and in such honourable
situations
.
At length he heard that light footstep
approach
,
whose sound had now become too well
known to be mistaken, and in another instant he
was joined by Miss Dynevor.
Mrs. Lechmere! he said, leading her to a
settee, and placing himself by her side; you
found her better, I trust?
So well that she intends adventuring, this
morning, an interview with your own formidable
self. Indeed, Lionel, you have every reason to
be grateful for the deep interest my
grandmother
takes in your welfare! Ill as she has been,
her inquiries in your behalf were ceaseles; and
I have known her refuse to answer any questions
about her own critical condition, until her
physician
had relieved her anxiety concerning yours.
As Cecil spoke, the tears rushed into her eyes,
and her bloom deepened with the strength of her
feelings.
It is to you, then, that much of my gratitude
is due, returned Lionel; for by permitting
me to blend my lot with yours, I find new
value in her eyes. Have you acquainted Mrs.
Lechmere with the full extent of my presumption?
She knows of our engagement?
Could I do otherwise? while your life was
in peril, I confined the knowledge of my interest
in your situation to my own breast; but when
we were flattered with the hopes of a recovery,
I placed your letter in the hands of my natural
adviser, and have the consolation of knowing that
she approves of mywhat shall I call it, Lionel
would not folly be the better word?
Call it what you will, so you do not disavow it.
I have hitherto forborne inquiring into the views
of Mrs. Lechmere, in tenderness to her situation;
but I may flatter myself, Cecil, that she will not
reject me?
For a single instant the blood rushed
tumultuously
over the fine countenance of Miss Dynevor,
suffusing even her temples and forehead with its
healthful bloom; but, as she cast a reproachful
glance at her lover, it deserted even her cheeks,
while she answered calmly, though with a slight
exhibition of displeasure in her air
It may have been the misfortune of my
grandmother
to view the head of her own family with
too partial eyes; but, if it be so, her reward
should not be distrust. The weakness is, I dare
say, very natural, though not less a weakness.
For the first time, Lionel fully comprehended
the cause of that variable manner with which Cecil
had received his attentions, until interest in his
person had stilled her sensitive feelings.
Without
,
however, betraying the least consciousness of
his intelligence, he answered
Gratitude does not deserve so forbidding a
name as distrust; nor will vanity permit me to
call partiality in my favour a weakness.
The word is a good and a safe term as
applied
to poor human nature, said Cecil, smiling
once more with all her native sweetness, and you
may possibly overlook it when you recollect that
our foibles are sometimes hereditary.
I pardon your unkind suspicion for that
gentle
acknowledgment. But I may now, without
hesitation, apply to your grandmother for her
consent to our immediate union?
You would not have your epithalamium
sung, when, at the next moment, you may be
required
to listen to the dirge of some friend!
The very reason you urge against our
marriage
,
induces me to press it, Cecil. As the
season
advances, this play of war must end. Howe
will either break out of his bounds, and drive the
Amricans from the hills, or seek some other point
for more active warfare. In either case you would
be left in a distracted and divided country, at an
age too tender for your own safety, rather the
guardian than the ward of your helpless parent.
Surely, Cecil, you would not hesitate to accept of
my protection at such a crisis, I had almost dared
to say, in tenderness to yourself, as well as to my
feelings!
Say on, she answered; I admire your
ingenuity
,
if not your argument. In the first place,
however, I do not believe your general can drive
the Americans from their posts so easily; for, by
a very simple process in figures, that even I
understand
,
you may find, if one hill costs so
many hundred men, that the purchase of the
whole would be too dearnay, Lionel, do not
look so grave, I implore you! Surely, surely,
you do not think I would speak idly of a
battle
that had nearly cost your life, andand
my happiness.
Say on, said Lionel, instantly dismissing
the momentary cloud from his brow, and smiling
fondly in her anxious face; I admire your
casuistry
,
and worship your feeling; but can, also,
deny your argument.
Reassured by his voice and manner, after a
5*
moment of extreme agitation, she continued in
the same playful tones as before
But we will suppose all the hills won, and
the American chief, Washington, who, though
nothing but a rebel, is a very respectable one,
driven into the country with his army at his
heels; I trust it is to be done without the
assistance
of the women? Or, should Howe remove
his force, as you intimate, will he not leave the
town behind him? In either case I should remain
quietly where I am; safe in a British garrison,
or safer among my countrymen.
Cecil, you are alike ignorant of the dangers
and of the rude lawlessness of war! Though Howe
should abandon the place, 'twould be only for a
time; believe me, the ministry will never yield the
possession of a town like this, which has so long
dared their power, to men in arms against their
lawful prince.
You have strangely forgotten the last six
months, Lionel, or you would not accuse me of
ignorance of the misery that war can inflict!
A thousand thanks for the kind admission,
dearest Cecil, as well as for the hint, said the
young man, shifting the ground of his argument
with the consistency, as well as the readiness of a
lover; you have owned your sentiments to me,
and would not refuse to avow them again?
Not to one whose self-esteem will induce
him to forget the weakness; but, perhaps, I might
hesitate to do such a silly thing before the world.
I will then put in to your heart, he
continued
,
without regarding the smiling coquetry
she had affected. Believing the best, you will
admit that another battle would be no strange
occurrence?
She raised her anxious looks to his face, but
remained silent.
We both knowat least I know, from sad
experience, that I am far from being invulnerable.
Now, answer me, Cecil, not as a female struggling
to support the false pride of her sex, but as a
woman, generous and full of heart, like yourself
were the events of the last six months to recur,
whether would you live them over, affianced
in secret, or as an acknowledged wife, who
might not blush to show her tenderness to the
world?
It was not until the large drops that glistened at
his words upon the dark lashes of Miss Dynevor,
were shaken from the tremulous fringes that
concealed
her eyes, that she looked up, blushing into
his face, and said
Do you not then think, that I endured enough,
as one who felt herself betrothed, but that closer
ties were necessary to fill the measure of my
suffering
?
I cannot even thank you as I would for
those flattering tears, until my question is plainly
answered.
Is this altogether generous, Lincoln?
Perhaps not in appearance, but sincerely so
in truth. By heaven, Cecil, I would shelter and
protect you from a rude contact with the world,
even as I seek my own happiness!
Miss Dynevor was not only confused, but
distressed
;
she, however, said, in a low voice
You forget, Major Lincoln, that I have one
to consult, without whose approbation I can
promise
nothing.
Will you, then, refer the question to her
wisdom
?
Should Mrs. Lechmere approve of our
immediate union, may I say to her, that you
authorize
me to ask it?
Cecil said nothing; but smiling through her
tears, she permitted Lionel to take her hand in a
manner that a much less sanguine man would
have found no difficulty in construing into an
assent
.
Come, then, he cried; let us hasten to the
apartment of Mrs. Lechmere; did you not say
she expected me? She suffered him to draw her
arm through his own, and lead her from the room.
Notwithstanding the buoyant hopes with which
Lionel conducted his companion through the
passages
of the house, he did not approach the
chamber of Mrs. Lechmere without some
inward
repugnance. It was not possible to forget
entirely all that had so recently passed, or to
still, effectually, those dark suspicions which
had been once awakened within his bosom. His
purpose, however, bore him onward, and a glance
at the trembling being who now absolutely leaned
on him for support, drove every consideration,
in which she did not form a most prominent
part, from his mind.
The enfeebled appearance of the invalid, with
a sudden recollection that she had sustained so
much, in consequence of her anxiety in his own
behalf, so far aided the cause of his aunt, that the
young man not only met her with cordiality, but
with a feeling akin to gratitude.
The indisposition of Mrs. Lechmere had now
continued for several weeks, and her features, aged
and sunken as they were by the general decay
of nature, afforded strong additional testimony of
the severity of her recent illness. Her face,
besides being paler and more emaciated than
usual, had caught that anxious expression which
great and protracted bodily ailing is apt to leave
on the human countenance. Her brow was,
however
,
smooth and satisfied, unless, at moments,
when a slight and involuntary play of the muscles
betrayed that fleeting pains continued, at short
intervals
,
to remind her of her illness. She
received
her visiters with a smile that was softer
and more conciliating than usual, and which
the pallid and care-worn appearance of her
features
rendered deeply impressive.
It is kind, cousin Lionel, she said,
extending
her withered hand to her young kinsman, in
the sick to come thus to visit the well. For after so
long apprehending the worst on your account, I
cannot consent that my trifling injury should be
mentioned before your more serious wounds.
Would, madam, that you had as happily
recovered
from their effects as myself, returned
Lionel, taking her hand and pressing it with great
sincerity. I shall never forget that you owe
your illness to anxiety for me.
Let it pass, sir; it is natural that we should
feel strongly in behalf of those we love. I have
lived to see you well again, and, God willing, I
shall live to see this wicked rebellion crushed.
She paused; and smiling, for a moment, on the
young pair who had approached her couch, she
continued, Cecil hastold me all, Major Lincoln.
No, not all, dear madam, interrupted
Lionel
;
I have something yet to add; and in the
commencement, I will own that I depend
altogether
on your pity and judgment to support my
pretensions.
Pretensions is an injudicious word, cousin
Lionel; where there is a perfect equality of birth,
education, and virtues, and, I may say, considering
the difference in the sexes, of fortune too, it may
amount to claims; but pretensions is an
expresion
too ambiguous. Cecil, my child, go to my
library; in the small, secret drawer of my escritoir,
you will find a paper bearing your name; read it,
my love, and then bring it hither.
She motioned to Lionel to be seated, and
when the door had closed on the retiring form of
Cecil, she resumed the conversation.
As we are about to speak of business, the
confused girl may as well be relieved, Major
Lincoln
.
What is this particular favour that I shall
be required to yield?
Like any other sturdy mendicant, who may
have already partaken largely of your bounty, I
come to beg the immediate gift of the last and
greatest boon you can bestow.
My grandchild. There is no necessity for
useless reserves between us, cousin Lionel, for
you will remember that I too am a Lincoln. Let
us then speak freely, like two friends, who have
met to determine on a matter equally near to the
heart of each.
Such is my earnest wish, Madam.I have
been urging on Miss Dynevor the peril of the
times, and the critical situation of the country, in
both of which I have found the strongest reasons
for our immediate union.
And Cecil?
Has been like herself; kind, but dutiful. She
refers me entirely to your decision, by which
alone she consents to be guided.
Mrs. Lechmere made no immediate reply,
but her features powerfully betrayed the inward
workings of her mind. It certainly was not
displeasure
that caused her to hesitate, her
hollow
eye lighting with a gleam of satisfaction that
could not be mistaken; neither was it
uncertainty
,
for her whole countenance seemed to express
rather the uncontrollable agitation which might
accompany the sudden accomplishment of
long-desired
ends, than any doubt as to their
prudence
.
Gradually her agitation subsided; and
as her feelings became more natural, her hard
eyes filled with tears, and when she spoke, there
was a softness mingled with the tremor of her
voice that Lionel had never before witnessed.
She is a good and a dutiful child, my own,
my obedient Cecil! She will bring you no wealth,
Major Lincoln, that will be esteemed among
your hordes, nor any proud title to add to the
lustre of your honourable name; but she will
bring you what is as good, if not betternay, I
am sure it must be bettera pure and virtuous
heart, that knows no guile!
A thousand and a thousand times more
estimable
in my eyes, my worthy aunt! cried
Lionel, melting before the touch of nature,
which had so effectually softened the harsh
feelings
of Mrs. Lechmere; let her come to my
arms pennyless, and without a name; she will be
no less my wife, no less her own invaluable self.
I spoke only by comparison, Major
Lincoln
;
the child of Colonel Dynevor, and the
granddaughter of the Lord Viscount
Cardonnell
,
can have no cause to blush for her lineage;
neither will the descendant of John Lechmere
be a dowerless bride! When Cecil shall become
Lady Lincoln, she need never wish to conceal
the escutcheon of her own ancestors under the
bloody hand of her husband's.
May heaven long avert the hour when either
of us may be required to use the symbol!
exclaimed
Lionel.
Did I not understand aright! was not your
request for an instant marriage?
Never less in error, my dear Madam; but
you surely do not forget that one lives so
mutually
dear to us, who has every reason to hope
for many years of life; and I trust, too, of
happiness and reason!
Mrs. Lechmere looked wildly at her nephew,
and then passed her hand slowly before her eyes,
from whence she did not withdraw them until an
universal shudder had shaken the whole of her
enfeebled
frame.
You are right, my young cousin, she said,
smiling faintlyI believe my bodily weakness
has impaired my memory.I was indeed
dreaming
of days long since past! You stood before
me in the image of your desolate father, while
Cecil
bore that of her mother; my own long-lost,
but wilful Agnes! Oh! she was my child, my
child! and God has forgotten her faults in mercy
to a mother's prayers!
Lionel recoiled a step before the wild energy
of the invalid's manner, in speechless amazement.
A flush had passed into her pallid cheeks, and as
she concluded, she clasped her hands before
her, and sunk on the pillows which supported
her back. Large insulated tears fell from
her eyes, and slowly moving over her wasted
cheeks, dropped singly upon the counterpane.
Lionel laid his land upon the night-bell, but
an expressive gesture from his aunt prevented
his ringing.
I am well, again, she saidhand me the
restorative by your side.
Mrs. Lechmere drank freely from the glass, and
in another minute her agitation subsided, her
features
settling into their rigid composure, and her
eye resuming its hard expression, as though
nothing had occurred to disturb her usual cold
and worldly look.
You see how much better youth can endure
the ravages of disease than age, by my present
weakness, Major Lincoln, she continued; but
let us return to other, and more agreeable
subjects
you
have not only my consent, but my
wish that you should wed my grandchild. It
a happiness that I have rather hoped
for, than dared to expect, and I will freely
add, 'tis a consummation of my wishes that will
render the evening of my days not only happy,
but blessed!
Then, dearest Madam, why should it be
delayedno one can say what a day may bring
forth at such a time as this, and the moment
of bustle and action is not the hour to register
the marriage vows.
After musing a moment, Mrs. Lechmere
replied
We have a good and holy custom in this
religious
province, of choosing the day which the
Lord has set apart for his own exclusive
worship
,
as that on which to enter into the
honourable
state of matrimony. Choose, then,
between
this or the next Sabbath for your nuptials.
Whatever might be the ardour of the young
man, he was a little surprised at the
shortness
of the former period; but the pride of his
sex would not admit of any hesitation.
Let it be this day, if Miss Dynevor can be
brought freely to consent.
Here then she comes, to tell you, that at my
request, she does. Cecil, my own sweet child,
I have promised Major Lincoln that you will
become
his wife this day.
Miss Dynevor, who advanced into the
centre
of the room, before she heard the purport of
this speech, stopped short, and stood like a
beautiful
statue, expressing astonishment and dismay.
Her colour went and came with alarming
quickness
,
and the paper fell from her trembling hands
to her feet, which appeared riveted to the floor.
To-day! she repeated, in a voice barely
audibledid you say to-day, my
grandmother
?
Even to-day, my child.
VOL. II. 6
Why this reluctance, this alarm, Cecil? said
Lionel, approaching, and leading her gently
to a seat. You know the peril of the times
you have condescended to own your sentiments
consider; the winter is breaking, and the first thaw
can lead to events which may entirely alter our
situation.
All these may have weight in your eyes,
Major Lincoln, interrupted Mrs. Lechmere, in
a voice whose marked solemnity drew the
attention
of her hearers; but I have other and deeper
motives. Have I not already proved the dangers
and the evils of delay! Ye are young, and ye are
virtuous; why should ye not be happy? Cecil,
if you love and revere me, as I think you do,
you will become his wife this day.
Let me have time to think, dearest
grandmother
.
The tie is so new and so solemn!
Major
Lincolndear Lionel, you are not wont to be
ungenerous; I throw myself on your kindness!
Lionel did not speak, and Mrs. Lechmere
calmly answered
'Tis not at his, but at my request that you
will comply.
Miss Dynevor rose from her seat by the side of
Lionel, with an air of offended delicacy, and said,
with a mournful smile, to her lover
Illness has rendered my good mother timid
and weakwill you excuse my desire to be alone
with her.
I leave you, Cecil, he said, but if you
asscribe
my silence to any other motive than
tenderness
to your feelings, you are unjust both to
yourself
and me.
She expressed her gratitude only in her looks,
and he immediately withdrew, to await the result
of their conversation in his own apartment. The
half-hour that Lionel passed in his chamber
seemed half a year, but at the expiration of
that short period of time, Meriton came to
announce
that Mrs. Lechmere desired his presence
again in her room.
The first glance of her eye assured Major
Lincoln
that his cause had triumphed. His aunt
had sunk back on her pillows, with her
countenance
set in a calculating and rigid expression,
which indicated a satisfaction so selfish that it
almost induced the young man to regret she
had not failed. But when his eyes met the
tearful and timid glances of the blushing Cecil,
he felt, that provided she could be his without
violence to her feelings, he cared but little at
whose instigation she had consented.
If I am to read my fate by your goodness, I
know I may hope, he said, advancing to her
sideif in my own deserts, I am left to despair.
Perhaps 'twas foolish, Lincoln, she said,
smiling through her tears, and frankly placing
her hand in his, to hesitate about a few days,
when I feel ready to devote my life to your
happiness
.
It is the wish of my grandmother that I
place myself under your protection.
Then this evening unites us for ever?
There is no obligation on your gallantry that
it should positively take place this very evening, if
any, or the least difficulties present.
But none do nor can, interrupted Lionel.
Happily the marriage forms of the colony are
simple, and we enjoy the consent of all who have
any right to interfere.
Go, then, my children, and complete your
brief arrangements, said Mrs. Lechmere; 'tis
a solemn knot that ye tie! it must, it will be
happy!
Lionel pressed the hand of his intended bride,
and withdrew, and Cecil throwing herself into the
arms of her grandmother, gave vent to her
feelings in a burst of tears. Mrs. Lechmere did
not repulse her child; on the contrary, she
pressed
her once or twice to her heart, but still an
observant
spectator might have seen that her looks
betrayed more of worldly pride, than of those
natural
emotions which such a scene ought to have
excited.
CHAPTER V.
Come, friar Francis be brief; only to the plain form of
marriage.
Much Ado About Nothing
.
Major Lincoln
had justly said, the laws
regulating
marriages in the Massachusetts, which were
adapted to the infant state of the country, threw
but few impediments in the way of the indissoluble
connexion. Cecil had, however, been educated in
the bosom of the English church, and she clung
to its forms and ceremonies with an affection that
may easily be accounted for in their solemnity
and beauty. Notwithstanding the colonists often
chose the weekly festival for their bridals, the
rage of reform had excluded the altar from most
of their temples, and it was not usual with them
to celebrate their nuptials in the places of
public
worship. But there appeared so much of
unreasonable
haste, and so little of due preparation
in her own case, that Miss Dynevor, anxious to
give all solemnity to an act to whose importance
she was sensibly alive, expressed her desire to
pronounce her vows at that altar where she had
so long been used to worship, and under that
roof where she had already, since the rising of
the sun, poured out the thanksgivings of her pure
6*
spirit in behalf of the man who was so soon to
become
her husband.
As Mrs. Lechmere had declared that the
agitation
of the day, and her feeble condition must
unavoidably
prevent her witnessing the ceremony,
there existed no sufficient reason for not indulging
the request of her grandchild, notwithstanding it
was not in strict accordance with the customs of
the place. But being married at the altar, and
being married in public, were not similar duties,
and in order to effect the one and avoid the
other, it was necessary to postpone the
ceremony
until a late hour, and to clothe the whole in
a cloak of mystery, that the otherwise
unembarrassed
state of the parties would not have required.
Miss Dynevor made no other confidant than
her cousin. Her feelings being altogether
elevated
above the ordinarily idle considerations
which are induced by time and preparations on
such an occasion, her brief arrangements were
soon ended, and she awaited the appointed
moment
without alarm, if not without emotion.
Lionel had much more to perform. He
knew that the least intimation of such a scene
would collect a curious and a disagreeable
crowd around and in the church, and he therefore
determined that his plans should be arranged in
silence, and managed secretly. In order to
prevent
a surprise, Meriton was sent to the
clergyman
,
requesting him to appoint an hour in the
evening when he could give an interview to Major
Lincoln. He was answered, that at any moment
after nine o'clock Dr. Liturgy would be
released
from the duties of the day, and in readiness to
receive him. There was no alternative; and ten
was the time mentioned to Cecil when she was
requested
to meet him before the altar. Major
Lincoln
distrusted a little the discretion of Polwarth,
and he contented himself with merely telling his
friend that he was to be married that evening, and
that he must be careful to repair to
Tremont-street
in order to give away the bride;
appointing
an hour sufficiently early for all the subsequent
movements. His groom and his valet had their
respective and separate orders, and long before
the important moment he had every thing
arranged
,
as he believed, beyond the possibility of a
disappointment
.
Perhaps there was something a little
romantic
,
if not diseased in the mind of Lionel, that
caused him to derive a secret pleasure from
the hidden movements he contemplated. He
was certainly not entirely free from a touch of
that melancholy and morbid humour which has
been mentioned as the characteristic of his race,
nor did he always feel the less happy because he
was a little miserable. However, either by his
activity of intellect, or that excellent training in
life he had undergone, by being required to act
early for himself, he had so far succeeded in
quelling
the evil spirit within him, as to render its
influence
quite imperceptible to others, and nearly
so to himself. It had, in fine, left him what we
have endeavoured to represent him in these pages,
not a man without faults, but certainly one of
many high and generous virtues.
As the day drew to a close, the small family
party in Tremont-street collected in their usual
manner to partake of the evening repast, which
was common throughout the colonies at that
period
.
Cecil was pale, and at times a slight
tremor
was perceptible in the little hand which
did the offices of the table; but there was a
forced calmness seated in her humid eyes
that betokened the resolution she had
summoned
to her assistance, in order to comply with
the wishes of her grandmother. Agnes
Danforth
was silent and observant, though an
occasional
look, of more than usual meaning,
betrayed
what she thought of the mystery and
suddenness of the approaching nuptials. It would
seem, however, that the importance of the step
she was about to take, had served to raise the
bride above the little affectations of her sex; for
she spoke of the preparations like one who owned
her interest in their completion, and who even
dreaded that something might yet occur to mar
them.
If I were superstitious, and had faith in
omens, Lincoln, she said, the hour and the
weather might well intimidate me from taking
this step. See, the wind already blows across
the endless wastes of the ocean, and the snow is
driving through the streets in whirlwinds!
It is not yet too late to countermand my orders,
Cecil, he said, regarding her anxiously; I
have made all my movements so like a great
commander, that it is as easy to retrograde as to
advance.
Would you then retreat before one so little
formidable as I? she returned, smiling.
You surely understand me as wishing only to
change the place of our marriage. I dread exposing
you and our kind cousin to the tempest, which, as
you say, after sweeping over the ocean so long,
appears
rejoiced to find land on which to expend its
fury.
I have not misconstrued your meaning,
Lionel
,
nor must you be mistaken in mine. I will
become your wife to-night, and cheerfully too;
for what reason can I have to doubt you now,
more than formerly! But my vows must be
offered
at the altar.
Agnes perceiving that her cousin spoke with a
suppressed emotion that made utterance difficult,
gaily interrupted her
And as for the snow, you know little of
Boston
girls, if you think an icicle has any terrors for
them. I vow, Cecil, I do think you and I have
been guilty, when children, of coasting in a
hand-sled
,
down the side of Beacon, in a worse flurry
than this.
We were guilty of many mad and silly things
at ten, that might not grace twenty, Agnes.
Lord, how like a matron she speaks already!
interrupted the other, throwing up her eyes and
clasping her hands in affected admiration;
nothing
short of the church will satisfy so discreet a
dame, Major Lincoln! so dismiss your cares on her
account, and begin to enumerate the cloaks and
over-coats necessary to your own preservation.
Lionel made a lively reply, when a dialogue of
some spirit ensued between him and Agnes, to
which even Cecil listened with a beguiled ear.
When the evening had advanced, Polwarth made
his appearance, suitably attired, and with a face
that was sufficiently knowing and important for
the occasion. The presence of the captain
reminded
Lionel of the lateness of the hour, and,
without delay, he hastened to communicate his
plans to his friend.
At a few minutes before ten, Polwarth was to
accompany the ladies in a covered sleigh to the
chapel, which was not a stone's throw from their
residence, where the bridegroom was to be in
readiness
to receive them, with the divine.
Referring
the captain to Meriton for further instructions,
and without waiting to hear the other express his
amazement at the singularity of the plan, Major
Lincoln said a few words of tender encouragement
to Cecil, looked at his watch, and throwing his
cloak around him, took his hat, and departed.
We shall leave Polwarth endeavouring to
extract
the meaning of all these mysterious
movements
,
from the wilful and amused Agnes, (Cecil
having retired also,) and accompany the
bridegroom
in his progress towards the residence of the
divine.
Major Lincoln found the streets entirely
deserted
.
The night was not dark, for a full moon was
wading among the volumes of clouds, which drove
before the tempest in dark and threatening masses
that contrasted singularly and wildly to the light
covering of the hills and buildings of the town.
Occasionally the gusts of the wind would lift
eddying wreaths of fine snow from some roof,
and whole squares were wrapped in mist as the
frozen vapour whistled by. At times, the gale
howled among the chimneys and turrets, in a
steady
,
sullen roaring, and there were again moments
when the element appeared hushed, as if its fury
were expended, and winter, having worked its
might, was yielding to the steady, but insensible
advances of spring. There was something in the
season and the hour peculiarly in consonance with
the excited temperament of the young bridegroom.
Even the solitude of the streets, and the hollow
rushing of the winds, the fleeting and dim light of
the moon, which afforded passing glimpses of
sunrounding
objects and then was hid behind a dark
veil of shifting vapour, contributed to his
pleasure
.
He made his way through the snow, with
that species of stern joy, to which all are
indebted
,
at times, for moments of wild and pleasing
self-abandonment. His thoughts vacillated
between
the purpose of the hour, and the unlooked
for coincidence of circumstances that had clothed
it in a dress of such romantic mystery. Once or
twice a painful and dark thought, connected with
the secret of Mrs. Lechmere's life, found its way
among his more pleasing visions, but it was
quickly chased from his mind by the image of her
who awaited his movements in such confiding
faith, and with such secure and dependent
affection
.
As the residence of Dr. Liturgy was on the
North-end, which was then one of the fashionable
quarters of the town, the distance required that
Lionel should be diligent, in order to be punctual
to his appointment. Young, active, and full of
hope, he passed along the unequal pavements with
great rapidity, and had the satisfaction of
penceiving
by his watch, when admitted to the
presence
of the clergyman, that his speed had even
outstripped the proverbial fleetness of time itself.
The reverend gentleman was in his study,
consoling
himself for the arduous duties of the day,
with the comforts of a large easy-chair, a warm fire,
and a pitcher filled with a mixture of cider and
ginger
,
together with other articles that would have
done credit to the knowledge of Polwarth in spices.
His full and decorous wig was replaced by a
velvet cap, his shoes were unbuckled, and his
heels released from confinement. In short, all his
arrangements were those of a man who, having
endured a day of labour, was resolved to prove
the enjoyments of an evening of rest. His pipe,
though filled, and on the little table by his side,
was not lighted, in compliment to the guest he
expected at that hour As he was slightly
acquainted
with Major Lincoln, no introduction
was necessary, and the two gentlemen were soon
seated; the one endeavouring to overcome the
embarrassment
he felt on revealing his singular
errand
,
and the other waiting, in no little curiosity,
to learn the reason why a member of parliament,
and the heir of ten thousand a year, should
come abroad on such an unpropitious night.
At length Lionel succeeded in making the
astonished priest understand his wishes, and
paused
to hear the expected approbation of his
proposal
.
Dr. Liturgy had listened with the most
profound
attention, as if to catch some clue to
explain
the mystery of the extraordinary
proceeding
,
and when the young man concluded, he
unconsciously lighted his pipe, and began to
throw out large clouds of smoke, like a man
who felt there was a design to abridge his
pleasures
,
and who was consequently determined to
make the most of his time.
Married! To be married in church! and
after the night lecture! he muttered in a low
voice between his long drawn puffs'tis my
dutycertainlyMajor Lincolnto marry my
parishioners
In the present instance, as I know my request
to be irregular, sir, interrupted the impatient
Lionel, I will make it your interest also.
While speaking he took a well-filled purse from
his pocket, and with an air of much delicacy
laid a small pile of gold by the side of the
silver
spectacle-case of the divine, as if to show
him the difference in the value of the two metals.
Dr. Liturgy bowed his acknowledgments, and
insensibly changed the stream of smoke to the
opposite corner of his month, so as to leave the
view of the glittering boon unobstructed. At the
same time he raised the heel of one shoe, and
threw an anxious glance at the curtained window,
to inquire into the state of the weather.
Could not the ceremony be performed at the
house of Mrs. Lechmere? he asked; Miss
Dynevor is a tender child, and I fear the cold air
of the chapel might do her no service!
It is her wish to go to the altar, and you are
sensible it is not my part to question her decision
in such a matter.
'Tis a pious inclination; though I trust she
knows the distinction between the spiritual and
the temporal church. The laws of the colonies
are too loose on the subject of marriages, Major
Lincoln; culpably and dangerously loose!
But, as it is not in our power to alter, my
good sir, will you permit me to profit by them;
imperfect as they are?
Undeniablyit is part of my office to
christen
,
to marry, and to bury; a duty which I
often say, covers the beginning, the middle, and
the end of existencebut permit me to help you
to a little of my beverage, Major Lincolnwe
call it `Samson,' in Boston; you will find the
`Danite' a warm companion for a February night
in this climate.
The mixture is not inaptly named, sir, said
Lionel, after wetting his lips, if strength be the
quality most considered!
Ah! you have him from the lap of a Delilah;
but it is unbecoming in one of my cloth to
meddle
with aught of the harlot.
He laughed at his own wit, and made a more
spirituous than spiritual addition to his own glass,
while he continued
We divide it into `Samson with his hair off,'
and `Samson with his hair on;' and I believe
myself the most orthodox in preferring the man
of strength, in his native comeliness. I pledge
you, Major Lincoln; may the middle of your
days be as happy as the charming young lady
you are about to espouse may well render them;
and your end, sir, that of a good churchman, and
a faithful subject.
Lionel, who considered this compliment as an
indication of his success, now rose, and said a few
words on the subject of their meeting in the chapel.
The divine, who manifestly possessed no great
VOL. II. 7
relish for the duty, made sundry slight
objections
to the whole proceeding, which were,
however, soon overcome by the arguments of
the bridegroom. At length every difficulty was
happily adjusted, save one, and that the epicurean
doctor stoutly declared to be a serious objection
to acting in the matter. The church fires were
suffered to go down, and his sexton had been
taken from the chapel that very evening, with
every symptom on him of the terrible pestilence
which then raged in the place, adding, by its
danger
,
to the horrors and the privations of the siege.
A clear case of the small pox, I do assure you,
Major Lincoln, he continued, and contracted,
without doubt, from some emissaries sent into the
town for that purpose, by the wicked devices of the
rebels.
I have heard that each party accuses the
other of resorting to these unjustifiable means of
annoyance, returned Lionel; but as I know
our own leader to be above such baseness, I will
not suspect any other man of it without proof.
Too charitable by half, sirmuch too
charitable
!
But let the disease come whence it will,
I fear my sexton will prove its victim.
I will take the charge on myself of having
the fires renewed, said Lionel; the embers
must yet be in the stoves, and we have still an
hour of time before us.
As the clergyman was much too conscientious
to retain possession of the gold without fully
entitling
himself to the ownership, he had long before
determined to comply, notwithstanding the secret
yearnings of his flesh. Their plans were now soon
arranged, and Lionel, after receiving the key of
the chapel, took his leave for a time.
When Major Lincoln found himself in the street
again, he walked for some distance in the
direction
of the chapel, anxiously looking along the
deserted way, in order to discover an
unemployed
soldier, who might serve to perform the
menial offices of the absent sexton. He
proceeded
for some distance without success, for
every thing human seemed housed, even the
number of lights in the windows beginning to
decrease in a manner which denoted that the
usual hour of rest had arrived. He had paused in
the entrance of the dock-square, uncertain where
to apply for an assistant, when he caught a
glimpse of the figure of a man, crouching under
the walls of the old turreted ware-house, so
often
mentioned. Without hesitating an instant,
he approached the spot, from which the figure
neither moved, nor did it indeed betray any other
evidence of a consciousness of his proximity.
Notwithstanding the dimness of the moon, there
was light enough to detect the extreme misery
of the object before him. His tattered and thin
attire sufficiently bespoke the motive of the
stranger
for seeking a shelter from the cutting winds
behind an angle of the wall, while his physical
wants were betrayed by the eager manner in
which he gnawed at a bone that might well
have been rejected from the mess of the
meanest
private, notwithstanding the extreme
scarcity
that prevailed in the garrison. Lionel
forgot
for a moment his present object, at this
exhibition
of human suffering, and with a kind voice
he addressed the wretched being.
You have a cold spot to eat your supper in,
my friend, he said; and it would seem, too, but
a scanty meal?
Without ceasing to masticate his miserable
nutriment
,
or even raising his eyes, the other said,
in a growling voice
The king could shut up the harbor, and keep
out the ships; but he hasn't the might to drive
cold weather from Boston, in the month of
March!
As I live, Job Pray! Come with me, boy, and
I will give you a better meal, and a warmer place
to enjoy it inbut first tell me; can you procure
a lantern and a light from your mother?
You can't go in the ware'us' to-night,
returned
the lad, positively.
Is there no place at hand, then, where such
things might be purchased?
They keep them there, said Job, pointing
sullenly to a low building on the opposite side of
the square, through one of the windows of which
a faint light was glimmering.
Then take this money and go buy them for
me, without delay.
Job hesitated with ill-concealed reluctance.
Go, fellow, I have instant need of them, and
you can keep the change for your reward.
The young man no longer betrayed any
indisposition
to go, but answered, with great
promptitude
for one of his imbecile mind
Job will go, if you will let him buy Nab some
meat with the change?
Certainly, buy what you will with it; and
furthermore
,
I promise you that neither your mother
nor yourself shall want again for food or
clothing
.
Job's a-hungry, said the simpleton; but
they say hunger don't come as craving upon a
young stomach as upon an old one. Do you
think the king knows what it is to be a-cold and
hungry?
I know not, boybut I know full well that
if one suffering like you were before him, his
heart would yearn to relieve him. Go, go, and
buy yourself food too, if they have it?
In a very few minutes Lionel saw the
simpleton
issuing from the house to which he had run
at his bidding, with the desired lantern.
Did you get any food, said Lionel, motioning
to Job to precede him with the lightI trust
you did not entirely forget yourself in your haste
to serve me?
Job hopes he didn't catch the pestilence,
returned
the lad, eating at the same time
voraciously
of a small roll of bread.
Catch what? what is it you hope you did not
catch?
The pestilencethey are full of the foul
disorder
in that house.
Do you mean the small-pox, boy?
Yes; some call it small-pox, and some call it
the foul disorder, and other some the
pestilence
.
The king can keep out the trade, but
he can't keep out the cold and the pestilence
from Bostonbut when the people get the town
back, they'll know what to do with itthey'll
send it all to the pest-housen!
I hope I have not exposed you unwittingly to
danger, Jobit would have been better had I
gone myself, for I was innoculated for the terrible
disease in my infancy.
Job, who, in expressing his sense of the danger,
had exhausted the stores of his feeble mind on the
subject, made no reply, but continued walking
through the square, until they reached its
termination
,
when he turned, and inquired which way
he was to go.
To the church, said Lionel, and swiftly, lad.
As they entered Corn-hill, they encountered
the fury of the wind, when Major Lincoln bowing
his head, and gathering his cloak about him,
followed
the light which flitted along the pavement
in his front. Shut out in a manner from the world
by this covering, his thoughts returned to their
former channel, and in a few moments he forgot
7*
where he was, or who he was following. He
was soon awakened from his abstraction by
perceiving
that it was necessary for him to ascend
a few steps, when supposing he had reached the
place of destination, he raised his head, and
unthinkingly
followed his conductor into the tower
of a large edifice. Immediately perceiving his
mistake, by the difference of the architecture
from that of the King's chapel, he reproved the
lad for his folly, and demanded why he had
brought him thither.
This is what you call a church, said Job,
though I call it a meetin'us'It's no wonder you
don't know itfor what the people built for
a temple, the king has turned into a stable!
A stable! exclaimed Lionel. Perceiving a
strong smell of horses in the place, he
advanced
and threw open the inner door, when,
to his amazement, he perceived that he stood
in an area fitted for the exercises of the
cavalry
.
There was no mistaking the place, nor its
uses. The naked galleries, and many of the
original
ornaments were standing, but the
accommodations
below were destroyed, and in their
places the floor had been covered with earth, for
horses and their riders to practise in the cavesson.
The abominations of the place even now
offended
his senses as he stood on that spot where he
remembered so often to have seen the grave and
pious colonists assemble, in crowds, to worship.
Seizing the lantern from Job, he hurried out of
the building with a disgust that even the
unobservant
simpleton had no difficulty in discovering.
On reaching the street his eyes fell upon the lights,
and on the silent dignity of Province-house, and he
was compelled to recollect, that this wanton
violation
of the feelings of the colonists, had been
practised
directly under the windows of the royal
governor
.
Fools, fools! he muttered bitterly; when
ye should have struck like men, ye have
trifled
as children; and ye have forgotten your
manhood, and even your God, to indulge your
besotted spleen!
And now these very horses are starving
for want of hay, as a judgment upon them!
said Job, who shuffled his way industriously at
the other's side.They had better have gone
to meetin' themselves, and heard the
expounding
,
than to set dumb beasts a rioting in a place
that the Lord used to visit so often!
Tell me, boy, of what other act of folly and
madness has the army been guilty?
What! hav'n't you heard of the old North!
They've made oven-wood of the grandest
temple
in the Bay! If they dared, they'd lay their
ungodly hands on old Funnel itself!
Lionel made no reply. He had heard
that the distresses of the garrison, heightened
as they were by the ceaseless activity of the
Americans, had compelled them to convert many
houses, as well as the church in question, into
fuel. But he saw in the act nothing more than the
usual recourse of a common military exigency. It
was free from that reckless contempt of a
people's
feelings, which was exhibited in the
prostitution
of the ancient walls of the sister edifice,
which was known throughout New-England,
with a species of veneration, as the old South.
He continued his way gloomily along the silent
streets, until he reached the more favoured
temple, in which the ritual of the English
church was observed, and whose roof was
rendered
doubly sacred, in the eyes of the garrison,
by the accidental circumstance of bearing the
title of their earthly monarch.
CHAPTER VI.
Thou art too like the spirit of Banquo; down!
Macbeth
.
Major Lincoln
found the King's Chapel
differing
in every particular from the venerable, but
prostituted building he had just quitted. As he
entered, the light of his lantern played over the
rich scarlet covering of many a pew, and glanced
upon the glittering ornaments of the polished
organ
,
which now slumbered in as chilled a silence,
as the dead which lay in such multitudes within
and without the massive walls. The laboured
columns
,
with their slender shafts and fretted
capitals
,
threw shapeless shadows across the dim
background
,
peopling the galleries and ceiling with
imaginary phantoms of thin air. As this slight
delusion passed away, he became sensible of the
change in the temperature. The warmth was
not yet dissipated which had been maintained
during
the different services of the day; for
notwithstanding
the wants of the town and garrison,
the favoured temple, where the representative
of the sovereign was wont to worship, knew
not the ordinary privations of the place. Job
was directed to supply the dying embers of the
stoves with fresh fuel, and as the simpleton well
knew where to find the stores of the church, his
office was performed with an alacrity that was not
a little increased by his own sufferings.
When the bustle of preparation had subsided,
Lionel drew a chair from the chancel, while Job
crouched by the side of the quivering iron he had
heated, in that attitude he was wont to assume,
and which so touchingly expressed the secret
consciousness
he felt of his own inferiority. As the
grateful warmth diffused itself over the
half-naked
frame of the simpleton, his head sunk
upon his bosom, and he was fast falling into
a slumber, like a worried hound that had at
length found ease and shelter. A more active
mind would have wished to learn the reasons
that could induce his companion to seek such
an asylum at that unseasonable hour. But
Job was a stranger to curiosity; nor did the
occasional glimmerings of his mind often
extend
beyond those holy precepts which had
been taught him with such care, before
disease
had sapped his faculties, or those popular
principles of the time, that formed so essential
a portion of the thoughts of every
New-Englandman
.
Not so with Major Lincoln. His watch told
him that many weary minutes must elapse
before
he could expect to receive his bride, and
he disposed himself to wait with as much
patience
as comported with five-and-twenty, and
the circumstances. In a short time the stillness
of the chapel was restored, interrupted only by the
passing gusts of the wind without, and the dull
roaring of the furnace by whose side Job
slumbered
in a state of happy oblivion.
Lionel endeavoured to still his truant thoughts,
and bring them in training for the solemn
ceremony
in which he was soon to be an actor.
Finding
the task too difficult, he arose, and
approaching
a window, looked outupon the solitude, and the
whirlwinds of snow that drifted through the streets,
eagerly listening for those sounds of approach
which his reason told him he ought not yet to
expect. Again he seated himself, and turned
his eyes inquiringly about him, with a sort of
inward
apprehension that some one lay
concealed
,
in the surrounding gloom, with a secret
design
to mar his approaching happiness. There
was so much of wild and feverish romance in the
incidents of the day, that he found it difficult, at
moments, to credit their reality, and had recourse
to hasty glances at the altar, his attire, and even
his insensible companion, to remove the delusion
from his mind. Again he looked upward at the
unsteady and huge shadows which wavered along
the ceiling and the walls, and his former
apprehensions
of some hidden evil were revived
with a vividness that amounted nearly to a
presentiment
.
So uneasy did he become at length,
under this impression, that he walked along the
more distant aisles, scrupulously looking into the
dark pews, and throwing a scrutinizing glance
behind each column, and was rewarded for
his trouble, by hearing the hollow echoes of
his own footsteps.
In returning from this round he approached
the stove, and yielded to a strong desire of
listening
to the voice of even Job, in a moment of such
morbid excitement. Touching the simpleton
lightly with his foot, the other awoke with that
readiness which denoted the sudden and
disturbed
nature of his ordinary rest.
You are unusually dull to-night, Job, said
Lionel, endeavouring to hush his uneasiness in
affected pleasantry, or you would inquire the
reason why I pay my visit to the chruch at this
extraordinary hour?
Boston folks love their meetin'us's,
returned
the obtuse simpleton.
Ay! but they love their beds, too, fellow;
and one-half of them are now enjoying what you
seem to covet so much.
Job loves to eat, and to be warm!
And to sleep too, if one may judge by your
drowsiness.
Yes, sleep is sweet; Job don't feel
a-hungered
when he's sleeping.
Lionel remained silent, for several moments,
under a keen perception of the suffering
exhibited
in the touching helplessness, which
marked
the manner of the other, before he
continued
But I expect to be joined, soon, by the
clergyman, and some ladies, and captain
Polwarth
.
Job likes captain Polwarthhe keeps a
grand sight of provisions!
Enough of this! can you think of nothing
but your stomach, boy?
God made hunger, said Job, gloomily,
and he made food, too; but the king keeps
it all for his rake-hellies!
Well, listen, and be attentive to what I tell
you.One of the ladies who will come here, is
Miss Dynevor; you know Miss Dynevor, Job?
the beautiful Miss Dynevor!
The charms of Cecil had not, however, made
their wonted impression on the dull eye of the
idiot, who still regarded the speaker with his
customary air of apathy.
Surely, Job, you know Miss Dynevor!
repeated
Lionel, with an irritability that, at any
other time, he would have been the first to
smile atshe has often given you money and
clothes.
Yes; Ma'am Lechmere is her grandam!
This was certainly one of the least
recommendations
his mistress possessed, in the eyes
of Lionel, who paused a moment, with inward
vexation, before he added
Let who will be her relatives, she is this night
to become my wife. You will remain and witness
the ceremony, and then you will extinguish the
lights, and return the key of the church to Dr.
Liturgy. In the morning come to me for your
reward.
The changeling arose, with an air of singular
importance, and answered
To be sure. Major Lincoln is to be
married
,
and he asks Job to the wedding! Now,
Nab may preach her sarmons about pride and
flaunty feelings as much as she will; but blood
is blood, and flesh is flesh, for all her sayings!
Struck by the expression of wild meaning that
gleamed in the eyes of the simpleton, Major
Lincoln
demanded an explanation of his ambiguous
language. But ere Job had leisure to reply,
though his vacant look again denoted that his
thoughts were already contracting themselves
within their usually narrow limits, a sudden noise
drew the attention of both to the entrance
of the chapel. The door opened in the next
instant, and the figure of the divine, powdered
with drifted snow, and encased in various
defences
against the cold, was seen, moving with
a becoming gravity, through the principal aisle.
Lionel hastened to receive him, and to conduct
him to the seat he had just occupied himself.
When Dr. Liturgy had uncloaked, and
appeared
in his robes of office, the benevolence of his
smile, and the whole expression of his
countenance
,
denoted that he was satisfied with the
condition
in which he found the preparations.
There is no reason why a church should not
be as comfortable as a man's library, Major
Lincoln
,
he said, hitching his seat a little nearer to
the stove. It is a puritanical and a
dissenting
idea, that religion has any thing forbidding
or gloomy in its nature; and wherefore should
we assemble amid pains and inconvenience to
discharge its sacred offices.
Quite true, sir, returned Lionel, looking
anxiously through one of the windowsI have
not yet heard the hour of ten strike, though
my watch tells me it is time!
The weather renders the public clocks very
irregular. There are so many unavoidable evils
to which flesh is heir, that we should endeavour
to be happy on all occasionsindeed it is a
duty
It's not in the natur of sin to make fallen
man happy, said a low, growling voice from
behind the stove.
Ha! what! did you speak, Major Lincoln
a very singular sentiment for a bridegroom!
muttered the divine.
'Tis that weak young man, whom I have
brought hither to assist with the fires, repeating
some of the lore of his mother; nothing else,
sir.
By this time Dr. Liturgy had caught a glimpse
of the crouching Job, and comprehending the
interruption
,
he fell back in his chair, smiling
superciliously
,
as he continued
I know the lad, sir; I should know him.
He is learned in the texts, and somewhat given
to disputation in matters of religion. 'Tis a pity
the little intellect he has, had not been better
managed in his infancy; but they have helped
to crush his feeble mind with their subtleties,
VOL. II: 3
WeI mean we of the established church
often
style him the Boston Calvinha, ha, ha!
Old Cotton was not his equal in subtilty! but
speaking of the establishment, do you not fancy
that one of the consequences of this rebellion
will be to extend its benefits to the colonies,
and that we may look forward to the period
when the true church shall possess its
inheritance
in these religious provinces?
Oh, most certainly, said Lionel, again
walking
anxiously to the window; would to God
they had come!
The divine, with whom weddings were matters
of too frequent occurrence to awaken his
sympathies
,
understood the impatient bridegroom
literally, and replied accordingly.
I am glad to hear you say it, Major Lincoln,
and I hope when the act of amnesty shall be
passed
,
to find your vote on the side of such a
condition
.
At this instant Lionel caught a glimpse of the
well-known sleigh, moving slowly along the
deserted
street, and uttering a cry of pleasure, he
rushed to the door to receive his bride. Dr.
Liturgy finished his sentence to himself, and
rising from his comfortable position, he took
the light and entered the chancel. The
disposition
of the candles having been previously made,
when they were lighted, his book opened, his
robes adjusted, and his features settled into a
suitable
degree of solemnity, he stood, waiting with
becoming dignity the approach of those over
whom he was to pronounce the nuptial
benediction
.
Job placed himself within the shadows
of the building, and stood regarding the
attitude
and imposing aspect of the priest, with
a species of childish awe.
Then came a group, emerging from the
obscurity
of the distant part of the church, and moving
slowly toward the altar. Cecil was in front, leaning
on that arm which Lionel had given her, as much
for support, as through courtesy. She had
removed
her outer and warmer garments in the
vestibule
of the sacred edifice, and now appeared,
attired
in a manner as well suited to the
suddenness
and privacy, as to the importance of the
ceremony. A mantle of satin, trimmed with
delicate
furs, fell carelessly from her shoulders, partly
concealing by its folds the exquisite
proportions
of her slender form. Beneath was a
vestment
of the same rich material, cut, after the
fashions of that period, in a manner to give the
exact outlines of the bust. Across the stomacher
were deep rows of fine lace, and wide borders of
the same valuable texture followed the retiring
edges of her robe, leaving the costly dress within
partly exposed to the eye. But the beauty and
simplicity of her attire (it was simple for that
day) was lost, or, rather, it served to adorn,
unnoticed
,
the melancholy beauty of her countenance.
As they approached the expecting priest,
Cecil
threw, by a gentle movement, her mantle on
the rails of the chancel, and accompanied Lionel,
with a firmer tread than before, to the foot of the
altar. Her cheeks were pale; but it was rather
with a compelled resolution than dread, while her
eyes were full of tenderness and thought: Of the
two devotees of Hymen, she exhibited, if not the
most composure, certainly the most singleness of
purpose and intentness on the duty before them;
for while the looks of Lionel were stealing
uneasily
about the building, as if he expected some
hidden object to start up out of the darkness,
her's were riveted on the priest in sweet and
earnest
attention.
They paused in their alloted places; and after
a moment was allowed for Agnes and Polwarth,
who alone followed, to enter the chancel, the low
but deep tones of the minister were heard in the
solemn stillness of the place.
Dr. Liturgy had borrowed a suitable degree of
inspiration from the dreariness of the hour, and
the solitude of the building where he was
required
to discharge his sacred functions. As he
delivered the opening exhortation of the service,
he made long and frequent pauses between the
members of the sentences, giving to each
injunction
a distinct and impressive emphasis. But when
he came to those closing words
If any man can show just cause why they may
not be lawfully joined together let him now speak,
or else, hereafter, for ever hold his peace
.
He lifted his voice, and raised his eyes to the
more distant parts of the chapel, as though he
addressed a multitude in the gloom. The faces
of all present involuntarily followed the
direction
of his gaze, and a moment of deep
expectation
,
which can only be explained by the
singularly wild character of the scene, succeeded
the reverberation of his tones. At that moment,
when each had taken breath, and all were again
turning to the altar, a huge shadow rose upon
the gallery, and extended itself along the ceiling,
until its gigantic proportions were seen hovering,
like an evil spectre, nearly above them.
The clergyman suspended the half-uttered
sentence
.
Cecil grasped the arm of Lionel
convulsively
,
while a shudder passed through her frame,
that seemed about to shake it to dissolution.
The shadowy image then slowly withdrew,
not without, however, throwing out a fantastic
gesture, with an arm which stretched itself across
the vaulted roof, and down the walls as if about
to clutch its victims beneath.
If any man can show just cause why they may
not be lawfully joined together, let him now speak,
or else, hereafter, for ever hold his peace
, repeated
the priest aloud, as if he would summon the
universe
at the challenge.
Again the shadow rose, presenting this time
the strong and huge lineaments of a human
face, which it was not difficult, at such a
moment
,
to fancy possessed even expression and
life. Its strongly marked features seemed to
work with powerful emotion, and the lips
moved
as if the airy being was speaking to
unearthly
ears. Next came two arms, raised above
the gazing group, with clasped hands, as in the
act of benediction, after which the whole
vanished
,
leaving the ceiling in its own dull white,
and the building still as the graves which
surrounded
it.
Once more the excited minister uttered the
summons; and again every eye was drawn, by
a secret impulse, to a spot which seemed to
possess the form without the substance of a
human
being. But the shadow was seen no more.
After waiting several moments in vain, Dr.
Liturgy
proceeded, with a voice in which a growing
tremor
was very perceptible, but no further
interruption
was experienced to the end of the service.
Cecil pronounced her vows, and plighted her
troth in tones of holy emotion, while Lionel,
who was prepared for some strange calamity,
went through the service to the end with a
forced calmness. They were married; and when
the blessing was uttered, not a sound nor a
whisper
was heard in the party. Silently they all
turned away from the spot, and prepared to leave
the place. Cecil stood passively, and permitted
Lionel to wrap her form in the folds of her
mantle
with tender care, and when she would have
smiled her thanks for the attention, she merely
8*
raised her anxious eyes to the ceiling, with an
expression that could not be mistaken. Even
Polwarth was mute; and Agnes forgot to offer
those congratulations and good-wishes with which
her heart had so recently been swelling.
The clergyman muttered a few words of
caution
to Job concerning the candles and the fire,
and hurried after the retiring party with a
quickness
of step that he was willing to ascribe to the
lateness of the hour, and with a total disregard
to the safety of the edifice; leaving the chapel
to the possession of the ill-gifted, but undisturbed
son of Abigail Pray.
CHAPTER VII.
Forbear to judge, for we are sinners all;
Close up his eyes, and draw the curtain close;
And let us all to meditation.
King Henry Vi.
The
bridal party entered their little vehicle,
silent and thoughtful; the voice of Polwarth
being alone audible as he gave a few low and
hurried orders to the groom who was in waiting.
Dr. Liturgy approached for a moment, and made
his compliments, when the sleigh darted away
from before the building, as swiftly as if the horse
that drew it partook of the secret uneasiness of
those it held. The movements of the divine,
though less rapid, were equally diligent, and in
less than a minute the winds whistled, and clouds
of snow were driven through a street, which
every thing possessing life appeared once more
to have abandoned.
The instant Polwarth had discharged his load,
at the door of Mrs. Lechmere, he muttered
something of happiness and to-morrow, which
his friend did not understand, and dashed through
the gate of the court-yard, at the same mad rate
that he had driven from the church. On
entering
the house, Agnes repaired to the room
of her aunt, to report that the marriage knot
was tied, while Lionel led his silent bride into
the empty parlour.
Cecil stood, fixed and motionless as a
statue
,
while her husband removed her cloak and
mantle; her cheeks pale, her eyes riveted on the
floor, and her whole attitude and manner
exhibiting
the intensity of thought which had been
created by the scene in which she had just been
an actor. When he had relieved her light form
from the load of garments in which it had been
enveloped by his care, he impelled her gently
to a seat by his side, on the settee, and for the
first time since she had uttered the final vow at
the altar, she spoke
Was it a fearful omen! she whispered, as
he folded her to his heart, or was it no more
than a horrid fancy!
'Twas nothing, love'twas a shadowthat
of Job Pray, who was with me to light the fires.
Nonono, said Cecil, speaking with the
rapidity of high excitement, and in tones that
gathered strength as she proceededThose
were never the unmeaning features of the
miserable
simpleton! Know, you, Lincoln, that in the
haughty, the terrific outlines of those dreadful
lineaments on the wall, I fancied a
resemblance
to the profile of our great uncle, your
father's predecessor in the titleDark Sir Lionel,
as he was called!
It was easy to fancy any thing, at such a time,
and under such circumstances. Do not cloud
the happiness of our bridal by these gloomy
fancies?
Am I gloomy or superstitious by habit,
Lionel
?
she asked, with a deprecating tenderness
in her voice, that touched his inmost heart
but it came at such a moment, and in such a
shape, that I should be more than woman not to
tremble at its terrible import!
What is it you dread, Cecil? Are we not
married; lawfully, solemnly united? the bride
shuddered; but perceiving her unwilling, or
unable
to answer, he continuedbeyond the power
of man to sever; and with the consent, nay, by
the earnest wish, the command of the only being
who can have a right to express a wish, or have
an opinion on the subject?
I believethat is I think, it is all as you say,
Lionel, returned Cecil, still looking about her
with a vacant and distressed air that curdled
his blood; yesyes, we are certainly married;
and Oh! how ardently do I implore Him who
sees and governs all things, that our union may
be blessed! but
But what, Cecil? will you let a thing of
naughta shadow affect you in this manner?
'Twas a shadow, as you say, Lincoln; but
where was the substance!
Cecil, my sensible, my good, my pious Cecil,
why do your faculties slumber in this
unaccountable
apathy! Ask your own excellent reason:
can there be a shade where nothing obstructs
the light?
I know not. I cannot reasonI have not
reason. All things are possible to Him whose
will is law, and whose slightest wish shakes the
universe. There was a shadow, a dark, a
speaking
,
and a terrible shadow; but who can say
where was the reality?
I had almost answered, with the phantom,
only in your own sensitive imagination, love.
But arouse your slumbering powers, Cecil, and
reflect how possible it was for some curious
idler of the garrison to have watched my
movements
,
and to have secreted himself in the chapel;
perhaps from wanton mischiefperhaps without
motive of any kind.
He then chose an awful moment in which to
act his gambols!
It may have been one whose knowledge was
just equal to giving a theatrical effect to his silly
deception. But are we to be cheated of our
happiness by such weak devices; or to be
miserable
because Boston contains a fool!
I may be weak, and silly, and even
impious
in this terror, Lincoln, she said, turning
her softened looks upon his anxious face, and
attempting to smile; but it is assailing a
woman
in a point where she is most sensitive.
You know that I have no reserve with you,
now. Marriage with us is the tie that `binds all
charities in one,' and at the moment when the
heart is full of its own security, is it not
dreadful
to have such mysterious presages, be they
true, or be they false, answering to the awful
appeal of the church!
Nor is the tie less binding, less important, or
less dear, my own Cecil, to us. Believe me,
whatever the pride of manhood may say, of
high destinies, and glorious deeds, the same
affections are deeply seated in our nature, and
must be soothed by those we love, and not by
those who contribute to our vanity. Why,
then, permit this chill to blight your best
affections
in their budding?
There was so much that was soothing to the
anxiety of a bride, in his sentiments, and so much
of tender interest in his manner, that he at length
succeeded, in a great degree, in luring Cecil
from her feverish apprehensions. As he spoke,
a mantling bloom diffused itself over her cold
and pallid cheeks, and when he had done, her
eyes lighted with the glow of a woman's
confidence
,
and were turned on his own in bright, but
blushing pleasure. She repeated his word `chill,'
with an emphasis and a smile that could not be
misconstrued, and in a few minutes he entirely
succeeded
in quelling the uneasy presentiments that
had gained a momentary ascendency over her
clear and excellent faculties.
But notwithstanding Major Lincoln reasoned
so well, and with so much success, against the
infirmity of his bride, he was by no means
equal to maintain as just an argument with
himself. The morbid sensibility of his mind
had been awakened in a most alarming
manner
by the occurrences of the evening, though
his warm interest in the happiness of Cecil had
enabled him to smother them, so long as he
witnessed the extent and nature of her
apprehensions
.
But, exactly in the proportion as he
persuaded her into forgetfulness of the past, his
recollections became more vivid and keen;
and, notwithstanding his art, he might not have
been able to conceal the workings of his troubled
thoughts from his companion, had not Agnes
appeared, and announced the desire of Mrs.
Lechmere to receive the bride and bridegroom
in her sick chamber.
Come, Lincoln, said his lovely companion,
rising at the summons, we have been selfish
in forgetting how strongly my grandmother
sympathizes
in our good or evil fortunes. We should
have discharged this duty without waiting to be
reminded of it.
Without making any other reply than a fond
pressure of the hand he held, Lionel drew her
arm through his own, and followed Agnes into
the little hall which conducted to the upper part
of the dwelling.
You know the way, Major Lincoln, said
Miss Danforth; and should you not, my lady
bride can show you. I must go and cast
a worldly eye on the little banquet I have
ordered
,
but which I fear will be labour thrown
away, since captain Polwarth has disdained to
exhibit his prowess at the board. Truly, Major
Lincoln, I marvel that a man of so much
substance
as your friend, should be frightened from
his stomach by a shadow!
Cecil even laughed, and in those sweet
feminine
tones that are infectious, at the humour
of her cousin; but the dark and anxious
expression
that gathered round the brow of her husband
as suddenly checked her mirth.
Let us ascend, Lincoln, she said, instantly,
and leave mad Agnes to her household cares,
and her folly.
Ay, go, cried the other, turning away
towards
the supper-roomeating and drinking is
not etherial enough for your elevated happiness;
would I had a repast worthy of such sentimental
enjoyment! Let me seedew drops and lovers
tears, in equal quantities, sweetened by Cupid's
smiles, with a dish of sighs, drawn by
moon-light
,
for piquancy, as Polwarth would say,
would flavour a bowl to their tastes. The
dewdrops
might be difficult to procure, at this
inclement
season, and in such a night; but if sighs
and tears would serve alone, poor Boston is just
now rich enough in materials!
Lionel, and his half-blushing, half-smiling
companion
,
heard the dying sounds of her voice, as
she entered the distant apartment, expressing, by
its tones, the mingled pleasantry and spleen
of its mistress, and in the next instant they
forgot both Agnes and her humour, as they
found themselves in the presence of Mrs.
Lechmere
.
The first glance of his eye at their
expecting
relative, brought a painful throb to the
heart of Major Lincoln. Mrs. Lechmere had
caused herself to be raised in her bed, in which
she was seated nearly upright, supported by
pillows. Her wrinkled and emaciated cheeks
were flushed with an unnatural colour, that
contrasted
too violently with the marks which age
and strong passions had impressed, with their
indelible fingers, on the surrounding wreck of
those haughty features, which had once been
distinguished
for great, if not attractive beauty. Her
hard eyes had lost their ordinary expression of
worldly care, in a brightness which caused them
rather to glare than beam, with flashes of unbridled
satisfaction that could no longer be repressed.
In short, her whole appearance brought a
startling
conviction to the mind of the young man,
that whatever might have been the ardour of his
own feelings in espousing her grand-child, he
had at length realized the fondest desires of a
being so worldly, so designing, and, as he was
now made keenly to remember, of one, also, who
he had much reason to apprehend, was so guilty.
The invalid did not seem to think a
concealment
of her exultation any longer necessary, for
stretching out her arms, she called to her child,
in a voice raised above its natural tones, and
which was dissonant and harsh from a sort of
unholy triumph
Come to my arms, my pride, my hope, my
dutiful, my deserving daughter! Come and
receive
a parent's blessing; that blessing which
you so much deserve!
Even Cecil, warm and consoling as was the
language of her grand-mother, hesitated an
instant
VOL. II. 9
at the unnatural voice in which the
summons
was uttered, and advanced to meet her
embrace with a manner less warm than was
usual to her own ardent and unsuspecting nature.
This secret restraint existed, however, but for a
moment; for when she felt the encircling arms
of Mrs. Lechmere pressing her warmly to her
aged bosom, she looked up into the face of her
grandmother, as if to thank her for so much
affection
,
by her own guileless smiles and tears.
Here, then, Major Lincoln, you possess
my greatest, I had almost said my only
treasure
!
added Mrs. Lechmereshe is a good,
a gentle, and dutiful child; and heaven will
bless her for it, as I do. Leaning forward, she
continued, in a less excited voiceKiss me, my
Cecil, my bride, my Lady Lincoln! for by that
loved title I may now call you, as yours, in
the course of nature, it soon will be.
Cecil, greatly shocked at the unguarded
exultation
of her grandmother, gently withdrew
herself from her arms, and with eyes bent to
the floor in shame, and burning cheeks, she
willingly moved aside to allow Lionel to
approach
,
and receive his share of the
congratulations
.
He stooped to bestow the cold and
reluctant
kiss, which the offered cheek of Mrs.
Lechmere invited, and muttered a few
incoherent
words concerning his present happiness, and
the obligation she had conferred.
Notwithstanding
the high and disgusting triumph which had
broken through the usually cold and cautious
manner of the invalid, a powerful and unbidden
touch of nature mingled in her address to the
bridegroom. The fiery and unnatural glow of
her eyes even softened with a tear, as she spoke
Lionel, my nephew, my son, she said
I have endeavoured to receive you in a
manner
worthy of the head of an ancient and
honourable
name; but were you a sovereign prince,
I have now done my last and best in your
favour
!Cherish
herlove herbe more than
husbandbe all of kin to the precious child,
for she merits all! Now is my latest wish
fulfilled
!Now
may I prepare myself for the last
great change, in the quiet of a long and
tranquil
evening to the weary and troublesome day
of life!
Woman! said a tremendous voice in the
back groundthou deceivest thyself!
Who, exclaimed Mrs. Lechmere, raising
her body with a convulsive start, as if about to
leap from the bedwho is it speaks!
'Tis Ireturned the well remembered tones
of Ralph, as he advanced from the door to the
foot of her couch'Tis I, Priscilla Lechmere;
one who knows thy merits and thy doom!
The appalled woman fell back on her pillows,
gasping for breath, the flush of her cheeks
giving place to their former signs of age and
disease, and her eye losing its high exultation
in the glazed look of sudden terror. It would
seem, however, that a single moment of reflection
was sufficient to restore her spirit, and with it, all
her deep resentments. She motioned the
intruder
away, by a violent gesture of the hand,
and after an effort to command her utterance,
she said, in a voice rendered doubly strong by
overwhelming passion
Why am I braved, at such a moment, in
the privacy of my sick chamber! Have that
madman, or impostor, whichever he may be,
removed
from my presence!
She uttered her request to deadened ears.
Lionel
neither moved nor answered. His whole
attention was given to Ralph, across whose
hollow
features a smile of calm indifference
passed
,
which denoted how little he regarded the
threatened violence. Even Cecil, who clung to
the arm of Lionel, with all a woman's
dependance
on him she loved, was unnoticed by the
latter, in the absorbing interest he took in the
sudden
reappearance of one whose singular and
mysterious
character had, long since, raised such hopes
and fears in his own bosom.
Your doors will shortly be open to all who
may choose to visit here, the old man coldly
answered
;
why should I be driven from a dwelling
where heartless crowds shall so soon enter and
depart
at will! Am I not old enough; or do I not
bear enough of the aspect of the grave to become
your companion? Priscilla Lechmere, you have
lived till the bloom of your cheeks has given
place to the colour of the dead; your dimples
have become furrowed and wrinkled lines; and
the beams of your once bright eye, have altered
to the dull look of carebut you have not yet
lived for repentance!
What manner of language is this! cried his
wondering listener, inwardly shrinking before his
steady, but glowing look. Why am I singled
from the world for this persecution? are my sins
past bearing; or am I alone to be reminded that
sooner or later, age and death will come!I
have long known the infirmities of life, and may
truly say that I am prepared for their final
consequences
.
'Tis well, returned the unmoved and
apparently
immoevable intrudertake, then, and
read the solemn decree of thy God; and may
He grant thee firmness to justify so much
confidence
.
As he spoke, he extended, in his withered
hand, an open letter towards Mrs. Lechmere,
which the quick glance of Lionel told him bore
his own name in the superscription.
Notwithstanding
the gross invasion of his rights, the young
man was passive under the detection of this
second
and gross interference of the other in his
most secret matters, watching with eager interest
the effect the strange communication would
produce
on his aunt.
Mrs. Lechmere took the letter from the
stranger
with a sort of charmed submission, which
denoted
how completely his solemn manner had
bent her to his will. The instant her look
fell on the contents, it became fixed and wild.
The note was, however, short, and the
scrutiny
was soon ended. Still she grasped it with
an extended arm, though the vacant expression
of her countenance betrayed that it was held
before
an insensible eye. A moment of silent and
breathless wonder followed. It was succeeded by
a shudder which passed through the whole frame
of the invalid, her limbs shaking violently,
until
the rattling of the folds of the paper was
audible in the most distant corner of the
apartment
.
This bears my name, cried Lionel,
shocked
at her emotions, and taking the paper from
her unresisting hand, and should first have met
my eye.
Aloudaloud, dear Lionel, said a faint but
earnest whisper at his elbow; aloud, I implore
you, aloud!
It was not, perhaps, so much in compliance with
this affecting appeal, in which the whole soul of
Cecil seemed wrapped, as by yielding to the
overwhelming flow of that excitement to which
he had been aroused, that Major Lincoln was
led to conform to her request. In a voice
rendered
9*
desperately calm by his emotions, he
uttered
the fatal contents of the note, in tones so
distinct, that they sounded to his wife, in the
stillness
of the place, like the prophetic warnings of
one from the dead:
The state of the town has prevented that
close attention to the case of Mrs. Lechmere,
which her injuries rendered necessary. An
inward
mortification has taken place, and her
present ease is only the forerunner of her death.
I feel it my duty to say, that though she may
live many hours, it is not improbable that she will
die to-night.
To this short, but terrible annunciation, was
placed the well-known signature of the attending
physician. Here was a sudden change, indeed!
All had thought that the disease had given way,
when it seemed it had been preying insidiously
on the vitals of the sick. Dropping the note,
Lionel exclaimed aloud, in the suddenness of his
surprise
Die to night! This is an unexpected
summons
,
indeed!
The miserable woman, after the first
nerveless
moment of her dismay, turned her looks
anxiously
from face to face, and listened intently to
the words of the note, as they fell from the lips
of Lionel, like one eager to detect the
glimmerings
of hope in the alarmed expression of their
countenances. But the language of her
physician
was too plain, direct, and positive to
be misunderstood or perverted. Its very
coldness
gave it a terrific character of truth.
Do you then credit it? she asked in a voice
whose husky tones betrayed but too plainly her
abject unwillingness to be assured. You!
Lionel
Lincoln, whom I had thought my friend!
Lionel turned away silently from the sad
spectacle of her misery; but Cecil dropped on
her knees at the bed-side, and clasping her
hands, she elevated them, looking like a beautiful
picture of pious hope, as she murmured
He is no friend, dearest grandmother, who
would lay flattery to a parting soul! But there
is a better and a safer dependence than all this
world can offer!
And you, too! cried the devoted woman,
rousing herself with a strength and energy that
would seem to put the professional knowledge
of her medical attendant at defiancedo you
also abandon me! You whom I have watched
in infancy, nursed in suffering, fondled in
happiness
,
ay! and reared in virtueyes, that I can say
boldly in the face of the universe! You, whom
I have brought to this honourable marriage;
would you repay me for all, by black
ingratitude
!
My grandmother! my grandmother! talk
not thus cruelly to your child! But lean on
the rock of ages for support, even as I have
leaned on thee!
Awayawayweak, foolish child!
Excess
of happiness has maddened thee! Come
hither, my son; let us speak of Ravenscliffe,
the proud seat of our ancestors; and of those
days we are yet to pass under its hospitable roofs.
The silly girl thou hast wived would wish to
frighten me!
Lionel shuddered with inward horror while he
listened to the forced and broken intonations of
her voice, as she thus uttered the lingering wishes
of her nature. He turned again from the view,
and, for a moment, buried his face in his hands,
as if to exclude the world and its wickedness,
together, from his sight.
My grandmother, look not so wildly at us!
continued the gasping Cecilyon may have
yet hours, nay, days before you. She
paused
an instant to follow the unsettled and
hopeless
gaze of an eye that gleamed despairingly
on the objects of the room, and then, with a
meek dependence on her own purity, dropping
her face between her hands, she cried aloud in
her agony
My mother's mother! Would that I could
die for thee!
Die! echoed the same dissonant voice as
before, from a throat that already began to
rattle
with the hastened approaches of death
who would die amid the festivities of a
bridal
!Awayleave
me.To thy closet, and thy
knees, if thou wiltbut leave me.
She watched, with bitter resentment, the
retiring
form of Cecil, who obeyed with the
charitable
and pious intention of complying literally with
her grandmother's order, before she added
The girl is not equal to the task I had set
her! All of my race have been weak, but I
my daughtermy husband's niece
What of that niece! said the startling voice
of Ralph, interrupting the diseased wanderings
of her mindthat wife of thy nephewthe
mother of this youth? Speak, woman, while
time and reason are granted thee.
Lionel now advanced to her bed-side, under
an impulse that he could no longer subdue, and
addressed her solemnly
If thou knowest aught of the dreadful
calamity
that has befallen my family, he said,
or in any manner hast been accessary to its
cause, disburthen thy soul, and die in peace.
Sister of my grandfather! nay, more, mother of
my wife! I conjure thee, speakwhat of my
injured mother?
Sister of thy grandfathermother of thy
wife, repeated Mrs. Lechmere, slowly, and in
a manner that sufficiently indicated the
unsettled
state of her thoughtsYes, both are true!
Speak to me, then, of my mother, if you
acknowledge the ties of bloodtell me of her
dark fate?
She is in her gravedeadrottenyes
yesher boasted beauty has been fed upon
by beastly worms! What more would ye have,
mad boy? Would'st wish to see her bones in
their winding-sheet?
The truth! cried Ralph; declare the truth,
and thy own wicked agency in the deed.
Who speaks? repeated Mrs. Lechmere,
dropping her voice from its notes of high
excitement
again, to the tremulous cadency of debility
and age, and looking about her at the same time,
as if a sudden remembrance had crossed her
brain; surely I heard sounds I should know!
Here; look on mefix thy wandering
eye, if it yet has power to see, on me,
cried Ralph, aloud, as though he would
command
her attention at every hazard'tis I
that speaks to thee, Priscilla Lechmere.
What wouldst thou have? My daughter?
she is in her grave! Her child? She is
wedded
to anotherThou art too late! Thou
art too late! Would to God thou hadst asked
her of me in season
The truththe truththe truth!
continued
the old man, in a voice that rung through the
apartment in wild and startling echoesthe
holy and undefiled truth! Give us that, and
naught else.
This singular and solemn appeal awakened
the latest energies of the despairing woman,
whose inmost soul appeared to recoil before
his cries. She made an effort to raise herself
once more, and exclaimed
Who says that I am dying? I am but
seventy! and 'tis only yesterday I was a child
a pure, an uncontaminated child! He lieshe
lies! I have no mortificationI am strong, and
have years to live and repent in.
In the pauses of her utterance, the voice of
the old man was still heard shouting
The truththe truththe holy, undefiled
truth!
Let me rise and look upon the sun, continued
the dying woman. Where are ye all? Cecil,
Lionelmy children, do ye desert me now?
Why do ye darken the room? Give me light
more light!more light! for the sake of all in
heaven and earth, abandon me not to this black
and terrific darkness!
Her aspect had become so hideously despairing,
that the voice of even Ralph was stilled, and she
continued uninterruptedly to shriek out the
ravings
of her soul.
Why talk to such as I of death!My time
has been too short!Give me daysgive me
hoursgive me moments! Cecil, Agnes
Abigail
;
where are yehelp me, or I fall!
She raised herself, by a desperate effort, from
the pillows, and clutched wildly at the empty
air. Meeting the extended hand of Lionel, she
caught it with a dying grasp, gave a ghastly
smile, under the false security it imparted, and
falling backward again, her mortal part settled,
with an universal shudder, into a state of eternal
rest.
As the horrid exclamations of the deceased
ended, so deep a stillness succeeded in the
apartment
,
that the passing gusts of the gale were heard
sighing among the roofs of the town, and might
easily be mistaken, at such a moment, for the
moanings of unembodied spirits over so accursed
an end.
CHAPTER VIII.
I wonder, sir, since wives are monstrous to you,
And that you fly them, as you swear them, lordship,
Yet, you desire to marry.
All's Well that Ends Well
.
Cecil
had left the room of her grandmother,
with the consciousness of sustaining a load of
anguish to which her young experience had
hitherto
left her a stranger. On her knees, and in
the privacy of her closet, she poured out the
aspirations of her pure spirit, in fervent
petitions
to that power, which she who most
needed
its support, had so long braved by the
mockery of respect, and the seemliness of
devotion
.
With her soul elevated by its recent
communion
with her God, and her feelings soothed
even to calmness by the sacred glow that was
shed around them, the youthful bride at length
prepared to resume her post at the bed-side of
her aged relative.
In passing from her own room to that of
Mrs. Lechmere, she heard the busy voice of
Agnes below, together with the sounds of the
preparations that were making to grace her
own hasty bridal, and for a moment she paused
to assure herself that all which had so recently
passed was more than the workings of a
disturbed
fancy. She gazed at the unusual, though
modest ornaments of her attire; shuddered as
she remembered the awful omen of the shadow,
and then came to the dreadful reality with an
overwhelming conviction of its truth. After
laying her hand on the door, she paused with
secret terror, to catch the sounds that might
issue from the chamber of the sick. After
listening
a moment, the bustle below was hushed,
and she, too, heard the whistling of the wind
as its echoes died away among the chimneys and
angles of the building. Encouraged by the
deathlike
stillness of those within her grandmother's
room. Cecil now opened the door, under the
pleasing impression that she should find the
resignation of a Christian, where she had so
lately witnessed the incipient ravings of
despair
.
Her entrance was timid, for she dreaded
to meet the hollow, but glaring eye of the
nameless being who had borne the message of
the physician and of whose mien and language
she retained a confused but fearful recollection.
Her hesitation and her fears, were, however,
alike vain; for the room was silent and
tenantless
.
Casting one wondering look around, in
quest of the form most dear to her, Cecil
advanced
with a light step to the bed, and raising
the coverlid, discovered the fatal truth at a
glance.
The lineaments of Mrs. Lechmere had
already
stiffened, and assumed that cadaverous and
ghastly expression which marks the touch of death.
The parting soul had left the impression of its
agony on her features, exhibiting the wreck
of those passions which caused her, even in
death, to look backward on that world she was
leaving for ever, instead of forward to the
unknown
existence, towards which she was
hurried
.
Perhaps the suddenness and the very
VOL. II. 10
weight of the shock, sustained the cheerless
bride in that moment of trial. She neither
spoke nor moved for more than a minute; but
remained with her eyes riveted on the desolation
of that countenance she had revered from her
infancy
,
with a species of holy awe that was not
entirely
free from horror. Then came the
recollection
of the portentous omens of her wedding,
and with it a dread that the heaviest of her
misfortunes were yet in reserve. She dropped
the covering on the pallid features of the dead,
and quitted the apartment with a hurried step.
The room of Lionel was on the same floor with
that which she had just left, and before she
had time for reflection, her hand was on its
lock. Her brain was bewildered with the rush
of circumstances. For a single instant she
paused with maiden bashfulness, even recoiling
in sensitive shame from the act she was about
to commit, when all her fears, mingled with
glimmerings of the truth, flashed again across
her mind, and she burst into the room, uttering
the name of him she sought, aloud.
The brands of a fallen fire had been
carefully
raked together, and were burning with a
feeble and wavering flame. The room seemed
filled with a cold air, which, as she encountered
it, chilled the delicate person of Cecil; and
flickering
shadows were playing on the walls,
with the uncertain movements imparted by the
unsteady light. But, like the apartment of the
dead, the room was still and empty.
Perceiving
that the door of the little dressing-room was
open, she rushed to its threshold, and the
mystery
of the cold air and the wavering fire was
explained, when she felt the gusts of wind rush
by her from the open door at the foot of the
narrow stairs. If Cecil had ever been required to
explain the feelings which induced her to
descend
,
or the manner in which it was effected,
she would have been unable to comply, for
quick as thought she stood on the threshold of the
outer-door, nearly unconscious of her situation.
The moon was still wading among the driving
clouds, shedding just light enough to make the
spectator sensible of the stillness of the camp and
town. The easterly wind yet howled along the
streets, occasionally lifting whirlwinds of snow,
and wrapping whole squares in its dim wreaths.
But neither man nor beast was visible amid the
dreariness.
The bewildered bride shrunk from the dismal
view, with a keen perception of its wild
consonance
with the death of her grandmother.
In another moment she was again in the room
above, each part of which was examined with
maddening anxiety for the person of her
husband
.
But her powers, excited and unnatural
as they had become, could support her no
longer. She was forced to yield to the
impression
that Lionel had deserted her in the most
trying
moment, and it was not strange that she
coupled the sinister omens of the night with
his mysterious absence. The heart-stricken girl
clasped her hands in anguish, and shrieking the
name of her cousin, sunk on the floor in total
insensibility
.
Agnes was busily and happily employed with
her domestics, in preparing such a display of
the wealth of the Lechmeres as should not
disgrace her cousin in the eyes of her more
wealthy lord and master. The piercing cry,
however, notwithstanding the bustle of hurrying
servants, and the clatter of knives and plates,
penetrated to the supper-room, stilling each
movement
,
and blanching every cheek.
'Tis my name! said Agnes; who is it
calls?
If it was
possible
, returned Meriton, with
a suitable emphasis, that Master Lionel's bride
could
scream so, I should say it was my Lady's
voice!
'Tis Cecil'tis Cecil! cried Agnes,
darting
from the room; O, I fearedI feared these
hasty nuptials!
There was a general rush of the menials
into the chambers, when the fatal truth became
immediately known to the whole family. The
lifeless clay of Mrs. Lechmere was discovered in
its ghastly deformity, and, to all but Agnes, it
afforded a sufficient solution of the situation of
the bride.
More than an hour passed before the
utmost
care of her attendants succeeded in
restoring
Cecil to a state in which questions might
avail any thing. Then her cousin took
advantage
of the temporary absence of her women,
to mention the name of her husband. Cecil
heard her with sudden joy; but looking about
the room wildly, as if seeking him with her eyes,
she pressed her hands upon her heart, and fell
backward in that state of insensibility from which
she had just been roused. No part of this
expressive evidence of her grief was lost on the
other, who left the room the instant her care had
succeeded in bringing the sufferer once more to
her recollection.
Agnes Danforth had never regarded her aunt
with that confiding veneration and love which
purified the affections of the granddaughter of
the deceased. She had always possessed her more
immediate relatives, from whom she derived her
feelings and opinions, nor was she wanting in
sufficient discernment to distinguish the cold and
selfish traits that had so particularly marked
the character of Mrs. Lechmere. She had
therefore
,
consented to mortify her own spirit, and
submit
to the privations and dangers of the siege,
entirely from a disinterested attachment to her
cousin, who, without her presence, would have
found her solitude and situation irksome.
In consequence of this disposition of her mind,
Agnes was more shocked than distressed by the
unexpected
death that had occurred. Perhaps, if her
anxiety had been less roused in behalf of Cecil,
she might have retired to weep over the
departure
of one she had known so long, and of one,
also, that, in the sincerity of her heart, she
believed so little prepared for the mighty change.
As it was, however, she took her way calmly to
to the parlour, where she summoned Meriton to
her presence.
When the valet made his entrance, she
assumed
the appearance of a composure that was far
from her feelings, and desired him to seek his
master
,
with a request he would give Miss Danforth
a short interview, without delay. During the
time Meriton was absent on this errand, Agnes
endeavoured to collect her thoughts for any
emergency.
Minute passed after minute, however, and the
valet did not return. She arose, and stepping
lightly to the door, listened, and thought she
heard his footsteps moving about in the more
distant
parts of the building, with a quickness
that proved he conducted the search in good
faith. At length she heard them nigher, and it
was soon certain he was on his return. Agnes
seated herself as before, and with an air that
seemed as if she expected to receive the master
instead of the man. Meriton, however, returned
alone.
10*
Major Lincoln! she said; you desired
him to meet me here?
The whole countenance of Meriton expressed
his amazement, as he answered
Lord! Miss Agnus; Master Lionel has gone
out! gone out on
such
a night! and what is more
remarkable, he has gone out without his
mourning
;
though the dead of his own blood and
connexions
lies unburied in the house!
Agnes preserved her composure, and gladly
led the valet on in the path his thoughts had
taken, in order to come at the truth, without
betraying
her own apprehensions.
How know you, Mr. Meriton, that your
master
has been so far forgetful of appearances?
As certain, Ma'am, as I know that he wore
his parade uniform this evening when he left the
house the first time; though little did I dream
his honour was going to get married! If he
hasn't gone out in the same dress, where is it?
Besides, Ma'am, his last mourning is under lock,
and here is the key in my pocket.
'Tis singular he should choose such an hour,
as well as the time of his marriage, to absent
himself!
Meriton had long learned to identify all his
interests
with those of his master, and he coloured
highly under the oblique imputation that he
thought was no less cast on Lionel's gallantry,
than on his sense of propriety in general.
Why, Miss Agnus, you will please remember,
Ma'am, he answered, as this wedding hasn't
been at all like an English weddingnor can I
say that it is altogether usual to die in England
as suddenly as Ma'am Lechmere has been
pleased
Perhaps, interrupted Agnes, some
accident
may have happened to him. Surely no
man of common humanity would willingly be
away at such a moment!
The feelings of Meriton now took another
direction
,
and he unhesitatingly adopted the worst
apprehensions of the young lady.
Agnes leaned her forehead on her hand, for a
minute, in deep reflection, before she spoke again.
Then raising her eyes to the valet, she said
Mr. Meriton, know you where captain
Polwarth
sleeps?
Certainly, Ma'am! He's a gentleman as
always
sleeps in his own bed, unless the king's
service
calls him elsewhere. A considerate
gentleman
is captain Polwarth, Ma'am, in respect of
himself!
Miss Danforth bit her lip, and her playful
eye lighted for an instant, with a ray that
banished
its look of sadness; but in another
moment
her features became demure, if not
melancholy
,
and she continued
I believe, then'tis awkward and distressing,
too, but nothing better can be done!
Did you please to give me any orders, Miss
Agnus?
Yes, Meriton; you will go to the lodgings of
captain Polwarth, and tell him Mrs. Lincoln
desires
his immediate presence here, in
Tremont-street
.
My Lady! repeated the amazed valet
why, Miss Agnus, the women says as my Lady
is unconscionable, and does not know what is
doing
,
or who speaks to her! A mournful
wedding
,
Ma'am, for the heir of our house!
Then, tell him, said Agnes, as she arose
to leave the room, that Miss Danforth would
be glad to see him.
Meriton waited no longer than was necessary
to mutter his approbation of this alteration in
the message, when he left the house, with a pace
that was a good deal quickened by his growing
fears on the subject of his master's safety.
Notwithstanding his apprehensions, the valet
was by no means insensible to the severity of the
climate he was in, nor to the peculiar qualities
of that night in which he was so unexpectedly
thrust abroad to encounter its fury. He soon
succeeded, however, in making his way to the
quarters of Polwarth, in the midst of the driving
snow, and in defiance of the cold that chilled his
very bones. Happily for the patience of the worthy
valet, Shearflint, the semi-military attendant of
the captain, was yet up, having just discharged his
nightly duties about the person of his master,
who had not deemed it prudent to seek his
pillow
without proving the consolations of the
trencher. The door was opened at the first
tap of Meriton, and when the other had
expressed
his surprise, by the usual exclamations,
the two attendants adjourned to the sitting-room,
where the embers of a good wood fire were yet
shedding a grateful heat in the apartment.
What a shocking country is this America
for cold, Mr. Shearflint, said Meriton, kicking
the brands together with his boot, and rubbing his
hands over the coalsI doesn't think as our
English cold is at all like it. It's a stronger
and a better cold is ours, but it doesn't cut
one like dull razors, as this here of America.
Shearflint, who fancied himself particularly
liberal
,
and ever made it a point to show his
magnanimity
to his enemies, never speaking of the
colonists without a sort of protecting air, that he
intended should reflect largely on his own
candour
,
briskly replied
This is a new country, Mr. Meriton, and
one shouldn't be over-nice. When one goes
abroad one must learn to put up with difficulties;
especially in the colonies, where it can't be
expected
all things should be as comfortable as we
has 'em at 'ome.
Well, now, I call myself as little particular
in respect of weather, returned Meriton, as any
going. But give me England for climate, if
for nothing else. The water comes down in that
blessed country in good, honest drops, and not in
little frozen bits, which prick one's face like so
many fine needles!
You do look, Mr. Meriton, a little as if you
had been shaking your master's powder-puff
about your own ears. But I was just finishing
the heel-tap of the captain's hot toddy; perhaps
if you was to taste it, 'twould help to thaw out
the idears.
God bless me! Shearflint, said Meriton,
relinquishing his grasp of the tankard, to take
breath after a most vigorous draughtdo you
always stuff his night-cap so thick?
Nonothe captain can tell a mixture by
his nose, and it doesn't do to make partial
alterations
in his glass, returned Shearflint,
giving
the tankard a circular motion to stir its
contents, while he spoke, and swallowing the
trifle that remained, apparently at a gulp;
then as I thinks it a pity that any thing should
be wasted in these distressing times, I generally
drinks what's left, after adding sum'at to the
water
,
just to mellow it down. But what brings you
abroad such a foul night, Mr. Meriton?
Sure enough, my idears wanted thawing, as
you instigated, Shearflint! Here have I been
sent on a message of life and death, and I
was forgetting my errand like a raw boy just
hired from the country!
Something is stirring, then! said the
other, offering a chair, which his companion
received, without any words, while Polwarth's
man took another, with equal composure. I
thought as much, from the captain's hungry
appearance
,
when he came home to night, after
dressing himself with so much care, to take his
supper in Tremont-street.
Something has been stirring, indeed! For
one thing, it is certain, Master Lionel was married
to-night, in the King's Chapel!
Married! echoed the otherwell, thank
heaven, no such unavoidables has befallen us,
though we have been amputrated. I couldn't
live with a married gentleman, no how, Mr.
Meriton. A master in breeches is enough for
me, without one in petticoats to set him on!
That depends altogether on people's
conditions
,
Shearflint, returned Meriton, with a sort
of condescending air of condolence, as though
he pitied the other's poverty.It would be
great folly for a captain of foot, that is nothing
but
a captain of foot, to unite in hymen. But, as
we say at Ravenscliffe and Soho, Cupid will listen
to the siyths of the heir of a Devonshire Baronet,
with fifteen thousand a year.
I never heard any one say it was more than
ten, interrupted the other, with a strong taint of
ill-humour in his manner.
Not more than ten! I can count ten
myself
,
and I am sure there must be some that
I doesn't know of.
Well, if it be twenty, cried Shearflint, rising
and kicking the brands among the ashes, in a
manner
to destroy all the cheerfulness of the little fire
that remained, it wont help you to do your
errand. You should remember that us servants
of poor captains have nobody to help us with our
work, and want our natural rest. What's your
pleasure, Mr. Meriton?
To see your master, Mister Shearflint.
That's impossibility! he's under five blankets,
and I wouldn't lift the thinnest of them for a
month's wages.
Then I shall do it for you, because speak
to him I must. Is he in this room?
Ay, you'll find him somewhere there, among
the bed-clothes, returned Shearflint, throwing
open the door of an adjoining apartment, secretly
hoping Meriton would get his head broke for his
trouble, as he removed himself out of harm's way,
by returning to the fire-place.
Meriton was compelled to give the captain
several rough shakes before he succeeded in
rousing
him, in the least, from his deep slumbers.
Then, indeed, he overheard the sleeper
muttering
A damn foolish business, thathad we made
proper use of our limbs we might have kept
them. You take this man to be your husband
better for worsericher or poorerha! who
are you rolling, dog? have you no regard to
digestion, to shake a man in this manner, just
after eating!
It's I, sirMeriton.
And what the devil do you mean by this
liberty. Mr. I, or Meriton, or whatever you call
yourself!
I am sent for you in a great hurry, sir
awful things have happened to-night up in
Tremont
!
Happened! repeated Polwarth, who by this
time was thoroughly awakeI know, fellow,
that your master is marriedI gave the bride
away myself. I suppose nothing else, that is
particularly extraordinary, has happened.
Oh! Lord, yes, sirmy Lady is in
fainting-fits
,
and master Lionel has gone, God knows
whither, and Madam Lechmere is dead!
Meriton had not concluded, before Polwarth
sprang from his bed in the best manner he
was able, and began to dress himself, by a
sort of instinct, though without any definite
object. By the unfortunate arrangement of
Meriton's intelligence, he supposed the death of
Mrs. Lechmere to be in consequence of some
strange and mysterious separation of the bride
from her husband, and his busy thoughts did not
fail to recall the singular interruption of the
nuptials
,
so often mentioned.
And Miss Danforth! he askedhow does
she bear it?
Like a woman, as she is, and a true lady.
It is no small thing as puts Miss Agnus beside
herself, sir!
No, that it is not! she is much more apt to
drive others mad.
'Twas she, sir, as sent me to desire you to
come up to Tremont-street, without any delay.
The devil it was! Hand me that boot,
my good fellow.One boot, thank God, is
sooner
put on than two! The vest and stock next.
You, Shearflint! where have you got to,
sirrah
!
Bring me my leg, this instant.
As soon as his own man heard this order,
he made his appearance, and as he was much
more conversant with the mystery of his
master's
toilette than Meriton, the captain was
soon equipped for his sudden expedition.
During the time he was dressing, he
continued
to put hasty questions to Meriton,
concerning
the cause of the disturbance in
Tremont-street
,
the answers to which only served
to throw him more upon the ocean of
uncertainty
than ever. The instant he was clad,
he wrapped himself in his cloak, and taking
the arm of the valet, he essayed to find his
way through the tempest to the spot where
he was told Agnes Danforth awaited his
appearance
,
with a chivalry that in another age,
and under different circumstances, would have
made him a hero.
VOL. II. 11
CHAPTER IX.
Proud lineage! now how little thou appearest!
Blair
.
Notwithstanding
the unusual alacrity with
which Polwarth obeyed the unexpected
summons
of the capricious being whose favour
he had so long courted, with so little
apparent
success, he lingered in his steps as he
approached
near enough to the house in
Tremont-street
,
to witness the glancing lights which flitted
before the windows. On the threshold he
stopped
,
and listened to the opening and shutting of
doors, and all those marked, and yet stifled sounds,
which are wont to succeed a visit of the grim
monarch to the dwellings of the sick. His rap was
unanswered, and he was compelled to order
Meriton to show him into the little parlour
where he had so often been a guest, under more
propitious circumstances. Here he found Agnes,
awaiting his appearance with a gravity, if not
sadness of demeanour, that instantly put to flight
certain complimentary effusions with which the
captain had determined to open the interview,
in order to follow up, in the true temper of a
soldier
,
the small advantage he conceived he had
obtained
in the good opinion of his mistress.
Altering
the exulting expression of his features, with
his first glance at the countenance of Miss
Danforth
,
Polwarth paid his compliments in a
manner
better suited to the state of the family, and
desired to know if in any manner he could
contribute
to the comfort or relief.
Death has been among us, captain Polwarth,
said Agnes, and his visit has, indeed, been
sudden
and unexpected. To add to our
embarrassment
,
Major Lincoln is missing!
As she concluded, Agnes fastened her eyes on
the face of the other, as though she would require
an explanation of the unaccountable absence of
the bridegroom.
Lionel Lincoln is not a man to fly, because
death approaches, returned the captain, musing;
and less should I suspect him of deserting, in her
distress, one like the lovely creature he has
married
.
Perhaps he has gone in quest of
medical
aid?
It cannot be. I have gathered from the
broken sentences of Cecil, that he, and some
third person, to me unknown, were last with
my aunt, and must have been present at her
death; for the face was covered. I found the
bride in the room which Lionel has lately
occupied
the
doors open, and with indications
that he and his unknown companion had left the
house by the private stairs, which
communicate
with the western door. As my cousin
speaks but little, all other clue to the
movements
of her husband is lost, unless this
ornament
,
which I found glittering among the
embers
of the fire, may serve for such a purpose. It
is, I believe, a soldier's gorget?
It is, indeed; and it would seem the wearer
has been in some jeopardy, by this bullet-hole
through its centre. By heavens! 'tis that of
M`Fuse!Here is the 18th engraved; and I
know these little marks which the poor fellow
was accustomed to make on it at every battle; for
he never failed to wear the bauble. The last was
the saddest record of them all!
In what manner, then, could it be conveyed
into the apartment of Major Lincoln? Is it
possible
that
In what manner, truly! interrupted
Polwarth
,
rising in his agitation, and beginning to
pace the room, in the best manner his
mutilated
condition would allowPoor Dennis!
that I should find such a relic of thy end, at last!
You did not know Dennis, I believe. He was a
man, fair Agnes, every way adapted by nature
for a soldier. His was the form of Hercules!
The heart of a lion, and the digestion of an
ostrich! But he could not master this cruel lead!
He is dead, poor fellow, he is dead!
Still you find no clue in the gorget by which
to trace the living? demanded Agnes.
Ha! exclaimed Polwarth, startingI
think I begin to see into the mystery! The
fellow who could slay the man with whom he
had eaten and drunk, might easily rob the dead!
You found the gorget near the fire of Major
Lincoln's room, say you fair Agnes?
In the embers, as if cast there for
concealment
,
or dropped in some sudden strait.
I have itI have it, returned Polwarth,
striking his hands together, and speaking through
his teeth'twas that dog who murdered him,
and justice shall now take its swingfool or
no fool, he shall be hung up like jerked beef, to
dry in the winds of heaven!
Of whom speak you, Polwarth, with that
threatening air? inquired Agnes, in a
soothing
voice, of which, like the rest of her sex,
she well knew not only the power, but when to
exercise it.
Of a canting, hypocritical, miscreant, who
is called Job Praya fellow with no more
conscience
than brains, nor any more brains than
honesty. An ungainly villain; who will eat of
your table to day, and put the same knife that
administered to his hunger to your throat
tomorrow
!
It was such a dog that butchered the
glory of Erin!
It must have been in open battle, then,
said Agnes, for though wanting in reason, Job
has been reared in the knowledge of good and
evil. The child must be strongly stamped with
the wrath of God, indeed, for whom some effort
is not made by a Boston mother, to recover his
part in the great atonement!
He, then, is an exception; for surely no
Christian
will join you in the great natural pursuit of
eating at one moment, and turn his fangs on a
comrade at the next.
But what has all this to do with the absent
bridegroom?
It proves that Job Pray has been in his room
since the fire was replenished, or some other
than you would have found the gorget.
It proves a singular association, truly,
between
Major Lincoln and the simpleton, said
Agnes, musing; but still it throws no light on
his disappearance. 'Twas an old man that my
cousin mentioned in her unconnected sentences!
My life on it, fair Agnes, that if Major
Lincoln
has left the house mysteriously to-night, it
is under the guidance of that wretch!I have
known them together in council more than once,
before this.
11*
Then, if he be weak enough to forsake such
a woman as my cousin, at the instigation of a fool,
he is unworthy of another thought!
Agnes coloured as she spoke, and turned the
conversation, with a manner that denoted how
deeply she resented the slight to Cecil.
The peculiar situation of the town, and the
absence
of all her own male relatives, soon induced
Miss Danforth to listen to the reiterated offers
of service from the captain, and finally to
accept
them. Their conference was long and
confidential; nor did Polwarth retire until his
footsteps were assisted by the dull light of the
approaching day. When he left the house to
return to his own quarters, no tidings had been
heard of Lionel, whose intentional absence was
now so certain, that the captain proceeded to
give his orders for the funeral of the deceased,
without any further delay. He had canvassed with
Agnes the propriety of every arrangement so
fully, that he was at no loss how to conduct
himself. It had been determined between them
that the state of the siege, as well as certain
indications of movements which were already
making in the garrison, rendered it inexpedient
to delay the obsequies a moment longer than was
required by the unavoidable preparations.
Accordingly, the Lechmere vault, in the
church-yard
of the `King's Chapel,' was directed to be
opened, and the vain trappings in which the
dead are usually enshrouded, were provided.
The same clergyman who had so lately
pronounced
the nuptial benediction over the child,
was now required to perform the last
melancholy
offices of the church over the parent, and the
invitations to the few friends of the family who
remained in the place were duly issued in suitable
form.
By the time the sun had fallen near the
amphitheatre
of hills, along whose crests were, here
and there, to be seen the works of the
indefatigable
men who held the place in leaguer, the brief
preparations for the interment of the deceased
were completed. The prophetical words of
Ralph were now fulfilled, and, according to the
custom of the province, the doors of one of
its proudest dwellings were thrown open for
all who choose, to enter and depart at will.
The funeral train, though respectable, was far
from extending to that display of solemn
countenances
which Boston in its peace and pride
would not have failed to exhibit on any similar
occasion. A few of the oldest and most
respected
of the inhabitants, who were distantly
connected
by blood, or alliances with the deceased,
attended; but there had been nothing in the cold
and selfish character of Mrs. Lechmere to gather
the poor and dependent in sorrowing groups
around her funeral rites. The passage of the
body, from its late dwelling to the tomb, was
quiet, decent, and impressive, but entirely
without
any demonstrations of grief. Cecil had
buried
herself and her sorrows, together, in the
privacy
of her own room, and none of the more
distant
relatives who had collected, male or female,
appeared to find it at all difficult to restrain their
feelings within the bounds of the most rigid
decorum.
Dr. Liturgy received the body, as usual, on the
threshold of the sacred edifice, and the same
solemn and affecting language was uttered over
the dead, as if she had departed soothed by the
most cheerful visions of an assured faith. As the
service proceeded, the citizens clustered about the
coffin, in deep attention, in admiration of the
unwonted
tremor and solemnity that had crept into
the voice of the priest.
Among this little collection of the inhabitants
of the colony, were interspersed a few men in the
military dress, who, having known the family of
the deceased in more settled times, had not
forgotten
to pay the last tribute to the memory of
one of its dead.
When the short service was ended, the body
was raised on the shoulders of the attendants,
and borne into the yard, to its place of final rest.
At such a funeral, where few mourned, and none
wept, no unnecessary delay would be made in
disposing of the melancholy relicks of mortality.
In a very few moments, the narrow tenement
which contained the festering remains of one
who had so lately harboured such floods of
human
passion, was lowered from the light of day,
and the body was left to moulder by the side of
those which had gone before to the darkness of
the tomb. Perhaps of all who witnessed the
descent
of the coffin, Polwarth alone, through that
chain of sympathies which bound him to the
caprice of Agnes, felt any emotion at all in
consonance with the solemn scene. The
obsequies
of the dead were, like the living
character
of the woman, cold, formal, and artificial.
The sexton and his assistants had hardly
commenced
replacing the stone which covered the
entrance of the vault, when a knot of elderly
men set the example of desertion, by moving
away in a body from the spot. As they picked
their footsteps among the graves, and over the
frozen ground of the church-yard, they
discoursed
idly together, of the fortunes and age of the
woman, of whom they had now taken their leave
for ever. The curse of selfishness appeared even
to have fallen on the warning which so sudden an
end should have given to those who forgot they
tottered on the brink of the grave. They spoke of
the deceased as of one who had failed to awaken
the charities of our nature, and though
several
ventured their conjectures as to the
manner
in which she had disposed of her worldly
possessions, not one remembered to lament
that she had continued no longer, to enjoy
them. From this theme they soon
wandered
to themselves, and the whole party
quitted
the church-yard, joking each other on the
inroads of time, each man attempting to ape
the elastic tread of youth, in order not only
to conceal from his companions the ravages of
age, but with a vain desire to extend the
artifice
so far, if possible, as to deceive himself.
When the seniors of the party withdrew, the
remainder of the spectators did not hesitate to
follow, and in a few minutes Polwarth found
himself standing before the vault, with only two
others of all those who had attended the body.
The captain, who had been at no little expense
of time and trouble to maintain the decencies
which became a near friend of the family of the
deceased, stood a minute longer to permit these
lingering followers to retire also, before he
turned
his own back on the place of the dead. But
perceiving they both maintained their posts,
in silent attention, he raised his eyes, more
curiously
,
to examine who these loiterers might be.
The one nearest to himself was a man whose
dress and air bespoke him to be of no very
exalted rank in life, while the other was a
woman
of even an inferior condition, if an opinion
might be formed from the squalid misery that
was exhibited in her attire. A little fatigued with
the arduous labours of the day, and of the duties
of the unusual office he had assumed, the worthy
captain touched his hat, with studied decorum,
and said
I thank you, good people, for this mark of
respect to the memory of my deceased friend;
but as we have performed all that can now be
done in her behalf, we will retire.
Apparently encouraged by the easy and
courteous
manner of Polwarth, the man
approached
still nigher, and after bowing with much
respect
,
ventured to say
They tell me 'tis the funeral of Madam
Lechmere
that I have witnessed?
They tell you true, sir, returned the captain,
beginning slowly to pick his way towards the
gate; of Mrs. Priscilla, the relict of Mr. John
Lechmerea lady of a creditable descent, and I
think it will not be denied that she has had
honourable
interment!
If it be the lady I suppose, continued the
stranger, she is of an honourable descent
indeed
.
Her maiden name was Lincoln, and she
is aunt to the great Devonshire Baronet of that
family.
How! know you the Lincolns? exclaimed
Polwarth, stopping short, and turning to
examine
the other with a stricter eye. Perceiving,
however, that the stranger was a man of harsh
and peculiarly forbidding features, in the vulgar
dress already mentioned, he mutteredyou
may have heard of them, friend, but I should doubt
whether your intimacy could amount to such
wholesome familiarities as eating and drinking.
Stronger intimacies than that, sir, are
sometimes
brought about between men who were born
to very different fortunes, returned the
stranger
,
with a peculiarly sarcastic and ambiguous
smile, which meant more than met the eye
but all who know the Lincolns, sir, will allow
their claims to distinction. If this lady was one of
them, she had reason to be proud of her blood.
Ay, you are not tainted, I see, with these
revolutionary notions, my friend, returned
Polwarth
;
she was also connected with a very good
sort of a family in this colony, called the
Danforths
you
know the Danforths?
Not at all, sir, I
Not know the Danforths! exclaimed
Polwarth
,
once more stopping to bestow a freer
scrutiny
on his companion. After a short pause,
however
,
he nodded his head, in approbation of his
own conclusions, and addedNo, noI am
wrongI see you could not have known much of
the Danforths!
The stranger appeared quite willing to overlook
the cavalier treatment he received, for he
continued
to attend the difficult footsteps of the
maimed soldier, with the same respectful
deference
as before.
I have no knowledge of the Danforths, it is
true, he answered, but I may boast of some
intimacy with the family of Lincoln.
Would to God, then, cried Polwarth, in a
sort of soliloquy, which escaped him in the fullness
of his heart, you could tell us what has become
of its heir!
The stranger stopped short in his turn, and
exclaimed
Is he not serving with the army of the king,
against this rebellion! Is he not here!
He is here, or he is there, or he is any where;
I tell you he is lost.
He is lost! echoed the other.
Lost! repeated a humble female voice, at
the very elbow of the captain
This singular repetition of his own language,
aroused Polwarth from the abstraction into which
he had suffered himself to fall. In his course from
the vault to the church-yard gate, he had
unconsciously
approached the woman before
mentioned
,
and when he turned at the sounds of her
voice, his eyes fell full upon her anxious
countenance
.
The very first glance was enough to tell
the observant captain, that in the midst of her
poverty and rags, he saw the broken remains of
great female beauty. Her dark and intelligent
eyes, set as they were in a sallow and sunken
eountenance, still retained much of the brightness,
if not of the softness and peace of youth. The
contour of her face was also striking, though she
might be said to resemble one whose loveliness
had long since departed with her innocence. But
the gallantry of Polwarth was proof even against
the unequivocal signs of misery, if not of guilt,
which were so easily to be traced in her
appearance
,
and he respected even the remnants of female
charms which were yet visible amid such a mass
of unseemliness, to regard them with an
unfriendly
eye. Apparently encouraged by the kind look
of the captain, the woman ventured to add
Did I hear aright, sir; said you that Major
Lincoln was lost?
I am afraid, good woman, returned the
captain
,
leaning on the iron-shod stick, with which he
was wont to protect his footsteps along the icy
streets of Bostonthat this siege has, in your
case, proved unusually severe. If I am not
mistaken
in a matter in which I profess to know
much, nature is not supported as nature should be.
You would ask for food, and God forbid that I
should deny a fellow-creature a morsel of that
which constitutes both the seed and the fruits of
life. Here is money.
The muscles of the attenuated countenance of
the woman worked with a sudden convulsive
motion
,
and, for a moment, she glanced her eyes
wistfully towards his silver, but a slight flush
passing
quickly over her pallid features, she
answered
Whatever may be my wants and my
suffering
,
I thank my God that he has not levelled me
with the beggar of the streets. Before that evil
day shall come, may I find a place amongst these
frozen hillocks where we stand. But, I beg
pardon
,
sir, I thought I heard you speak of Major
Lincoln.
I didand what of him? I said he was lost,
and it is true, if that be lost which cannot be
found.
And did Madam Lechmere take her leave
before he was missing? asked the woman,
advancing
a step nearer to Polwarth, in her intense
anxiety to be answered.
Do you think, good woman, that a
gentleman
of Major Lincoln's notion of things, would
disappear after the decease of his relative, and
leave a comparative stranger to fill the office
of principal mourner!
The Lord forgive us all our sins and
wickedness
!
muttered the woman, drawing the shreds
of her tattered cloak about her shivering form,
and hastening silently away into the depths of the
grave-yard. Polwarth regarded her
unceremonious
departure for a moment, in surprise, and
then turning to his remaining companion, he
remarked
That woman is unsettled in her reason, for
the want of wholesome nutriment. It is just as
impossible to retain the powers of the mind, and
neglect the stomach, as it is to expect a truant
boy will make a learned man. By this time
the worthy captain had forgotten whom it was
he addressed, and he continued, in his usual
philosophic strain, children are sent to school
to learn all useful inventions but that of eating;
VOL. II. 12
for to eatthat is to eat with judgment, is as
much of an invention as any other discovery.
Every mouthful a man swallows has to
undergo
four important operations, each of which may
be called a crisis in the human constitution.
Suffer me to help you over this grave,
said the other, officiously offering his assistance.
I thank you, sir, I thank you'tis a sad
commentary
on my words! returned the captain,
with a melancholy smile. The time has been
when I served in the light corps, but your
men in unequal quantities are good for little
else but garrisons! As I was saying, there
is first, the selection; second, mastication; third,
deglutition; and lastly, the digestion.
Quite true, sir, said the stranger, a little
abruptly; thin diet and light meals are best for
the brain.
Thin diet and light meals sir, are good for
nothing but to rear dwarfs and idiots!
returned
the captain, with some heat. I repeat to you,
sir
He was interrupted by the stranger, who
suddenly
smothered a dissertation on the
connexion
between the material and immaterial, by
asking
If the heir of such a family be lost, is there
none to see that he is found again?
Polwarth finding himself thus checked in the
very opening of his theme, stopped again, and
stared the other full in the face for a
moment
,
without making any reply. His kind
feeling
,
however, got the better of his displeasure,
and yielding to the interest he felt in the fate of
Lionel, he answered
I would go all lengths, and incur every hazard
to do him service!
Then, sir, accident has brought those together
who are willing to engage in the same
undertaking
!
I, too, will do my utmost to discover
him! I have heard he has friends in this
province
.
Has he no connexion to whom we may
apply for intelligence?
None nearer than a wife.
A wife! repeated the other, in surpriseis
he then married?
A long pause ensued, during which the
stranger
mused deeply, and Polwarth bestowed a still
more searching scrutiny than ever on his
companion
.
It would appear that the result was not
satisfactory to the captain, for shaking his head, in
no very equivocal manner, he resumed the task of
picking his way among the graves, towards the
gate, with renewed diligence. He was in the
act of seating himself in the pung, when the
stranger again stood at his elbow, and said
If I knew where to find his wife, I would
offer my services to the lady?
Polwarth pointed to the building of which
Cecil
was now the mistress, and answered,
somewhat
superciliously, as he drove away
She is there, my good friend, but your
application
will be useless!
The stranger received the direction in an
understanding
manner, and smiled with satisfied
confidence
,
while he took the opposite route from
that by which the busy equipage of the captain
had already disappeared.
CHAPTER X.
Up Fish-street! down Saint Magnus' corner!
Kill and knock down! Throw them into Thames!
What noise is this I hear? Dare any be so bold to sound
Retreat or parly; when I command them kill?
King Henry IV
.
It
was rarely, indeed, that the equal
minded
Polwarth undertook an adventure with so fell
an intent, as, was the disposition with which he
directed the head of the hunter to be turned
towards
the dock-square. He had long known the
residence of Job Pray, and often in passing from
his lodgings, near the common, into the more
fashionable quarter of the town, the
good-natured
epicure had turned his head to bestow a nod
and a smile on the unsophisticated admirer of his
skill in the culinary art. But now, as the pung
whirled out of Corn-hill into the well-known area,
his eye fell on the low and gloomy walls of the
warehouse with a far less amicable design.
From the time he was apprized of the
disappearance
of his friend, the captain had been
industriously
ruminating on the subject, in a vain
wish to discover any probable reason that might
induce a bridegroom to adopt so hasty, and
apparently
so unjustifiable, a step as the desertion of
his bride, and that, too, under circumstances of
such peculiar distress. But the more he
reasoned
the more he found himself involved in the
labyrinth of perplexity, until he was glad to
seize on the slightest clue which offered, to lead
him from his obscurity. It has already been
seen in what manner he received the
intelligence
conveyed through the gorget of M`Fuse,
and it now remains for us to show with what
commendable ingenuity he improved the hint.
It had always been a matter of surprise to
Polwarth, that a man like Lionel should tolerate
so much of the society of the simpleton, nor had
it escaped his observation that the
communications
between the two were a little concealed
under a shade of mystery. He had overheard
the foolish boast of the lad, the preceding day,
relative
to the death of M`Fuse, and the battered
ornament, in conjunction with the place where it
was found, which accorded so well with his
grovelling
habits, had tended to confirm its truth. The
love of Polwarth for the grenadier was second
only to his attachment for his earlier friend.
The one had avowedly fallen, and he soon
began
to suspect that the other had been
strangely
inveigled from his duty by the agency of this
ill-gifted changeling. To conceive an opinion,
and to become confirmed in its justice, were
results, generally, produced by the same
operation
of the mind, with this disciple of animal
philosophy
.
Whilst he stood near the tomb of the
Lechmeres, in the important character of chief
mourner, he had diligently revolved in his mind
the brief arguments which he found necessary to
this conclusion. The arrangement of his ideas
might boast of the terseness of a syllogism. His
proposition and inference were something as
followsJob murdered M`Fuse; some great
evil has occurred to Lionel; and therefore Job
has been its author.
12 *
It is true, there was a good deal of
intermediate
argument to support this deduction, at which
the captain cast an extremely cursory glance,
but which the reader may easily conceive, if
at all gifted in the way of imagination. It would
require no undue belief of the connexion between
very natural effects and their causes, to show that
Polwarth was not entirely unreasonable in
suspecting
the agency of the simpleton, nor in
harbouring
the deep and bitter resentment that so much
mischief, even though it were sustained from the
hands of a fool, was likely to awaken. Be that
as it may, by the time the pung had reached
the point already mentioned, its rapid motion,
which accelerated the ordinarily quiet
circulation
of his blood, together with the scene through
which he had just passed, and the recollections
which had been crowding on his mind, conspired
to wind up his resolution to a very obstinate
pitch of determination. Of all his schemes,
embracing
,
as they did, compulsion, confession, and
punishment, Job Pray was, of course, destined to
be both the subject and the victim.
The shadows of evening were already thrown
upon the town, and the could had long before driven
the few dealers in meats and vegetables, who
continued
to find daily employment around the
illfurnished
shambles, to their several homes. In
their stead there was only to be seen a meager
and impoverished follower of the camp,
stealing
along the shadows of the building, with her
half-famished child, as they searched among the
offals of the market for some neglected morsel,
to eke out the scanty meal of the night. But
while the common mart presented this appearance
of dullness and want, the lower part of the square
exhibited a very different aspect.
The warehouse was surrounded by a body of
men in uniform, whose disorderly and rapid
movements
proclaimed at once, to the experienced eye
of the captain, that they were engaged in a seene
of lawless violence. Some were rushing furiously
into the building, armed with such weapons as
the streets first offered to their hands, while
others returned, filling the air with their threats
and outcries. A constant current of eager
soldiers
was setting out of the dark passages in the
neighbourhood towards the place, and every
window
of the building was crowded with excited
witnesses, who clung to the walls, apparently
animating
those within by their cheers and applause.
When Polwarth bade Shearflint pull the
reins, he caught the quick, half-formed sentences
that burst from the rioters, and even before he
was able, in the duskiness of the evening, to
discover
the facings of their uniform, his ear
detected
the well-known dialect of the Royal Irish.
The whole truth now broke upon him at once,
and throwing his obese person from the sleigh,
in the best manner he was able, he hobbled into
the throng, with a singular compound of feeling,
which owed its birth to the opposing impulses, of
a thirst for vengeance, and the lingering influence
of his natural kindness. Better men than the
captain
have, however, lost sight of their humanity,
under those fierce sympathies that are awakened in
moments of tumult and violence. By the time he
had forced his person into the large, dark
apartment
that formed the main building, he had, in a
great degree, suffered himself to be worked into a
sternness of purpose which comported very ill
with his intelligence and rank. He even
listened
,
with unaccountable pleasure, to the threats
and denunciations which filled the building;
until
,
he foresaw, from their savage nature, there
was great danger that one half of his object, the
discovery of Lionel, was likely to be frustrated by
their fulfilment. Animated anew by this
impression
,
he threw the rioters from him with prodigious
energy, and succeeded in gaining a position where
he might become a more efficient actor in the fray.
There was still light enough to discover Job
Pray placed in the centre of the warehouse, on
his miserable bed, in an attitude between lying
and sitting. While his bodily condition seemed to
require the former position, his fears had induced
him to attempt the latter. The large, red blotches
which covered his unmeaning countenance, and
his flushed eye-balls, too plainly announced that
the unfortunate young man, in addition to
having
become the object of the wrath of a
lawless
mob, was a prey to the ravages of that foul
disorder which had long before lighted on the town.
Around this squalid subject of poverty and
disease
,
a few of the hardiest of the rioters, chiefly
the surviving grenadiers of the 18th, had
gathered
;
while the less excited, or more timid among
them, practised their means of annoyance at a
greater distance from the malign atmosphere of
the distemper. The bruised and bloody person
of the simpleton manifested how much he had
already suffered from the hands of his
tormentors
,
who happily possessed no very fatal
weapons
,
or the scene would have been much earlier
terminated. Notwithstanding his great bodily
debility
,
and the pressing dangers that beset him
on every side, Job continued to face his assailants,
with a sort of stupid endurance of the pains they
inflicted.
At the sight of this revolting spectacle, the
heart of Polwarth began greatly to relent, and
he endeavoured to make himself heard, in the
clamour of fifty voices. But his presence was
unheeded, for his remonstrances were uttered to
ignorant men, wildly bent on vengeance.
Pul the baist from his rags! cried one
'tis no a human man, but a divil's imp, in the
shape of a fellow cratur!
For such as
him
to murder the flower of the
British army! said anotherhis small-pox is
nothing but a foul invintion of the ould one, to
save him from his daisarrevings!
Would any but a divil invent such a disorder
at all! interrupted a third, who, even in his
anger
,
could not forget his humour. Have a care,
b'ys, he may give it to the whole family the
naat'ral
way, to save the charges of the innoculation!
Have done wid ye'r foolery, Terence,
returned
the first; would ye trifle about death,
and
his
unrevenged! Put a coal into his filth,
b'ys, and burren
it
and him in the same
bonfire
!
A coal! a coal! a brand for the divil's
burning
!
echoed twenty soldiers, eagerly listening,
in the madness of their fury, to the barbarous
advice.
Polwarth again exerted himself, though
unsuccessfully
,
to be heard; nor was it until a dozen
voices proclaimed, in disappointment, that the
house contained neither fire nor fuel, that the
sudden commotion in the least subsided.
Out of the way! out of the way wid ye!
roared one of gigantic mould, whose heavy nature
had, like an overcharged volcano, been slowly
wrought up to the eve of a fearful eruption
Here is fire to destroy a salamander! Be he
divil or be he saint, he has great need of his
prayers!
As he spoke, the fellow levelled a musket, and
another instant would have decided the fate of
Job, who cowered before the danger with
instinctive
dread, had not Polwarth beat up the piece
with his cane, and interposed his body between
them.
Hold your fire, brave grenadier, he said,
warily adopting a middle course between the
language of authority and that of counsel. This
is hasty and unsoldier-like. I knew, and loved
your late commander well; let us obtain the
confessions of the lad before we proceed to
punishment
there
may be others more guilty than
he.
The men regarded the unexpected intruder
with such furious aspects as augured ill of their
deference for his advice and station. Blood
for blood, passed from mouth to mouth, in
low, sullen mutterings, and the short pause which
had succeeded his appearance was already
broken by still less equivocal marks of hostility,
when, happily for Polwarth, he was recognised,
through the twilight, by a veteran of the
grenadiers
,
as one of the former intimates of M`Fuse.
The instant the soldier communicated this
discovery
to his fellows, the growing uproar again
subsided, and the captain was relieved from no
small bodily terror, by hearing his own name
passing among them, coupled with such
amicable
additions as,
his
ould fri'nd! an
offisher
of the light troopshe that the ribbils
massacred of a leg! &c. As soon as this
explanation
was generally understood, his ears were
greeted with a burst from every mouth, of
Hurrah! for captain Pollywarreth!
His
fri'nd! the brave captain Pollywarreth!
Pleased with his success, and secretly gratified
by the commendations that were now freely
lavished
on himself, with characteristic liberality, the
mediator improved the slight advantage he had
obtained, by again addressing them.
I thank you, for your good opinion, my
friends, he added, and must acknowledge it is
entirely mutual. I love the Royal Irish, on
account
of one that I well knew, and greatly
esteemed
,
and who I fear was murdered in defiance of
all the rules of war.
Hear ye that, Dennis? murdered!
Blood for blood! muttered three or four
surly voices at once.
Let us he deliberate, that we may be just,
and just that our vengeance may be awful,
Polwarth
quickly answered, fearful that if the torrent
once more broke loose, it would exceed his
powers
to stay. A true soldier always awaits his
orders; and what regiment in the army can boast
of its discipline, if it be not the 18th! Form
yourselves in a circle around your prisoner, and
listen, while I extract the truth from him. After
that, should he prove guilty, I will consign him
to your tenderest mercy.
The rioters, who only saw, in the delay, a
more methodical execution of their own violent
purpose, received the proposition with another
shout, and the name of Polwarth, pronounced
in all the varieties of their barbarous idioms,
rung loudly through the naked rafters of the
building
,
while they disposed themselves to comply.
The captain, with a wish to gain time to
command his thoughts, required that a light
should be struck, in order, as he said, to study
the workings of the countenance of the accused.
As the night had now gathered about them in
good earnest, the demand was too reasonable for
objection, and with the same headlong eagerness
that they had manifested a few minutes before, to
shed the blood of Job, they turned their attention,
with thoughtless versatility, to effect this
harmless
object. A brand had been brought, for a very
different end, when the plan of burning was
proposed, and it had been cast aside again with
the change of purpose. A few of its sparks were
now collected, and some bundles of oakum, which
lay in a corner of the warehouse, were fired, and
carefully fed in such a manner as to shed a strong
light through every cranny of the gloomy edifice.
By the aid of this fitful glare, the captain
succeeded
,
once more, in marshalling the rioters in
such a manner that no covert injury could be
offered to Job. The whole affair now assumed,
in some measure, the character of a regular
investigation
.
The curiosity of the men without,
overcame
their fears of infection, and they crowded
into the place, in earnest attention, until, in a
very few moments, no other sound was audible
but the difficult and oppressed respiration of
their victim. When all the other noises had
ceased
,
and Polwarth, perceived, by the eager and
savage countenances, athwart which the bright
glare of the burning hemp was gleaming, that
delay might yet be dangerous, he proceeded, at
once, in his inquiries.
You may see, Job Pray, by the manner in
which you are surrounded, he said, that
judgment
has at length overtaken you, and that your
only hope for mercy lies in your truth. Answer,
then, to such questions as I shall put, and keep the
fear of God before your eyes.
The captain paused to allow this exhortation
to produce its desired effect. But Job,
perceiving
that his late tormentors were quiet, and to all
appearance bent on no immediate mischief, sunk
his head languidly upon his blankets, where he lay
in silence, watching, with rolling and anxious eyes,
the smallest movements of his enemies. Polwarth
soon yielded to the impatience of his listeners,
and continued
You are acquainted with Major Lincoln?
Major Lincoln! grumbled three or four of
the grenadiersis it of
him
that we want to
hear!
One moment, my worthy 18ths, I shall come
at the whole truth the sooner, by taking this
indirect
course.
Hurrah! for captain Pollywarreth! shouted
the rioterhim that the ribbils massacred of a
leg!
Thank youthank you, my considerate
friendsanswer, fellow, without prevarication;
you dare not deny to me, your knowledge of
Major Lincoln?
After a momentary pause, a low voice was
heard muttering among the blankets
Job knows all the Boston people; and
Major
Lincoln is a Boston boy.
But with Major Lincoln you had a more
particular acquaintancerestrain your
impatience
,
men; these questions lead directly to
the facts you wish to know. The rioters,
who were profoundly ignorant of what sort of
facts they were to be made acquainted with by
this examination, looked at each other in uneasy
doubt, but soon settled down again into their
former
deep silence.You know him better than
any other gentleman of the army?
He promised Job to keep off the grannies,
and Job agreed to run his ar'n'ds.
Such an arrangement betrays a greater
intimacy
than is usual between a wise man and a
fool! If you are then so close in league with him,
I demand what has become of your associate?
The young man made no reply.
You are thought to know the reasons why
he has left his friends, returned Polwarth, and
I now demand that you declare them.
VOL., II. 13
Declare! repeated the simpleton, in his
most unmeaning and helpless mannerJob was
never good at his schooling.
Nay, then, if you are obstinate, and will not
answer, I must withdraw, and permit these brave
grenadiers to work their will on you.
This threat served to induce Job to raise his
head, and assume that attitude and look of
instinctive
watchfulness that he had so recently
abandoned. A slight movement of the crowd
followed, and the terrible words of blood for
blood, again passed among them in sullen
murmurs
.
The helpless youth, whom we have been
obliged to call an idiot, for want of a better term,
and because his mental imbecility removed him
without the pale of legal responsibility, now
stared wildly about him, with an increasing
expression
of reason, that might be ascribed
expression
the force of that inward fire which preyed upon
his vitals, and which seemed to purify the spirit
in proportion as it consumed the material dross
of his existence.
Its ag'in the laws of the Bay, to beat and
torment
a fellow-creature, he said, with a solemn
carnestness in his voice, that would have melted
hearts of ordinary softness; and what is more,
its ag'in His holy book! If you hadn't made
oven-wood of the old North, and a horse-stable
of the old South, you might have gone to hear
such expounding as would have made the hair
rise on your wicked heads!
The cries ofHave done wid his foolery;
the imp is playing his games on us! As
if his wooden mockery was a church at all fit
for a ra'al Christian! were heard on every side,
and they were succeeded by the often-repeated
and appalling threat, of blood for blood!
Fall back, men, fall back, cried Polwarth,
flourishing his walking-stic in such a manner as
effectually to enforce his orders; wait for his
confession before you judge. Fellow, this is the
last and trying appeal to your truthyour life
most probably depends on the answer. You
are known to have been in arms against the
crown.Nay, I myself saw you in the field on
that day when the troops a-a-a countermarched
from Lexington; since when you are known to
have joined the rebels while the army went out
to storm the entrenchment on the heights of
Charlestown. At this point in the recapitulation
of the offences of Job, the captain was suddenly
appalled by a glimpse at the dark and threatening
looks that encircled him, and he concluded with a
laudable readinessOn that glorious day when
his majesty's troops scattered your provincial
rabble
like so many sheep driven from their pastures,
by dogs!
The humane ingenuity of Polwarth was
rewarded
by a burst of loud and savage laughter.
Encouraged
by this evidence of his power over his
auditors, the worthy captain proceeded with an
increased confidence in his own eloquence.
On that glorious day, he continued,
gradually
warming with his subject, many a gallant
gentleman
,
and hundreds of fearless privates, met
their fate. Some fell in open and manly fight,
and according to the chances of regular warfare.
Somehe-e-msome have been multilated; and
will carry the marks of their glory with them to
the grave. His voice grew a little thick and
husky as he proceeded, but shaking off his
weakness
,
he ended with an energy that he intended
should curdle the heart of the prisoner, while,
fellow, some have been murdered!
Blood for blood! was heard again passing
its fearful round. Without attempting any
longer
to repress the rising spirit of the rioters,
Polwarth continued his interrogatories, entirely
led away by the strength of his own feelings on
this sensitive subject.
Remember you such a man as Dennis
M`Fuse? he demanded in a voice of thunder;
he that was treacherously slain in your inmost
trenches, after the day was won! Answer me,
knave, were you not among the rabble, and did
not your own vile hand the bloody deed?
A few words were heard from Job, in a low,
muttering
tone, of which only the rake-hellies, and
the people will teach 'em the law! were
sufficiently
distinct to be understood.
Murder him! part him sowl from body!
exclaimed the fiercest of the grenadiers.
Hold! cried Polwarth; but one moment
moreI would relieve my mind from the debt I
owe his memory. Speak, fellow; what know you
of the death of the commander of these brave
grenadiers?
Job, who had listened to his words attentively,
though his uneasy eyes still continued to watch
the slightest movements of his foes, now
turned
to the speaker with a look of foolish triumph,
and answered
The 18th came up the hill, shouting like
roaring lions! but the Royal Irish had a
death-howl
,
that evening, over their tallest man!
Polwarth trembled with the violence of the
passions that beset him, but while with one
hand he motioned to the men to keep back,
with the other he produced the battered
gorget
from his pocket, and held it before the eyes
of the simpleton.
Know you this? he demanded; who
snt the bullet through this fatal hole?
Job took the ornament, and for a moment
regarded it with an unconscious look. But his
countenance gradually lighting with a ray of
unusual meaning, he laughed in scornful
exultation
,
as he answered
Though Job is a fool, he can shoot!
Polwarth started back aghast, while the fierce
resentments of his ruder listeners broke through
all restraint. They raised a loud and savage
shout, as one man, filling the building with
hoarse execrations and cries for vengeance.
Twenty expedients to destroy their captive were
named in a breath, and with all the
characteristic
vehemence of their nation. Most of them
would have been irregularly adopted, had not the
man who attended the burning hemp caught
up a bundle of the flaming combustible, and
shouted aloud
Smodder him in the fiery flames!he's an
imp of darkness; burren him, in his rags, from
before the face of man!
The barbarous proposition was received with
a sort of frenzied joy, and in another moment
a dozen handsful of the oakum were impending
above the devoted head of the helpless lad. Job
made a feeble attempt to avert the dreadful
fate that threatened him, but he could offer no
other resistance than his own weakened arm,
and the abject moanings of his impotent mind.
He was enveloped in a cloud of black smoke,
through which the forked flames had already
begun to play, when a woman burst into the
throng, casting the fiery combustibles from her,
on either side, as she advanced, with a strength
that seemed supernatural. When she had
reached
the bed, she tore aside the smoking pile with
15*
hands that disregarded the heat, and placed
herself
before the victim, like a fierce lioness, at
bay, in defence of her whelps. In this attitude
she stood an instant, regarding the rioters with
a breast that heaved with passions too strong
for utterance, when she found her tongue, and
vented her emotions with all the fearlessness of
a woman's indignation.
Ye monsters in the shape of men, what is't
ye do! she exclaimed, in a voice that rose above
the tumult, and had the effect to hush every
mouth. Have ye bodies without hearts! the
forms without the bowels of the creatures of
God! Who made you judges and punishers of
sins! Is there a father among you, let him
come and view the anguish of a dying child!
Is there a son, let him draw near, and look
upon a mother's sorrow! Oh! ye savages,
worse than the beasts of the howling
wilderness
,
who have merey on their kinds, what is't
ye dowhat is't ye do!
The air of maternal intrepidity with which
this burst from the heart was uttered, could not
fail to awe the worst passions of the rioters,
who gazed on each other in stupid wonder,
as if uncertain how to act. The hushed, and
momentary stillness was, however, soon broken
once more by the low, murmuring threat of,
Blood for blood!
Cowards! Dastards! Soldiers in name and
demons in your deeds! continued the
undaunted
Abigailcome ye here to taste of human
blood! Goaway with you to the hills! and
face the men of the Bay, who stand ready
to meef you with arms in their hands, and
come not hither to bruise the broken reed!
Poor, suffering, and stricken as he is, by a
hand far mightier than yours, my child will
meet you there, to your shame, in the cause of
his country, and the law!
This taunt was too bitter for the unnurtured
tempers to which she appealed, and the dying
spark of their resentment was at once kindled
into a blaze by the galling gibe.
The rioters were again in motion, and the cry
of burn the hag and the imp together, was
fiercely raised, when a man of a stout, muscular
frame forced his way into the cenfre of the crowd,
making room for the passage of a female, whose
gait and attire, though her person was concealed
by her mantle, announced her to be of a rank
altogether superior to the usual guests of the
warehouse
.
The unexpected appearance, and lofty,
though gentle bearing of this unlooked-for visiter,
served to quell the rising uproar, which was
immediately
succeeded by so deep a silence that
a whisper could have been heard in that throng
which so lately resounded with violent tumult and
barbarous execrations.
CHAPTER XI.
Ay, sir, you shall find me reasouable; if it be so, I shall
do that that is reason.
Slender
.
During
the close of the foregoing scene
Polwarth was in a bewildered state, that
rendered
him utterly incapable of exertion, either
to prevent or to assist the evil intentions of
the soldiery. His discretion, and all his better
feelings, were certainly on the side of
humanity
,
but the idle vaunt of the simpleton had
stirred anew the natural thirst for vengeance.
He recognized, at the first glance, in the wan,
but speaking lineaments of the mother of Job,
those faded remnants of beauty that he had
traced, so lately, in the squalid female
attendant
who was seen lingering near the grave of
Mrs. Lechmere. As she rushed before the men,
with all the fearlessness of a mother who stood in
defence of her child, the brightness of her dark
eyes, aided as they were by the strong glare
from the scattered balls of fire, and the intense
expression of maternal horror that shone in
every
feature of her countenance, had imparted to
her appearance a dignity and interest that
greatly served to quell the unusual and
dangerous
passions that beset him. He was on
the point of aiding her appeal by his authority
and advice, when the second interruption to the
brutal purpose of the men occurred, as just
related
.
The effect of this strange appearance, in
such a place, and at such a time, was not less
instant
on the captain than on the vulgar throug
who surrounded him. He remained a silent and
an attentive spectator.
The first sensation of the lady, in finding
herself in the centre of such a confused and
unexpected throng, was unequivocally that of
an alarmed and shrinking delicacy; but
forgetting
her womanish apprehensions in the
next moment, she collected the powers of her
mind, like one sustained by high and
laudable
intentions, and dropping the silken folds of
her calash, exhibited the pale, but lovely
countenance
of Cecil to the view of the wondering
bystanders
.
After a moment of profound silence,
she spoke
I know not why I find this fierce collection
of faces around the sick-bed of that unfortunate
young man, she said; but if it be with evil
purpose, I charge you to relent, as you love the
honour of your gallant profession, or fear the
power of your leaders. I boast myself a soldier's
wife, and promise you, in the name of one who
has the ear of Howe, pardon for what is past, or
punishment for your violence, as you conduct
yourselves.
The rude listeners stared at each other in
irresolute
hesitation, seeming already to waver in
their purpose, when the old grenadier, whose
fierceness had so nearly cost Job his life, gruffly
replied
If you're an officer's lady, madam, you'll be
knowing how to feel for the fri'nds of him that's
dead and gone; I put it to the face of your
ladyship's
reason, if it's not too much for men to bear,
and they such men as the 18ths, to hear a fool
boasting on the high-ways and through the
streets of the town, that he has been the death of
the like of captain M'Fuse, of the grenadiers of
that same radg'ment!
I believe I understand you, friend, returned
Cecil, for I have heard it whispered that the
young man was believed to aid the Americans on
the bloody day to which you alludebut if it is not
lawful to kill in battle, what are you, whose whole
trade is war?
She was interrupted by half-a-dozen eager,
though respectful voices, muttering in the
incoherent
and vehement manner of their country,
It's all a difference, my lady! Fair fighting
isn't foul-fighting, and foul fighting is murder!
with many other similar half-formed and equally
intelligible remonstrances. When this burst was
ended, the same grenadier who had before spoken,
took on himself the office of explaining.
If your ladyship spoke never a word again,
ye've said the truth this time, he answered,
though it isn't exactly the truth, at all. When
a man is kill't in the fair war, its a god-send; and
no true Irishman will gainsay the same; but
skulking behind a dead body, and taking aim
into the f'atures of a fellow-crature, is what we
complain of against the bloody-minded rascal.
Besides, wasn't the day won? and even
his
death
couldn't give
them
the victory!
I know not all these nice distinctions in your
dreadful calling, friend, Cecil replied, but I
have heard that many fell after the troops
mounted
the works.
That did they; sure your ladyship is
knowing
all about it! and it's the more need that some
should be punished for the murders! It's hard
to tell when we've got the day with men who make
a fight of it after they are fairly baitin!
That others suffered under similar
circumstances
,
continued Cecil, with a quivering lip,
and a tremulous motion of her eye lids, I well
know, but had never supposed it more than the
usual fortune of every war. But even if this
youth has erredlook at him! Is he an object
for the resentment of men who pride
themselves
on meeting their enemies on equal terms!
He has long been visited by a blow from a hand
far mightier than yours, and even now is
labouring
,
in addition to all other misfortunes,
under
that dangerous distemper whose violence
seldom
spares those it seizes. Nay, you, in the
blindness of your anger, expose yourselves to
its attacks, and when you think only of revenge,
may become its victims!
The crowd insensibly fell back as she spoke,
and a large circle was left around the bed of
Job, while many in the rear stole silently from
the building, with a haste that betrayed how
completely
apprehension had got the better of their
more evil passions. Cecil paused but an instant,
and pursued her advantage.
Go, she said; leave this dangerous vicinity.
I have business with this young man, touching
the interests, if not the life of one dear,
deservedly
dear to the whole army, and would
be left alone with him and his mother. Here is
moneyretire to your own quarters, and
endeavour
to avert the danger you have so
wantonly
braved, by care and regimen. Go; all shall
be forgotten and pardoned.
The reluctant grenadier took her gold, and
perceiving that he was already deserted by most
of his companions, he made an awkward
obeisance
to the fair being before him, and
withdrew
,
not without, however, casting many a savage
and sullen glance at the miserable wretch who
had been thus singularly rescued from his
vengeance
.
Not a soldier now remained in the
building
,
and the noisy and rapid utterance of the
retiring party, as each vehemently recounted his
deeds, soon became inaudible in the distance.
Cecil then turned to those who remained, and
cast a rapid glance at each individual of the party.
The instant she encountered the wondering look
of Polwarth, the blood mantled her pale features
once more, and her eyes fell, for an instant, in
embarrassment, to the floor.
I trust we have been drawn here for a
similar
purpose, captain Polwarth, she said, when
the slight confusion had passed awaythe
welfare
of a common friend?
You have not done me injustice, he replied.
When the sad office, which your fair cousin
charged me with, was ended, I hastened hither
to follow a clue which I have reason to believe
will conduct us to
What we most desire to find, said Cecil,
involuntarily glancing her anxious eyes towards
the other spectators. But our first duty is
humanity. Cannot this miserable young man
be reconveyed to his own apartment, and have
his hurts examined.
It may be done now, or after our
examination
,
returned the captain, with a cool
indifference
that caused Cecil to look up at him in
surprise. Perceiving the unfavourable
impression
his apathy had produced, Polwarth turned
carelessly to a couple of men who were still
curious
lookers-on, at the outer door of the
building
,
he called to themHere, Shearflint,
Meriton
,
remove the fellow into yonder room.
The servants in waiting, who had been
hitherto
wondering witnesses of all that passed,
received
this mandate with strong disgust.
Meriton
was loud in his murmurs, and approached
the verge of disobedience, before he consented
to touch such an object of squalid misery. As
Cecil, however, enforced the order by her wishes,
the disagreeable duty was performed, and Job
replaced
on his pallet in the tower, from which
he had been rudely dragged an hour before, by
the soldiers.
At the moment when all danger of further vio
lence disappeared, Abigail had sunk on some of
the lumber of the apartment, where she
remained
during the removal of her child, in a sort
of stupid apathy. When, however, she perceived
that they were now surrounded by those who were
bent on deeds of mercy rather than of anger, she
slowly followed into the little room, and became
an anxious observer of the succeeding events.
Polwarth seemed satisfied with what had been
done for Job, and now stood aloof, in sullen
attendance
on the pleasure of Cecil. The latter,
who had directed every movement with female
tenderness and care, bade the servants retire into
the outer-room and wait her orders. When
Abigail
,
therefore, took her place, in silence, near
the bed of her child, there remained present,
besides
herself and the sick, only Cecil, the
captain
,
and the unknown man, who had
apparently
led the former to the warehouse. In
addition to the expiring flames of the oakum,
the feeble light of a candle was shed through the
room, merely rendering the gloomy misery of its
tenants more striking.
Notwithstanding the high, but calm resolution
which Cecil had displayed in the foregoing scene
with the rioters, and which still manifested itself,
in the earnest brightness of her intelligent eye,
she appeared willing to profit by the duskiness
of the apartment, to conceal her expressive
features
VOL. II. 14
from the gaze of even the forlorn
female
.
She placed herself in one of the shadows
of the room, and partly raised the calash, by
a graceful movement of one of her hands, while
she addressed the simpleton
Though I have not come hither with any
intent
to punish, nor in any manner to intimidate
you with threats, Job Pray, she said, with an
earnestness that rendered the soft tones of her
voice doubly impressiveyet have I come to
question you on matters that it would be wrong,
as well as cruel in you, to misrepresent, or in any
manner to conceal
You have little cause to fear that any thing
but the truth will be uttered by my child,
interrupted
Abigail. The same power that
destroyed
his reason, has dealt tenderly with his
heartthe boy knows no guilewould to God
the same could be said of the sinful woman who
bore him!
I hope the character you give your son
will be supported by his conduct, replied
Cecil
:
with this assurance of his integrity, I will
directly question him. But that you may see I
take no idle liberty with the young man, let me
explain my motives! She hesitated a moment,
and averted her face unconsciously, as she
continued
I
should think, Abigail Pray, that my
person must be known to you?
It isit is, returned the impatient woman,
who appeared to feel the feminine and polished
elegance of the other a reproach to her own
miseryyou are the happy and wealthy
heiress
of her whom I have seen this day laid in her
vault. The grave will open for all alike! the
rich and the poor, the happy as well as the
wretched! Yesyes, I know you! you are the
bride of a rich man's son!
Cecil shook back the dark tresses that had
fallen about her countenance, and raised her
face, tinged with its richest bloom, as she
answered
,
with an air of matronly dignity
If you then know of my marriage, you will
at once perceive that I have the interest of a wife
in Major LincolnI would wish to learn his
movements of your son.
Of my boy! of Job! from the poor despised
child of poverty and disease, would you learn
tidings of your husband?nono, young lady,
you mock us; he is not worthy to be in the
secrets
of one so great and happy!
Yet am I deceived if he is not! Has there
not been one called Ralph, a frequent inmate of
your dwelling, during the past year, and has he
not been concealed here within a very few hours?
Abigail started at this question, though she did
not hesitate to answer, without prevarication
It is trueIf I am to be punished for
harbouring
a being that comes I know whence, and goes
I know whither; who can read the heart, and
knows what man, by his own limited powers,
could never know, I must submit. He was here
yesterday; he may be here again to-night; for
he comes and goes at will. Your generals and
army may interfere, but such as I dare not
forbid
it!
Who accompanied him when he departed
last? asked Cecil, in a voice so low, that, but
for the profound stillness of the place, it would
have been inaudible.
My childmy weak, unmeaning, miserable
child! said Abigail, with a reckless promptitude
that seemed to court any termination to her
misery
,
however sudden or adverse. If it be
treasonable
to follow in the footsteps of that
nameless
man, Job has much to answer for!
You mistake my purposegood, rather than
evil, will attend your answers, should they be
found true.
True! repeated the woman, ceasing the
rocking motion of her body, and looking
proudly
up into the anxious face of Cecilbut you
are great and powerful, and are privileged to
open the wounds of the unhappy!
If I have said any thing to hurt the feelings
of a child, I shall deeply regret the words, said
Cecil, with gentle fervourI would rather be
your friend than your oppressor, as you will learn
when occasion offers.
Nono
you
can never be a friend to
me!
exclaimed the woman, shuddering; the wife of
Major Lincoln ought never to serve the
interests
of Abigail Pray!
The simpleton, who had apparently lain in
dull indifference to what was passing, raised
himself now from among his rags, and said, with
foolish pride
Major Lincoln's lady has come to see Job,
because Job is a gentleman's son!
You are the child of sin and misery!
groaned
Abigail, burying her head in her cloak
would that you had never seen the light of day!
Tell me, then, Job, whether Major Lincoln
himself has paid you this compliment, as well
as I, said Cecil, without regarding the conduct
of the motherwhen did you see him last?
Perhaps I can put these questions in a more
intelligible manner, said the stranger, with a
meaning glance of his eye towards Cecil, that she
appeared instantly to comprehend. He turned
then to Job, whose countenance he studied
closely
,
for several moments, before he continued
Boston must be a fine place for parades and
shows, young man; do you ever go to see the
soldiers
exercise?
Job always keeps time in the marchings,
returned the simpleton; 'tis a grand sight to
see the grannies treading it off to the awful sound
of drums and trumpets!
And Ralph, said the other, soothingly
does he march in their company too?
Ralph! he's a great warrior! he teaches
the people their trainings, out on the hillsJob
sees him there every time he goes for the Major's
provisions.
This requires some explanation, said the
stranger.
'Tis easily obtained, returned the observant
Polwarth. The young man has been the
bearer
of certain articles, periodically, from the
country
into the town, during the last six months,
under
the favour of a flag.
The man mused a moment before he pursued
the subject.
When were you last among the rebels, Job?
he at length asked.
You had best not call the people rebels,
muttered the young man, sullenly, for they
wont put up with bitter names!
I was wrong, indeed, said the stranger.
But when went you last for provisions?
Job got in last Sabba'day morning; and
that's only yesterday!
How happened it, fellow, that you did not
bring the articles to me? demanded Polwarth,
with a good deal of impatient heat.
He has unquestionably a sufficient reason for
the apparent neglect, said the cautious and
soothing stranger. You brought them here,
I suppose, for some good reason?
14*
Ay! to feed his own gluttony! muttered the
irritated captain.
The mother of the young man clasped her
hands together convulsively, and made an effort
to rise and speak, but she sunk again into her
humble posture, as if choked by emotions that
were too strong for utterance.
This short, but impressive pantomime was
unnoticed by the stranger, who continued his
inquiries
in the same cool and easy manner as
before
.
Are they yet here? he asked.
Certain, said the unsuspecting simpleton;
Job has hid them 'till Major Lincoln comes
back. Both Ralph and Major Lincoln forgot
to tell Job what to do with the provisions.
In that case I am surprised you did not
pursue them with your load.
Every body thinks Job's a fool, muttered
the young man; but he knows too much to
be lugging provisions out ag'in among the
people
.
Why! he continued, raising himself, and
speaking, with a bright glare dancing across his
eyes, that betrayed how much he prized the
envied
advantagethe Bay-men come down with
cart-loads of things to eat, while the town is filled
with hunger!
True; I had forgotten they were gone out
among the Americansof course they went
under
the flag that you bore in?
Job didn't bring any flaginsygns carry the
flags! He brought a turkey, a grand ham, and a
little sa'cethere wasn't any flag among them.
At the sound of these eatables, the captain
pricked
up his ears, and he probably would have again
violated the rigid rules of decorum, had not the
stranger continued his questions.
I see the truth of all you say, my sensible
fellow, he observed. It was easy for Ralph
and Major Lincoln to go out by means of the
same privilege that you used to enter?
To be sure, muttered Job, who, tired of the
questions, had already dropped his head again
among his blanketsRalph knows the way
he's Boston born!
The stranger turned to the attentive bride, and
bowed, as if he were satisfied with the result of his
examination. Cecil understood the expression of
his countenance, and made a movement towards
the place where Abigail Pray was seated on a chest,
betraying, by the renewed rocking of her body,
and the low groans that from time to time escaped
her, the agony of mind she endured.
My first care, she said, speaking to the
mother
of Job, shall be to provide for your wants.
After which I may profit by what we have now
gathered from your son.
Care not for me and mine! returned
Abigail
,
in a tone of bitter resignation; the last
blow is struck, and it behoves such as we to bow
our heads to it in submission. Riches and
plenty
could not save your grandmother from the
tomb, and perhaps Death may take pity, ere
long, on me. What do I say, sinner that I
am! can I never bring my rebellious heart to
wait his time!
Shocked at the miserable despair that the
other exhibited, and suddenly recollecting the
similar evidences of a guilty life that the end
of Mrs. Lechmere had revealed, Cecil
continued
silent, in sensitive distress. After a moment,
to collect her thoughts, she said, with the
meekness
of a Christian, united to the soothing
gentleness
of her sex
We are surely permitted to administer to our
earthly wants, whatever may have been our
transgressions
.
At a proper time I will not be
denied
in my wish to serve you. Let us now
go, she added, addressing her unknown
companion
then
observing Polwarth making an
indication
to advance to her assistance, she
gently
motioned him back, and anticipated his offer,
by saying, I thank you, sirbut I have
Meriton
,
and this worthy man, besides my own maid
withoutI will not further interfere with your
particular
objects.
As she spoke, she bestowed a melancholy,
though sweet smile on the captain, and left the
tower and the building, before he could presume
to dispute her pleasure. Notwithstanding Cecil
and her companion had obtained from Job all
that he could expect, or in fact had desired to
know, Polwarth lingered in the room, making
those preparations that should indicate an
intention
to depart. He found, at length, that his
presence
was entirely disregarded by both mother
and child. The one was still sitting, with her
head bowed to her bosom, abandoned to her
own sorrows, while the other had sunk into his
customary dull lethargy, giving no other signs of
life than by his laboured and audible breathing.
The captain, for a moment, looked upon the
misery of the apartment, which wore a still more
dreary aspect under the dull light of the paltry
candle, as well as at the disease and suffering
which were too plainly exhibited in the persons
of its abject tenants; but the glance at neither
served to turn him from his purpose. Temptation
tion had beset the humble follower of Epicurus in
a form that never failed to subdue his most
philosophic
resolutions, and, in this instance, it
prevailed
once more over his humanity.
Approaching
the pallet of the simpleton, he spoke to him
in a sharp voice, saying
You must reveal to me what you have done
with the provisions with which Mr. Seth Sage
has entrusted you, young manI cannot
overlook
so gross a violation of duty, in a matter
of such singular importance. Unless you wish
to have the grannies of the 18th back upon
you, speak at once, and speak truly.
Job continued obstinately silent, but Abigail
raised her head, and answered for her child
He has never failed to carry the things to the
quarters of the Major, whenever he got back.
No, noif my boy was so graceless as to steal,
it would not be
him
that he would rob!
I hope soI hope so, good woman; but this
is a sort of temptation to which men yield easily
in times of scarcity, returned the impatient
captain, who probably felt some inward tokens
of his own frailty in such matters.If they had
been delivered would not I have been consulted
concerning their disposition! The young man
acknowledges that he quitted the American camp
yesterday at an early hour.
No no and Job, Ralph made him come
away on Saturda'-night. He left the people
without
his dinner!
And repaid his loss by eating the stores! Is
this your honesty, fellow?
Ralph was in such a hurry that he wouldn't
stop to eat. Ralph's a proper warrior, but he
doesn't seem to know how sweet it is to eat!
Glutton! gormandizer! Thou ostrich of a
man! exclaimed the angry Polwarthis it
not enough that you have robbed me of my
own, but you must make me more conscious of
my loss by thy silly prating?
If you really suspect my child of doing wrong
to his employers, said Abigail, you know
neither his temper nor his breeding. I will
answer
for him, and with bitterness of heart do
I say it, that nothing in the shape of food has
entered his mouth for many long and weary hours.
Hear you not his piteous longings for
nourishment
?
God, who knows all hearts, will hear and
believe his cry!
What say you, woman! cried Polwarth,
aghast with horror, not eaten did you say!
Why hast thou not, unnatural mother, provided
for his wantswhy has he not shared in your
meals?
Abigail looked up into his face with eyes that
gleamed with hopeless want, as she answered
Would I willingly see the child of my body
perish of hunger! The last crumb he had was
all that was left me, and that came from the
hands of one, who, in better justice, should have
sent me poison!
Nab don't know of the bone that Job found
before the barracks, said the young man, feebly;
I wonder if the king knows how sweet bones
are?
And the provisions, the stores! cried
Polwarth
,
nearly chokingfoolish boy, what hast
thou done with the provisions?
Job knew the grannies couldn't find them
under that oakum, said the simpleton, raising
himself to point out their place of concealment,
with silly exultationwhen Major Lincoln
comes back, may be he'll give Nab and Job
the bones to pick!
Polwarth was no sooner made acquainted with
the situation of the precious stores, than he tore
them from their concealment, with the violence of a
maniac. As he separated the articles with an
unsteady
nand, he rather panted than breathed; and
during the short operation, every feature in his
honest face was working with extraordinary
emotion
.
Now and then he muttered in an under
toneno food! suffering of inanition! or
some such expressive exclamation, that
sufficiently
explained the current of his thoughts. When
all was fairly exposed, he shouted, in a
tremendous
voice
Shearflint! thou rascal! Shearflintwhere
have you hidden yourself?
The reluctant menial knew how dangerous it
was to hesitate answering a summons uttered in
such a voice, and while his master was yet
repeating
his cries, he appeared at the door of the little
apartment, with a face expressive of the deepest
attention.
Light up the fire, thou prince of idlers!
Polwarth continued in the same high strain;
here is food, and there is hunger! God be
praised that I am the man who is permitted to
bring the two acquainted! Here, throw on
oakumlight up, light up!
As these rapid orders were accompanied by a
corresponding earnestness of action, the servant,
who knew his master's humour, sat himself most
diligently at work to comply. A pile of the tarred
combustible was placed on the dreary and empty
hearth, and by a touch of the candle it was lighted
into a blaze. As the roar of the chimney, and
the bright glare were heard and seen, the mother
and child both turned their louging eyes towards
the busy actors in the scene. Polwarth threw
aside his cane, and commenced slicing the ham
with a dexterity that denoted great practice, as
well as an eagerness that renewed the credit of
his disgraced humanity.
Bring woodhand down that apology for
a gridirenmake coals, make coals at once,
rascal
,
he said, at short intervalsGod forgive
me, that I should ever have meditated evil to
one suffering under the heaviest of curses!
D'ye hear, thou Shearffint! bring more wood; I
shall be ready for the fire in a minute.
'Tis impossible, sir, said the worried
domestic
;
I have brought the smallest chip there
is to be foundwood is too precious in
Boston
to be lying in the streets.
Where do you keep your fuel, woman?
demanded the captain, unconscious that he
addressed
her in the same rough strain that he
used to his menialI am ready to put down.
You see it all, you see it all! said Abigail,
in the submissive tones of a stricken conscience;
the judgment of God has not fallen on me
singly!
No wood! no provisions! exclaimed
Polwarth
,
speaking with difficultythen dashing
his hand across his eyes, he continued to his
man, in a voice whose hoarseness he
intended
should conceal his emotionthou villain,
Shearflint, come hitherunstrap my leg.
The servant looked at him in wonder, but an
impatient gesture hastened his compliance.
Split it into ten thousand fragments; 'tis
seasoned and ready for the fire. The best of
them, they of flesh I mean, are but useless
incumbrances
,
after all! A cook wants hands,
eyes, nose, and palate, but I see no use for a
leg!
While he was speaking, the philosophic captain
seated himself on the hearth with great
indifference
,
and by the aid of Shearflint, the culinary
process was soon in a state of forwardness.
There are people, resumed the diligent
Polwarth
,
who did not neglect his avocation while
speaking, that eat but twice a-day; and some
who eat but once; though I never knew any man
thrive who did not supply nature in four
substantial
and regular meals. These sieges are
damnable
visitations on humanity, and there should be
plans invented to conduct a war without them.
The moment you begin to starve a soldier, he
grows tame and melancholy: feed him, and defy
the devil! How is it, my worthy fellow; do you
like your ham running or dry?
The savoury smell of the meat had caused the
suffering invalid to raise his feverish body, and
he sat watching, with greedy looks, every
movement
of his unexpected benefactor. His parched
lips were already working with impatience, and
every glance of his glassy eye betrayed the
absolute
dominion of physical want over his feeble
mind. To this question he made the simple and
touching reply, of
Job isn't particular in his eating.
Neither am I, returned the methodical
gourmand
,
returning a piece of the meat to the fire,
that Job had already devoured in imagination
one would like to get it up well,
notwithstanding
the hurry. A single turn more, and it will be
fit for the mouth of a prince. Bring hither that
trencher, Shearflintit is idle to be particular
about crockery in so pressing a case. Greasy
scoundrel, would you dish a ham in its gravy!
What a nosegay it is, after all! Come hither, help
me to the bed.
May the Lord, who sees and notes each kind
thought of his creatures, bless and reward you
for this care of my forlorn boy! exclaimed
Abigail
,
in the fullness of her heart; but will it be
prudent to give such strong nourishment to one
in a burning fever?
What else would you give, woman? I doubt
not he owes his disease to his wants. An empty
stomach
is like an empty pocket, a place for the
devil
to play his gambols in. 'Tis your small
doctor
who prates of a meager regimen. Hunger is a
distemper of itself, and no reasonable man, who is
above listening to quackery, will believe it can be
a remedy. Food is the prop of lifeand
eating
,
like a crutch to a maimed manShearflint,
examine the ashes for the irons of my supporter,
and then dish a bit of the meat for the poor
woman. Eat away, my charming boy, eat away!
he continued, rubbing his hands in honest
delight
,
to see the avidity with which the
famishing
Job received his boon. The second
pleasure
in life is to see a hungry man enjoy his
meal. The first being more deeply seated in
human
nature. This ham has the true Virginia
flavour
!
Have you such a thing as a spare trencher,
Shearflint? It is so near the usual hour, I may
as well sup. It is rare, indeed, that a man enjoys
two such luxuries at once!
The tongue of Polwarth ceased the instant
Shearflint administered to his wants; the
warehouse
,
into which he had so lately entered with
such fell intent, exhibiting the strange spectacle
of the captain, sharing, with social communion,
in the humble repast of its hunted and miserable
tenants.
CHAPTER XII.
Sir Thurio, give us leave, I pray, awhile
We have some secrets to confer about.
Two Gentlemen of Verona
During
the preceding exhibition of riot and
degradation, in the dock-square, a very
different
state of things existed beneath the roof of
a proud edifice that stood in an adjacent street.
As was usual at that hour of the night, the
windows of Province-house were brilliant with
lights, as if in mockery of the naked dreariness
of the neighbouring church, and every approach
to that privileged residence of the representative
of royalty, was closely guarded by the vigilance
of armed men. Into this favoured dwelling it
now becomes necessary to remove the scene, in
order to pursue the thread of our unpretending
narrative.
Domestics, in rich military liveries, might be
seen gliding from room to room, in the hurry
of a banquetsome bearing vessels of the most
generous wines into the apartment where Howe
entertained the leaders of the royal army, and
others returning with the remnants of a feast;
which, though sumptuously served, having felt
the scarcity of the times, had offered more to
the eyes than to the appetites of the guests.
Idlers, in the loose undress of their martial
profession
,
liotered through the balls, and many a
wistful glance, or lingering look followed the
odorous scents, as humbler menials received the
viands to transport them into the more secret
recesses
of the building. Notwithstanding the life
and activity which prevailed, every movement
was conducted in silence and regularity; the
whole of the lively scene affording a happy
illusstration
of the virtues and harmony of order.
Within the walls of that apartment to which
every eye seemed directed as to a common
centre
,
in anticipation of the slightest wish of those
who revelled there, all was bright and cheerful.
The hearth knew no want of fuel; the coarser
workmanship of the floor was hid beneath rich
and ample carpets, while the windows were
nearly lost within the sweeping folds of
curtains
of figured damask. Every thing wore an
air of exquisite comfort, blended with a species
of careless elegance. Even the most minute
article of the furniture had been transported from
that distant country which was then thought to
monopolize all the cunning arts of handicraft, to
administer to the pleasures of those, who
however
careless of themselves in moments of trial,
courted the most luxurious indulgencies in their
hours of ease.
Along the centre of this gay apartment was
spread the hospitable board of the entertainer.
It was surrounded by men in the trappings of
high military rank, though here and there might
he seen a guest, whose plainer attire and dejected
countenance, betrayed the presence of one or
two of those misjudging colonists, whose
confidence
in the resistless power of the crown,
began
already to waver. The lieutenant of the
King held his wonted place at the banquet, his
dark visage expressing all the heartiness of a
soldier's welcome, while he pointed out this or
that favourite amongst an abundant collection
of wines, that included the choicest liquors of
Europe.
For those who share the mess of a British
general, you have encountered rude fare to-day,
gentlemen, he cried; though, after all, 'tis
such as a British soldier knows how to fatten on,
in the service of his master. Fill, gentlemen;
fill in loyal bumpers, for we have neglected our
allegiance.
Each glass now stood sparkling and
overcharged
with wine, when, after a short and
solemn
pause, the host pronounced aloud, the
magical wordsThe King.Every voice
echoed the name, after which there literally
succeeded
a breathless pause; when an old man, in
the uniform of an officer of the fleet, first proving
his loyalty by flourishing on high his inverted
glass, added, with hearty will
God bless him!
God bless him! repeated the graceful
leader
,
who has already been more than once named
in these pages; and grant him a long and
glorious
reign! and should there be no treason in the
wish, in death, a Grave like yourself, worthy
admiral
`Sepulchrum
sine sordibus extrue.'
Like me! echoed the blunt seaman, whose
learning was somewhat impaired by hard and long
serviceI am, it is true, none of your
cabin-window
gentry, but his majesty might stoop lower
than by favouring a faithful servant, like me,
with his gracious presence.
Your pardon, sir, I should have included,
`permissum arbitrio.'
The equivoque had barely excited a smile,
when the sedate countenance of the
commander-in-chief
indicated that the subject was too serious
15*
for a jest. Nor did the naval chieftain appear to
relish the unknown tongue; for quite as much, if
not a little more offended with the liberty taken
with his own name, than with the privileged
person
of the sovereign, he somewhat smartly
retorted
Permitted or not permitted, I command the
fleet of his majesty in these waters, and it shall be
noted as a cheerful day in our log-books, when you
gentlemen of the army dismiss us to our duty
again, on the high-seas. A sailor will grow as tired
of doing nothing, as ever a soldier did of work,
and I like `elbow-room,' even in my coffin ha,
ha, hawhat d'ye think of that, master wit
ha, ha, hawhat d'ye say to that?
Quite fair, well deserved, and cuttingly
severe
,
admiral, returned the undisturbed
soldier
,
smiling with perfect self-possession, as he
sipped his wine. But as you find confinement
and leisure so irksome, I will presume to advise
your seizing some of these impudent Yankees
who look into the port so often, not only
robbing
us of our stores, but offending so many
loyal eyes with their traitorous presence.
I command a parley to be beaten,
interrupted
the commander-in-chief, and a truce to
further
hostilities. Where all have done their duty,
and have done it so well, even wit must respect
their conduct. Let me advise you to sound the
contents of that dusty-looking bottle, Mr. Graves;
I think you will approve the situation as an
anchorage
for the night.
The honest old seaman instantly drowned his
displeasure in a glass of the generous liquor, and
smacking his lips after the potations, for he
repeated
the first on the moment, he exclaimed
Ah! you are too stationary, by half, to stir
up the soul of your liquors. Wine should never
slumber on its lees until it has been well rolled
in the trough of a sea for a few months; then,
indeed, you may set it asleep, and yourself by
the side of it, if you like a cat's nap.
As orthodox a direction for the ripening of
wine as was ever given by a bishop to his
butler
!
exclaimed his adversary. Another
significant
glance from his dark-looking superior,
again checked his wilful playfulness, when Howe
profited by the silence, to say with the frank air
of a liberal host
As motion is, just now, denied us, the only
means I can devise, to prevent my wine from
slumbering on its lees, is to drink it.
Besides which, we are threatened with a visit
from Mr. Washington, and his thirsty followers,
who may save us all trouble in the matter, unless
we prove industrious. In such a dilemma, Mr.
Graves will not hesitate to pledge me in a glass,
though it should be only to disappoint the rebels!
added Burgoyne, making a graceful inclination to
the half-offended seaman.
Ay, ay, I would do much more disagreeable
things to cheat the rascals of their plunder,
returned
the mollified admiral, good-naturedly
nodding
his head before he swallowed his bumper
If there be any real danger of the loss of such
liquid amber as this, 'twould be as well to send
it along-side my ship, and I will hoist it in,
and find it a birth, though it shares my own
cott. I believe I command a fortress which
neither
Yankee, Frenchman, nor Don, would like
to besiege, unless at a respectful distance.
The officers around him looked exceedingly
grave, exchanging glances of great meaning,
though all continued silent, as if the common
subject
of their meditations was too delicate to be
loudly uttered in such a presence. At length the
second in command, who still felt the coldness
of his superior, and who had, hitherto, said
nothing
during the idle dialogue, ventured a
remark
,
with the gravity and distance of a man
who was not certain of his welcome.
Our enemies grow bold as the season
advances
,
he said, and it is past a doubt that
they will find us employment in the coming
summer. It cannot be denied but they
conduct
themselves with great steadiness in all
their batteries, especially in this last, at the
water-side; nor am I without apprehension that
they will yet get upon the islands, and render the
situation of the shipping hazardous.
Get upon the islands! drive the fleet from
their anchors! exclaimed the veteran sailor,
in undisguised amazement; I shall account it
a happy day for England, when Washington and
his rabble trust themselves within reach of our
shot!
God grant us a chance at the rascals with the
bayonet in the open field, cried Howe, and an
end of these winter-quarters! I say
winter-quarters
,
for I trust no gentleman can consider this
army as besieged by a mob of armed peasants!
We hold the town, and they the country; but
when the proper time shall comewell, sir, your
pleasure, he continued, interrupting himself to
speak to an upper servant at his elbow.
The man, who had stood for more than a
minute, in an attitude of respectful attention,
anxious to catch the eye of his master,
muttered
his message in a low and hurried voice,
as if unwilling to be heard by others, and at the
same time conscious of the impropriety of
whispering
.
Most of those around him turned their
heads in polite indifference, but the old sailor,
who sat too near to be totally deaf, had caught
the words, a lady, which was quite enough to,
provoke all his merriment, after such a free
indulgence
of the bottle. Striking his hand
smartly
on the table, he exclaimed, with a freedom
that no other present could have presumed to
use
A sail! a sail! by George a sail! under
what colours, friend; king's, or rebels? Here
has been a blunder, with a vengeance! The
cook has certainly been too late, or the lady
is too early! ha, ha, haOh! you are wicked,
free livers in the army!
The tough old tar enjoyed his joke
exceedingly
,
chuckling with inward delight at his
discovery
.
He was, however, alone in his
merriment
,
none of the soldiers venturing to
understand
his allusions, any further than by
exchanging
a few stolen looks of unusual archness.
Howe bit his lips, with obvious vexation, and
sternly ordered the man to repeat his errand
in a voice that was more audible.
A lady, said the trembling menial, wishes
to see your excellency, and she waits your
pleasure
,
sir, in the library.
Among his books, too! shouted the
admiral
that
would have better become you, my
joking friend! I say, young man, is the girl
young and handsome?
By the lightness of her step, sir, I should
think her young; but her face was concealed
under a hood.
Ay! ay! the jade comes hooded into the
house of the king! Damn me, Howe, but
modesty
is getting to be a rare virtue amongst you
gentlemen on shore!
'Tis a plain case against you, sir, for even
the servant, as you find, has detected that she
is light of carriage, said the smiling Burgoyne,
making a half motion towards rising. It is
probably
some applicant for relief, or for permission
to depart the place. Suffer me to see her, and
spare yourself the pain of a refusal?
Not at all, said Howe, gaining his feet with
an alacrity that anticipated the more deliberate
movement of the otherI should be unworthy
of the trust I hold, could I not lend an
occasional
ear to a petition. Gentlemen, as there is
a lady in the case, I presume to trespass on your
indulgence. Admiral, I commend you to my
butler
,
who is a worthy fellow, and can give you
all the cruises of the bottle before you, since it
left the island of Madeira.
He inclined his head to his guests, and passed
from the room with a hurried step, that did not
altogether consult appearances. As he
proceeded
through the hall, his ears were saluted by
another burst from the hearty old seaman, who,
however, enjoyed his humour alone, the rest of
the party immediately turning to other subjects,
with well-bred dullness. On entering the room
already mentioned, Howe found himself in the
presence of the female, who, notwithstanding their
apparent indifference, was at that very moment
occupying the thoughts, and exercising the
ingenuity
of every man he had left behind him.
Advancing at once to the centre of the
apartment
,
with the ease and freedom of a soldier
who felt himself without a superior, he asked,
with a politeness somewhat equivocal
Why am I favoured with this visit? and
why has a lady whose appearance shows she
might command friends at any time, assumed
this personal trouble?
Because I am a supplicant for a favour that
might be denied to one who petitioned coldly,
returned a soft, tremulous voice, deep within the
covering of a silken calash. As time is
wanting
to observe the usual forms of applications
I have presumed to come in person, to prevent
delay.
And surely, one like you, can have little
reason to dread a repulse, said Howe, with
an attempt at gallantry, that would have
better
become the man who had offered to be
his substitute. While speaking he advanced a
step nigher to the lady, and pointing to her
hood, he continuedWould it not be wise to
aid your request, with a view of a countenance
that I am certain can speak better than any
wordswhom have I the honour to receive, and
what may be the nature of her business?
A wife who seeks her husband, returned the
female, dropping the folds of her calash, and
exposing to his steady eyes, the commanding
loveliness of the chaste countenance of Cecil
The sudden annunciation of her character was
forced from the lips of the unclaimed bride,
by the freedom of a gaze to which she was
unused; but the instant she had spoken, her
eyes fell on the floor in embarrassment, and she
stood deeply blushing at the strength of her
own language, though preserving all the
apparent
composure and dignity of female pride.
The English general regarded her beauty for
a moment, with a pleased, though doubting eye,
before he continued
Is he whom you seek within or without the
town?
I much fear, without!
And you would follow him into the camp of
the rebels? This is a case that may require some
deliberation. I feel assured I entertain a lady of
great beauty; might I, in addition, know how
to address her?
For my name I can have no reason to blush,
said Cecil, proudly 'tis noble in the land of
our common ancestors, and may have reached the
ears of Mr. HoweI am the child of the late
colonel
Dynevor. '
The niece of Lord Cardonnell! exclaimed
her auditor, in amazement, instantly losing the
equivoeal freedom of his manner in an air of
deep respectI have long known that Boston
contained such a lady; nor do I forget that she is
accused of concealing herself from the attentions
of the army, like one of the most obdurate of our
foesattentions which every man in the garrison
would be happy to show her, from myself down
to the lowest ensigndo me the honour to be
seated?
Cecil bowed her acknowledgments, but
continued
standing
I have neither time nor spirits to defend
myself
from such an imputation, she answered
though should my own name prove no passport
to your favour, I must claim it in behalf of him I
seek.
Should he be the veriest rebel in the train of
Washington, he has great reason to be proud of
his fortune!
So far from ranking among the enemies of the
king, he has already been lavish of his blood in
behalf of the crown, returned Cecil,
unconsciously
raising the calash again, with maiden
bashfulness
,
as she felt the moment was approaching
when she must declare the name of the man,
whose influence over her feelings she had already
avowed.
And he is called?
The answer was given to this direct question, in
a low but distinct voice. Howe started when he
heard the well-known name of an officer of so
much consideration, though a meaning smile
lighted his dark features, as he repeated her
words in surprise
Major Lincoln! his refusal to return to
Europe
,
in search of health, is then satisfactorily
explained
!
Without the town did you say! there
must be some error.
I fear it is too true!
The harsh features of the leader contracted
again into their sternest look, and it was
apparent
how much he was disturbed by the
intelligence
.
This is presuming too far on his
privilege
,
he muttered in an under tone.Left
the place, say you, without my knowledge and
approbation, young lady?
But on no unworthy errand! cried the
almost
breathless Cecil, instantly losing sight of
herself
in her anxiety for Lionelprivate sorrows
have driven him to an act, that, at another time, he
would be the first to condemn, as a soldier.
Howe maintained a cool, but threatening
silence
,
that was far more appalling than any words
could be. The alarmed wife gazed at his
lowering
face for a minute, as if to penetrate his
secret thoughts, then yielding, with the
sensitiveness
of a woman, to her worst apprehensions,
she cried
Oh! you would not avail yourself of this
confession
to do him harm! Has he not bled for
you; lingered for months on the verge of the
grave, in defence of your cause; and will you
now doubt him! Nay, sir, though chance and
years may have subjected him, for a time, to your
controul, he is every way your equal, and will
confront each charge before his Royal Master,
let who may bring them against his spofless
name!
VOL. II. 16
'Twill be necessary, the other coldly
replied
.
Nay, hearken not to my weak, unmeaning
words, continued Cecil, wringing her hands,
in doubting distress; I know not what I say,
He has your permission to hold intercourse with
the country weekly?
For the purpose of obtaining the supplies
necessary to his past condition.
And may he not have gone on such an
errand, and under favour of the flag you
yourself
have cheerfully accorded?
In such a case would I not have been spared
the pain of this interview!
Cecil paused a moment, and seemed collecting
her scatiered faculties, and preparing her mind for
some serious purpose. After a little time, she
attempted
a painful smile, saying, more calmly
I had presumed too far on military
indulgence
,
and was even weak enough to believe the
request would be granted to my name and
situation
.
No name, no situation, no circumstances,
can ever render
Speak not the cruel words, least they once
more drive me from my recollection,
interrupted
Cecil. First hear me, sirlisten to a wife
and a daughter, and you will recall the cruel
sentence
.
Without waiting for a reply, she advanced with
a firm and proud step to the door of the room,
passing her astonished companion with an eye
and a face beaming with the fullness of her
object. In the outer passage, she beckoned from
among the loiterers in the hall, to the stranger who
had accompanied her in the visit to the
warehouse
,
and when he had approached, and
entered
the room, the door once more closed,
leaving
the spectators without, wondering whence
such a vision of purity could have made its way
within the sullied walls of Province-house.
Many long and impatient minutes were
passed
by the guests in the banqueting-room,
during
the continuance of this mysterious
interview
.
The jests of the admiral began to flag,
just as his companions were inclined to think they
were most merited, and the conversation
assumed
that broken and disjointed character which
betrays the wandering of the speakers' thoughts.
At length a bell rang, and orders came
from the commander-in-chief, to clear the hall
of its curious idlers. When none were left
but the regular domestics of the family, Howe
appeared, supporting Cecil, closely hooded, to
the conveyance that awaited her presence at
the gate. The air of their master
communicated
a deep respect to the manners of the
observant menials, who crowded about their
persons
,
to aid the departure, with officious zeal.
The amazed sentinels dropped their arms, with
the usual regularity, to their chieftain, as he
passed to the outer portal in honour of his
unknown
companion, and eyes met the expressive
glances of eyes, as all who witnessed the
termination
of this visit, sought in the countenances
of those around them, some solution of its object.
When Howe resumed his seat at the table,
another attempt was made by the admiral to
renew the subject; but it was received with an
air so cold, and a look so pointedly severe,
that even the careless son of the ocean forgot
his humour under the impression of so dark a
frown.
CHAPTER XIII.
Nor martial shout, nor minstrel tone,
Announced their march
Scott.
Cecil
suffered the night to advance a little,
before she left Tremont-street, to profit by the
permission to leave the place, her communication
had obtained from the English general. It was,
however, far from late when she took leave
of Agnes, and commenced her expedition, still
attended by Meriton and the unknown man, with
whom she has already, more than once, made her
appearance in our pages. At the lower part of
the town she left her vehicle, and pursuing the
route of several devious and retired streets, soon
reached the margin of the water. The wharves
were deserted and still. Indicating the course by
her own light and hurried footsteps, to her
companions
,
the youthful bride moved unhesitatingly
along the rough planks, until her progress was
checked by a large basin, between two of the
ordinary wooden piers which line the shores of
the place. Here she paused for a moment, in
doubt, as if fearful there had been some mistake,
when the figure of a boy was seen advancing out
of the shadows of a neighbouring store-house.
I fear you have lost your way, he said, when
within a few feet of her, where he stood,
apparently
examining the party with rigid scrutiny.
May I venture to ask whom or what you seek?
One who is sent hither, on private duty, by
orders from the commander-in chief.
I see but two, returned the lad, hesitating
where is the third?
He lingers in the distance, said Cecil,
pointing
to Meriton, whose footsteps were much more
guarded than those of his mistress. Three is our
number, and we are all present.
I beg a thousand pardons, returned the
youth, dropping the folds of a sailor's over-coat,
under which he had concealed the distinguishing
marks of a naval dress, and raising his hat at the
same moment, with great respect; my orders
were to use the utmost precaution, ma'am, for,
as you hear, the rebels sleep but little to-night!
'Tis a dreadful scene I leave, truly, sir,
returned
Cecil, and the sooner it will suit your
convenience
to transport us from it, the greater will
be the obligation you are about to confer.
The youth once more bowed, in submission to
her wishes, and requested the whole party to
follow
whither he should lead. A very few moments
brought them to a pair of water-stairs, where,
under
cover of the duskiness thrown upon the basin
from the wharf, a boat lay concealed, in perfect
readiness to receive them.
Be stirring boys! cried the youth, in a tone
of authority; ship your oars as silently as it
stealing away from an enemy. Have the
goodness
,
ma'am, to enter, and you shall have a quick
and safe landing on the other shore, whatever
may be the reception of the rebels.
Cecil and her two attendants complied without
delay, when the boat glided into the stream with
a velocity that promised a speedy verification of
the words of the midshipman The most
profound
stillness reigned among these nocturnal
16*
adventurers, and by the time they had rowed a
short distance, the bride began to lose an
immediate
consciousness of her situation, in
contemplation
of the scene.
The evening was already milder, and by one of
those sudden changes, peculiar to the climate, it
was rapidly becoming even bland and pleasant.
The light of a clear moon fell upon the town and
harbour, rendering the objects of both visible, in
mellowed softness. The huge black hulls of the
vessles of war, rested sullenly on the waters, like
slumbering leviathans, without even a sail or a
passing boat, except their own, to enliven the view
in the direction of the port. On the other hand,
the hills of the town rose, in beautiful relief, against
the clear sky, with here and there a roof or a
steeple
reflecting the pale light of the moon. The
bosom of the place was as quiet as if its
inhabitants
were buried in midnight sleep, but behind
the hills, in a circuit extending from the works on
the heights of Charlestown, to the neck, which lay
in open view of the boat, there existed all the
evidences of furious warfare. During the few
preceding
nights the Americans had been more than
commonly diligent in the use of their annoyances,
but now they appeared to expend their utmost
energies upon their enemies. Still they spared the
town, directing the weight of their fire at the
different
batteries which protected the approaches to
the place, as already described, along the western
borders of the peninsula.
The ears of Cecil had long been accustomed
to the uproar of arms, but this was the first
occasion
in which she was ever a witness of the
mingled
beauties and terrors of a cannonade at night.
Suffering the calash to fall, she shook back the
dark tresses from her face, and leaning over the
sides of the little vessel, listened to the bursts
of the artillery, and gazed on the sudden flashes of
vivid light that mocked the dimmer illumination
of the planet, with an absorbed attention that
momentarily lured her into forgetfulness. The
men pulled their light boat with muffled oars, and
so still was its progress, that there were instants
when even the shot might be heard rattling among
the ruins they had made.
It's amazement to me, madam, said Meriton,
that so many British generals, and brave
gentlemen
as there is in Boston, should stay in such a
little spot to be shot at by a parcel of
countrymen
,
when there is Lon'non, as still and as safe,
at this blessed moment, as a parish church-yard,
at midnight!
Cecil raised her eyes at this interruption, and
perceived the youth gazing at her countenance
in undisguised admiration of its beauty.
Blushing
,
and once more concealing her features
beneath
her calash, she turned away from the view
of the conflict, in silence.
The rebels are free with their gunpowder
tonight
!
said the midshipman.Some of their
cruisers have picked up another of our
store-ships
,
I fancy, or Mr. Washington would not make
such a noisy time of it, when all honest people
should be thinking of their sleep. Don't you
believe, Ma'am, if the admiral would warp three
or four of our heaviest ships up into the channel,
back of the town, it would be a short method
of lowering the conceit of these Yankees?
Really, sir, I am so little acquainted with
military matters, returned Cecil, suffering her
anxious features to relax into a smile, that
my opinion, should I venture to give one, would
be utterly worthless.
Why, young gentleman, said Meriton, the
rebels drove a galley out of the river, a night or
two ago, as I can testify myself, having stood
behind
a large brick store, where I saw the whole
affair, most beautifully conducted!
A very fit place for one like you, no doubt,
sir, returned the midshipman, without attempting
to conceal his disgust at so impertinent an
interruption
do
you know what a galley is, Ma'am?
nothing but a small vessel cut down, with a
few heavy guns, I do assure you. It would be
a very different affair with a frigate or a
two-decker
!
Do but observe what a charming thing
our ship is, Ma'amI am sure so beautiful a lady
must know how to admire a handsome ship!
she lies here-away, nearly in a range with the
second island.
To please the earnest youth, Cecil bent her
head toward the quarter he wished, and
murmured
a few words in approbation of his taste.
But the impatient boy had narrowly watched the
direction of her eyes, and she was interrupted by
his exclaiming in manifest disappointment
What! that shapeless hulk, just above the
castle! she is an old Dutch prize, en flute, ay,
older than my grandmother, good old soul;
and it wouldn't matter the value of a piece of
junk; into which end you stepped her
bowsprit
!
One of my school-fellows, Jack
Willoughby
,
is a reefer on board her; and he says that
they can just get six knots out of her, on her
course in smooth water with a fresh breeze,
allowing
seven knot for lee-way! Jack means to get
rid of her the moment he can catch the
admiral
running large, for the Graves's live near
the Willoughbys' in town, and he knows all the
soundings about the old man's humour. No, no,
Ma'am, Jack would give every shot in his lockers
to swing a hammock between two of the beams
of our ship. Do excuse me, one moment;
presuming
to take one of the hands of Cocil, though
with sufficient delicacy, as he pointed out his
favourite
vesselThere, Ma'am, now you have
her! She that's so taunt rigged, with a
flying-jib-boom
,
and all her top-gallant-yards stopped to
her lower riggingwe send them down every
night at gun-fire, and cross them again next
morning as regularly as the bell strikes eight.
Isn't she a sweet thing, Ma'am? for I see she has
caught your eye at last, and I am sure you
can't wish to look at any other ship in port.
Cecil could not refuse her commendations to
this eloquent appeal, though at the next moment
she would have been utterly at a loss to
distinguish
the much-admired frigate from the
despised
store-ship.
Ay, ay, Madam, I knew you would like her
when you once got a fair glimpse at her
proportions
,
continued the delighted boy; though she
is not half so beautiful on her broadside, as when
you can catch her lasking, especially on her
larboard
bowpull, long and strong, men, and with
a light touch of the waterthese Yankees have
ears as long as borricoes, and we are getting in
with the land. This set-down at Dorchester's neck
will give you a long walk, Ma'am, to Cambridge;
but there was no possibility of touching the rebels
any where else to-night, or, as you see, we should
have gone right into the face of their cannon.
Is it not a little remarkable, said Cecil,
willing
to pay the solicitude of the boy to amuse
her, by some reply, that the colonists, while
they invest the town so closely on the north and
west, should utterly neglect to assail it on the
south; for I believe they have never occupied the
hills in Dorchester at all; and yet it is one of the
points nearest to Boston!
It is no mystery at all! returned the boy,
shaking his head with all the sagacity of a
veteran
it
would bring another Bunker-hill about
their ears; for you see it is the same thing at this
end of the place that Charlestown neck is at the
other! a light touch, men, a light touch! he
continued
,
dropping his voice as they approached the
shore; besides, Ma'am, a fort on that hill could
throw its shot directly on our decks, a thing the
old man would never submit to; and that would
either bring on a regular hammering match, or a
general clearing out of the fleet; and then what
would become of the army!No, nothe
Yankees
wouldn't risk driving the cod-fish out of their
bay, to try such an experiment! Lay on your oars,
boys, while I take a squint along this shore, to see
if there are any Jonathans cooling themselves near
the beach, by moon-light.
The obedient seamen rested from their labours,
while their youthful officer stood up in the boat
and directed a small night-glass over the
intended
place of landing. The examination proved
entirely
satisfactory, and in a low, cautions voice, he
ordered the men to pull into a place where the
shadow of the hills might render the landing still
less likely to be observed.
From this moment the most profound silence
was observed, the boat advancing swiftly, though
under perfect command, to the desired spot, where
it was soon heard grazing upon the bottom, as it
gradually lost its motion, and finally became
stationary
.
Cecil was instantly assisted to the land,
whither she was followed by the midshipman,
who jumped upon the shore, with great
indifference
,
and approached the passenger, from
whom he was now about to part
I only hope that those you next fall in with,
may know how to treat you as well as those you
leave, said the boy, approaching, and offering
his hand, with the frankness of an older seaman,
to CecilGod bless you, my dear Ma'am; I
have two little sisters at home, nearly as handsome
as yourself, and I never see a woman in want of
assistance, but I think of the poor girls I've left in
old EnglandGod bless you, once moreI hope
when we meet again, you will take a nearer view
of the
You are not likely to part so soon as you
imagine
,
exclaimed a man, springing on his feet,
from his place of concealment behind a rock,
and advancing rapidly on the partyoffer the
least resistance, and you are all dead.
Shove off, men, shove off, and don't mind
me! cried the youth, with admirable presence
of mind.For God's sake, save the boat, if you
die for it!
The seamen obeyed with practised alacrity,
when the boy darted after them with the
lightness
of his years, and making a despearate leap,
caught the gunwale of the barge, into which he
was instantly drawn by the sailors. A dozen
armed men had by this time reached the edge of
the water, and as many muskets were pointed at
the retreating party, when he who had first
spoken, cried
Not a trigger! the boy has escaped us, and
he deserves his fortune! Let us secure those
who remain; but if a single gun be fired it will
only draw the attention of the flect and castle.
His companions, who had acted with the
hesitation
of men that were not assured the course they
took was correct, willingly dropped the muzzles of
their pieces, and in another instant the boat was
ploughing its way towards the much-admired
frigate
,
at a distance which would probably have
rendered
their fire quite harmless. Cecil had hardly
breathed during the short period of uncertainty.
but when the sudden danger was passed, she
prepared
herself to receive their captors, with the
perfect confidence which an American woman
seldom fails to feel in the mildness and reason of
her countrymen. The whole party, who now
approached her, were dressed in the ordinary
habiliments
of husbandmen, mingled, in a slight
degree
,
with the more martial accountrements of
soldiers
.
They were armed with muskets only,
which they wielded like men acquainted with all
the uses of the weapon, at the same time that they
were unaccustomed to the mere manual of the
troops.
Every fibre of the body of Meriton, however,
shook with fear, as he found this unexpected
guard encircling their little party, nor did the
unknown
man who had accompanied them appear
entirely free from apprehension. The bride still
maintained her self-possession, supported either
by her purpose, or her greater familiarity with the
character of the people into whose hands she had
fallen.
When the whole party were posted within a few
feet of them, they dropped the butts of their
muskets
on the ground, and stood patient listeners to
the ensuing examination. The leader of the
party, who was only distinguished from his
companions
by a green cockade in his hat, which
Cecil had heard was the symbol of a subaltern
officer among the American troops, addressed her
in a calm, but steady tone
It is unpleasant to question a woman, he
said, and especially one of your appearance:
but duty requires it of me. What brings you
to this unfrequented point, in the boat of a king's
ship, and at this unusual hour of the night?
I come with no intent to conceal my visit
from any eyes, returned Cecil; for my first
wish is to be conducted to some officer of rank, to
whom I will explain my object. There are many
that I should know, who will not hesitate to
believe
my words.
We none of us profess to doubt your truth;
we only act with caution, because it is required
by circumstancescannot the explanation be
made to me; for I dislike the duty that causes
trouble to a female?
'Tis impossible! said Cecil, involuntarily
shrinking within the folds of her mantle.
You come at a most unfortunate moment,
said the other, musing, and I fear you will pass
an uneasy night, in consequence. By your
tongue, I think you are an American?
I was born among those roofs, which you
may see on the opposite peninsula.
Then we are of the same town, returned the
officer, stepping back in a vain attempt to get a
glimpse of those features which were concealed
beneath the hood. He made no attempt,
however
,
to remove the silk, nor did he in the
slightest
manner convey any wish of a nature that
might be supposed to wound the delicacy of
her sex; but finding himself unsuccessful, he
turned away, as he addedand I grow tired
of remaining where I can see the smoke of my
own chimneys, at the same time I know that
strangers are seated around the hearths below!
None wish more fervently than I, that the
moment had arrived when each might enjoy
his own, in peace and quietness.
Let the parliament repeal their laws, and the
king recall his troops, said one of the men, and
there will be an end of the struggle at once. We
don't fight because we love to shed blood!
He would do both, friend, if the counsel of
one so insignificant as I, could find weight in his
royal mind.
VOL. II. 17
I believe there is not much difference between
a royal mind and that of any other man, when
the devil gets hold of it! bluntly exclaimed
another
of the party. I've a notion the imp is
as mischievous with a king as with a cobbler!
Whatever I may think of the conduct of his
ministers, said Cecil, coldly, 'tis unpleasant
to me to discuss the personal qualities of my
sovereign.
Why, I meant no offence; though when the
truth is uppermost in a man's thoughts, he is apt
to let it out, returned the soldier. After this
uncouth
apology, he continued silent, turning away
like one who felt dissatisfied with himself for
what he had done.
In the mean time the leader had been
consulting
with one or two of his men aside. He now
advanced again, and delivered the result of their
united wisdom.
Under all circumstances, I have concluded,
he said, speaking in the first person, in deference
to his rank, though in fact he had consented to
change his own opinion at the instigation of his
advisers, to refer you for information to the
nearest general officer, under the care of these
two men, who will show you the way. They
both know the country, and there is not the least
danger of their mistaking the road.
Cecil bowed, in entire submission to this
characteristic
intimation of his pleasure, and
declared
her anxiety to proceed. The officer held
another
short consultation with the two guides, which soon terminated by his issuing orders to the rest
of the detachment to prepare to depart. Before
they separated, one of the guides, or, more
properly
,
guards, approached Meriton, and said, with a
deliberation that might easily be mistaken for
doubt
As we shall be only two to two, friend, will it
not be as well to see what you have got secreted
about your person, as it may prevent any hard
words or difficulties hereafter. You will see the
reason of the thing, I trust, and make no
objection
.
Not at all, sir, not at all! returned the
trembling valet, producing his purse, without a
moment's hesitation; it is not heavy, but what
there is in it, is of the best English gold; which I
expect is much regarded among you who see
nothing
but rebel paper!
Much as we set store by it, we do not choose
to rob for it, returned the soldier, with cool
contempt
.
I wish to look for weapons, and not
for money.
But sir, as I unluckily have no weapons,
had you not better take my money? there are ten
good guineas, I do assure you; and not a light
one among them all, 'pon honour! besides several
pieces of silver.
Come, Allen, said the other soldier,
laughing
,
it's no great matter whether that gentleman
has arms or not, I believe. His comrade here, who
seems to know rather better what he is about, has
none, at any rate; and for one of two men, I am
willing to trust the other.
I do assure you, said Cecil, that our
intentions
are peaceable, and that your charge will
prove in no manner difficult.
The men listened to the earnest tones of her
sweet voice with much deference, and in a few
moments the two parties separated, to
proceed
on their several ways. While the main
body of the soldiers ascended the hill, the
guides of Cecil took a direction which led them
around its base. Their route lay towards the
low neck which connected the heights with
the adjacent country, and their progress was
both diligent and rapid. Cecil was often
consulted
as to her ability to endure the fatigue,
and repeated offers were made to accommodate
their speed to her wishes. In every other
respect
she was totally disregarded by the guides,
who, however, paid much closer attention to
her companions, each soldier attaching himself
to one of her followers, whom he constantly
regarded with a watchful and wary eye.
You seem cold, friend, said Allen to
Meriton
,
though I should call the night quite
pleasant
for the first week in March!
Indeed I'm starved to the bones!
returned
the valet, with a shivering that would seem to
verify his assertion.It's a very chilly climate
is this of America, especially of nights! I never
really felt such a remarkable dampness about the
throat before, within memory, I do assure you.
Here is another handkerchief, said the
soldier
,
throwing him a common 'kerchief from his
pocketwrap it round your neck, for it gives
me an ague to hear your teeth knocking one
another
about so.
I thank you, sir, a thousand times, said
Meriton, producing his purse again, with an
instinctive readinesswhat may be the price?
The man pricked up his ears, and dropping
his musket from the guarded position in which
he had hitherto carried it, he drew closer to the
side of his prisoner, in a very companionable
way, as he replied
I did not calculate on selling the article;
but if you have need of it, I wouldn't wish to be
hard.
Shall I give you one guinea, or two, Mr.
Rebel? asked Meriton, whose faculties were
utterly confounded by his terror.
My name is Allen, friend, and we like civil
language in the Bay, said the soldier. Two
guineas for a pocket-handkerchief! I couldn't
think of imposing on any man so much!
What shall it be then, half a guinea, or four
half-crown pieces?
I didn't at all calculate to part with the
handkerchief when I left homeits quite new,
as you can see by holding it up, in this
manner
,
to the moonbesides, you know, now there
is no trade, these things come very high.Well,
if you are disposed to buy, I dont wish to crowd;
you may take it, finally, for the two crowns.
Meriton dropped the money into his hands,
without hesitation, and the soldier pocketed the
price, perfectly satisfied with his bargain and
himself, since he had sold his goods at a clear
profit of about three hundred per cent. He
soon took occasion to whisper to his
comrade
,
that in his opinion he had made a good
trade, and laying their heads together, they
determined that the bargain was by no means
a bad wind-fall. On the other hand, Meriton,
who knew the difference in value between
cotton
and silk, quite as well as his American
protectors, was equally well satisfied with the
arrangement; though his contentment was
derived
from a very different manner of
reasoning
.
From early habit, he had long been taught
to believe that every civility, like patriotism in
the opinion of Sir Robert Walpole, had its price;
and his fears had rendered him somewhat
careless
about the amount of the purchase-money.
He now considered himself as having a clear
claim on the protection of his guard, and his
apprehensions gradually subsided into security
under the soothing impression.
By the time this satisfactory bargain was
concluded
,
17*
and each party was lawfully put in
possession
of his own, they had reached the low
land already mentioned as the neck.
Suddenly
the guard stopped, and bending forward,
in the attitude of deep attention, they seemed
to listen, intently, to some faint and distant
sounds that were, for moments, audible in the
intervals of the cannonade.
They are coming, said one to the other;
shall we go on, or wait until they've passed?
The question was answered in a whisper, and,
after a short consultation, they determined to
proceed.
The attention of Cecil had been attracted by
this conference, and the few words which had
escaped her guides; and, for the first time, she
harboured some little dread as to her final
destination. Full of the importance of her
errand
,
the bride now devoted every faculty to
detect the least circumstance that might have
a tendency to defeat it. She trode so lightly on
the faded herbage as to render her own footsteps
inaudible, and more than once she was about to
request the others to imitate her example, that
no danger might approach them unexpectedly.
At length her doubts were relieved, though her
wonder was increased, by distinctly hearing the
lumbering sounds of wheels on the frozen earth,
as if innumerable groaning vehicles were
advancing
with slow and measured progress. In
another instant her eyes assisted the organs of
hearing, and by the aid of the moon her doubts,
if not her apprehensions, were entirely removed.
Her guards now determined on a change
of purpose, and withdrew with their prisoners
within the shadow of an apple tree that stood
on the low land, but a few paces from the
line of the route evidently taken by the
approaching
vehicles. In this position they
remained
for several minutes, attentive observers
of what was passing around them.
Our men have woke up the British by their
fire, said one of the guards; and all their eyes
are turned to the batteries!
Yes, it's very well as it is, returned his
comrade
;
but if the old brass congress mortar
hadn't gi'n way yesterday, there would be a
different
sort of roaring. Did you ever see the old
congress?
I can't say I ever saw the cannon itself,
but I have seen the bombs fifty times; and
pokerish-looking
things they be, especially in a
dark nightbut hush, here they come.
A large body of men now approached, and
moved swiftly past them, in deepest silence,
defiling
at the foot of the hills, and marching
towards
the shores of the peninsula. The whole
of this party was attired and accoutred much
in the fashion of those who had received Cecil.
One or two who were mounted, and in more
martial trappings, announced the presence of
some officers of higher rank. At the very heels
of this detachment of soldiers, came a great
number
of carts, which took the route that led directly
up to the neighbouring heights. After these
came another, and more numerous body of
troops, who followed the teams, the whole moving
in the profoundest stillness, and with the
diligence
of men who were engaged in the most
important
undertaking. In the rear of the whole,
another collection of carts appeared, groaning
under the weight of large bundles of hay, and
other military preparations of defence. Before
this latter division left the low land, immense
numbers of the closely-packed bundles were
tumbled to the ground, and arranged, with a
quickness almost magical, in such a manner as
to form a light breast-work across the low
ground, which would otherwise have been
completely exposed to be swept by the shot
of the royal batteries; a situation of things that
was believed to have led to the catastrophe of
Breeds, the preceding summer.
Among the last of those who crossed the neck,
was an officer on horse-back, whose eye was
attracted
by the group who stood as idle spectators
under the tree. Pointing out the latter object to
those around him, he rode nigher to the party,
and leaned forward in his saddle to examine their
persons
How's this! he exclaimeda woman and
two men under the charge of sentinels! Have we
then more spies among uscut away the tree,
men; we have need of it, and let in the light of
the moon upon them!
The order was hardly given before it was
executed, and the tree felled with a despatch
that, to any but an American, would appear
incredible
.
Cecil stepped aside from the
impending
branches, and by moving into the light,
betrayed the appearance of a gentlewoman by
her mien and apparel.
Here must be some mistake! continued
the officerwhy is the lady thus guarded?
One of the soldiers, in a few words,
explained
the nature of her arrest, and in return
received directions, anew, how to proceed. The
mounted officer now put spurs into his horse,
and galloped away, in eager pursuit of more
pressing duties, though he still looked behind
him, so long as the deceptive light enabled him to
distinguish either form or features.
'Tis advisable to go on the heights, said the
soldier, where we may find the commanding
general.
Any where, returned Cecil, confused with
the activity and bustle that had passed before her
eyes, or any thing, to be relieved from this
distressing
delay.
In a very few moments they reached the
summit
of the nearest of the two hills, where they
paused just without the busy circle of men who
laboured there, while one of the soldiers went in
quest of the officer in command. From the point
where she now stood, Cecil had an open view of
the port, the town, and most of the adjacent
country
.
The vessels still reposed heavily on the
waters, and she fancied that the youthful
midshipman
was already nestling safe in his own
hammock
,
on board the frigate, whose tall and
tapering
spars rose against the sky in such beautiful
and symmetrical lines. No evidences of alarm
were manifested in the town; but, on the
contrary
,
the lights were gradually disappearing,
notwithstanding
the heavy cannonade which still
roared along the western side of the peninsula;
and it was probable that Howe, and his unmoved
companions, yet continued their revels, with the
same security in which they had been left two
short hours before. While, with the exception
of the batteries, every thing in the distance was
still, and apparently slumbering, the near view
was one of life and activity. Mounds of earth
were already rising on the crest of the hill
labourers were filling barrels with earth and sand;
fascines were tumbling about from place to place,
as they were wanted, and yet the stillness was
only interrupted by the unremitting strokes of
the pick, the low and earnest hum of voices,
or the crashing of branches, as the pride of the
neighbouring orchards came, crushing, to the
earth. The novelty of the scene beguiled Cecil of
her anxiety, and many minutes passed unheeded
by. Fifty times parties, or individuals amongst
the labourers, approaching near her person,
paused
to gaze a moment at the speaking and sweet
features that the placid light of the moon
rendered
even more than usually soft, and then
pushed on in silence, endeavouring to repair, by
renewed diligence, the transient forgetfulness
of their urgent duties. At length the man
returned
,
and announced the approach of the
general
who commanded on the hill. The latter was a
soldier of middle age, of calm and collected
deportment
,
roughly attired, for the occasion, and
bearing no other symbol of his rank than the
distinctive
crimson cockade, in one of the large
military
hats of the period.
You find us in the midst of our labours, he
pleasantly observed, as he approached; and will
overlook the delay I have given you. It is
reported
you left the town this evening?
Within the hour.
And Howedreams he of the manner in
which we are likely to amuse him in the
morning
?
It would be affectation in one like me, said
Cecil, modestly, to decline answering questions
concerning the views of the royal general; but
still you will pardon me if I say, that in my
present
situation, I could wish to be spared the pain
of even confessing my ignorance.
I acknowledge my error, the officer
unhesitatingly
answered. After a short pause, in which
he seemed to muse, he continuedthis is no
ordinary night, young lady, and it becomes my
duty to refer you to the general commanding this
wing of the army. He possibly may think it
necessary
to communicate your detention to the
commander-in-chief.
It is he I seek, sir, and would most wish to
meet.
He bowed, and giving his orders to a subaltern
in a low voice, walked away, and was soon lost in
the busy crowd that came and went in constant
employment, around the summit of the hill. Cecil
lingered a single moment after her new conductor
had declared his readiness to proceed, to cast
another glance at the calm splendour of the sea
and bay; the distant and smoky roofs of the
town; the dim objects that moved about the
adjacent
eminence, equally and similarly employed
with those around her; and then raising her
calash
,
and tightening the folds of her mantle, she
descended the hill with the light and elastic steps
of youth.
CHAPTER XIV.
The rebel vales, the rebel dales,
With rebel trees surrounded,
The distant woods, the hills and floods,
With rebel echoes sounded.
The Battle of the Kegs
.
The
enormous white cockade that covered
nearly one side of the little hat of her present
conductor, was the only symbol that told Cecil
she was now commited to the care of one who
held the rank of captain among those who
battled
for the rights of the colonies. No other part
of his attire was military, though a cut-and-thrust
was buckled to his form, which, from its silver
guard, and formidable dimensions, had probably
been borne by some of his ancestors, in the former
wars of the colonies. The disposition of its
present
wearer was, however, far from that
belligerent
nature that his weapon might be thought
to indicate, for he tendered the nicest care and
assiduity to the movements of his prisoner.
At the foot of the hill, a wagon, returning
from the field, was put in requisition by this
semi-military gallant; and after a little suitable
preparation, Cecil found herself seated on a rude
bench by his side, in the vehicle; while her own
attendants, and the two private men, occupied its
bottom, in still more social affinity. At first their
progress was slow and difficult, return carts,
literally
by hundreds, impeding the way; but when they
had once passed the heavy-footed beasts who drew
them, they proceeded in the direction of
Roxbury
,
with greater rapidity. During the first mile,
while they were extricating themselves from the
apparently interminable line of carts, the officer
directed his whole attention to this important and
difficult manuvre; but when their uneasy
vessel
might be said to be fairly sailing before the
wind, he did not choose to neglect those
services
,
which, from time immemorial, beautiful
women in distress have had a right to claim
of men in his profession.
Now do not spare the whip, he said to
the driver, at the moment of their deliverance;
but push on, for the credit of horse-flesh, and to
the disgrace of all horned cattle. This near beast
of yours should be a tory, by his gait and his
reluctance to pull in the traces for the
common-good
treat
him as such, friend, and, in
turn, you shall receive the treatment of a sound
whig, when we make a halt. You have spent
the winter in Boston, Madam?
Cecil bent her head, in silent assent.
The royal army will, doubtless, make a
better figure in the eyes of a lady, than the
troops of the colonies; though there are some
among us who are thought not wholly wanting
in military knowledge, and the certain air of a
soldier, he continued; extricating the
silver-headed
legacy of his grandfather from its
concealment
under a fold of his companion's
mantle
you
have balls and entertainments without
number, I fancy, Ma'am, from the gentlemen in
the king's service.
VOL. II. 18
I believe that few hearts are to be found
amongst the females in Boston, so light as to
mingle in their amusements!
God bless them for it! exclaimed her
escort
;
I am sure every shot we throw into the
town, is like drawing blood from our own veins.
I suppose the king's officers don't hold the
colonists
so cheap, since the small affair on
Charlestown
neck, as they did formerly?
None who had any interest at stake, in the
events of that fatal day, will easily forget the
impression it has made!
The young American was too much struck by
the melancholy pathos in the voice of Cecil, not to
fancy he had, in his own honest triumph,
unwittingly
probed a wound which time had not yet
healed. They rode many minutes after this
unsuccessful
effort on his part, to converse, in
profound
silence, nor did he again speak until the
trampling of horses hoofs was borne along by
the evening air, unaccompanied by the
lumbering
sounds of wheels. At the next turn of
the road they met a small cavalcade of officers,
riding at a rapid rate in the direction of the place
they had so recently quitted. The leader of this
party drew up when he saw the wagon, which
was also stopped in deference to his obvious wish
to speak with them.
There was something in the haughty, and
yet easy air of the gentleman who addressed
her companion, that induced Cecil to attend to
his remarks with more than the interest that is
usually excited by the common-place dialogues
of the road. His dress was neither civil, nor
wholly military, though his bearing had much of
a soldier's manner. As he drew up, three or
four dogs fawned upon him, or passed with
indulged
impunity between the legs of his
high-blooded
charger, apparently indifferent to the
impatient
repulses that were freely bestowed on their
troublesome familiarities.
High discipline, by ! exclaimed this
singular specimen of the colonial chieftainsI
dare presume, gentlemen, you are from the heights
of Dorchester; and having walked the whole
distance
thither from camp, are disposed to try the
virtues of a four-wheeled conveyance over the
same ground, in a retreat!
The young man rose in his place, and lifted his
hat, with marked respect, as he answered
We are returning from the hills, sir, it is
true; but we must see our enemy before we
retreat
!
A white cockade! As you hold such rank,
sir, I presume you have authority for your
movements
!
Down, Junodown, slut.
This lady was landed an hour since, on the
point, from the town, by a boat from a king's
ship, sir, and I am ordered to see her in safety
to the general of the right wing.
A lady! repeated the other, with singular
emphasis, slowly passing his hand over his
remarkably
aquiline and prominent features, if
there be a lady in the case, ease must be indulged.
Will you down, Juno! Turning his head a little
aside, to his nearest aid, he added, in a voice that
was suppressed only by the action; some trull
of Howe's, sent out as the newest specimen
of loyal modesty! In such a case, sir, you are
quite right to use horsesI only marvel that
you did not take six instead of two. But how
come we on in the trenches?Down, you hussy,
down! Thou shouldst go to court, Juno, and
fawn upon his majesty's ministers, where thy
sycophancy might purchase thee a riband! How
come we on in the trenches?
We have broken ground, sir, and as the
eyes of the royal troops are drawn upon the
batteries, we shall make a work of it before the
day shows them our occupation.
Ah! we are certainly good at digging, if at
no other part of our exercises! Miss Juno, thou
puttest thy precious life in jeopardy!you will;
then take thy fate! As he spoke, the
impatient
chief drew a pistol from his holster, and
snapped it twice at the head of the dog, that still
fawned upon him in unwitting fondness. Angry
with himself, his weapon, and the animal at the
same moment, he turned to his attendants, and
added, with bitter deliberationgentlemen, if
one of you will exterminate that quadruped, I
promise him an honourable place in my first
despatches
to congress, for the service!
A groom in attendance whistled to the
spaniel
,
and probably saved the life of the disgraced
favourite.
The officer now addressed himself to the party
he had detained, with a collected and dignified
air, that showed he had recovered his
self-possession
,
by saying
I beg pardon, sir, for this troublelet me
not prevent you from proceeding; there may
be serious work on the heights before morning,
and you will doubtless wish to be there.
He bowed with perfect ease and politeness, and
the two parties were slowly passing each other,
when, as if repenting of his condescension, he
turned himself in his saddle, adding, with those
sarcastic tones so peculiarly his own
Captain
,
I beseech thee have an especial care of
the lady!
With these words in his mouth, he clapped
spurs to his horse, and galloped onward,
followed
by all his train, at the same impetuous rate.
Cecil had heard each syllable that fell from the
lips of both in this short dialogue, and she felt
a chill of disappointment gathering about her
heart, as it proceeded. When they had parted,
drawing a long, tremulous breath, she asked, in
tones that betrayed all her feelings
And is this Washington?
That!
exclaimed her companionNo,
no, Madam, he is a very different sort of man!
That is the great English officer, whom congress
has made a general in our army. He is thought
to be as great in the field, as he is uncouth in the
drawing-roomyes, I will acknowledge that much
in his favour, though I never know how to
understand
him; he is so proudso superciliousand
yet he is a great friend of liberty!
Cecil permitted the officer to reconcile the
seeming contradictions in the character of his
superior, in his own way, feeling perfectly
relieved
when she understood it was not the man
who could have any influence on her own destiny.
The driver now appeared anxious to recover the
lost time, and he urged his horses over the ground
with increased rapidity. The remainder of their
short drive to the vicinity of Roxbury, passed in
silence. As the cannonading was still maintained
with equal warmth by both parties, it was
hazarding
too much to place themselves in the line
of the enemy's fire. The young man, therefore,
after finding a secure spot among the uneven
ground of the vicinity, where he might leave
his charge in safety, proceeded by himself to
the point where he had reason to believe he
should find the officer he was ordered to seek.
During his short absence, Cecil remained in the
wagon, an appalled listener, and a partial
spectator
of the neighbouring contest.
18*
The Americans had burst their only mortar
of size, the preceding night, but they applied their
cannon with unwearied diligence, not only in the
face of the British entrenchments, but on the low
land, across the estuary of the Charles; and still
farther
to the north, in front of the position which their
enemies held on the well-known heights of
Charlestown
.
In retaliation for this attack, the batteries
along the western side of the town were in a
constant
blaze of fire, while those of the eastern
continued
to slumber, in total unconsciousness of the
coming danger.
When the officer returned, he reported that his
search had been successful, and that he had been
commanded to conduct his charge into the
presence
of the American commander-in-chief. This
new arrangement imposed the necessity of
driving
a few miles farther, and as the youth began
to regard his new duty with some impatience,
he was in no humour for delay. The route was
circuitous and safe; the roads good; and the driver
diligent. In consequence, within the hour, they
passed the river, and Cecil found herself, after so
long an absence, once more approaching the
ancient
provincial seat of learning.
The little village, though in the hands of friends,
exhibited the infallible evidences of the presence
of an irregular army. The buildings of the
University
were filled with troops, and the doors of the
different inns were thronged with noisy soldiers,
who were assembled for the inseparable purposes
of revelry and folly. The officer drove to one
of the most private of these haunts of the
unthinking
and idle, and declared his intentions
to deposit his charge under its roof, until he
could learn the pleasure of the American leader.
Cecil heard his arrangements with little
satisfaction
,
but yielding to the necessity of the case, when
the vehicle had stopped, she alighted, without
remonstrance
With her two attendants in her train,
and preceded by the officer, she passed through
the noisy crowd, not only without insult, but
without
molestation. The different declaimers in the
throng, and they were many, even lowered their
clamorous voices as she approached, the men
giving way, in deference for her sex, and she
entered the building without hearing but one
remark
applied to herself, though a low and curious
buzz of voices followed her footsteps to its very
threshold. That solitary remark was a sudden
exclamation, in admiration of the grace of her
movements; and singular as it may seem, her
companion thought it necessary to apologize for
its rudeness, by whispering that it had proceeded
from the lips of one of the southern riflemen; a
corps as distinguished for its skill and bravery
as for its want of breeding!
The inside of this inn presented a very
different
aspect from its exterior. The decent
tradesman
who kept it, had so far yielded to the
emergency
of the times, and perhaps, also, to a certain
propensity towards gain, as temporarily to adopt
the profession he followed; but by a sort of
implied
compact with the crowd without, while he
administered to their appetite for liquor, he
preserved most of the privacy of his domestic
arrangements. He had, however, been
compelled
to relinquish one apartment entirely to the
service of the public, into which Cecil and her
companions were shown, as a matter of course,
without the smallest apology for its condition.
There might have been a dozen people in the
common room; some of whom were quietly
seated before its large fire, among whom were one
or two females; some walking; and others
distributed
on chairs, as accident or inclination had
placed them. A slight movement was made at
the entrance of Cecil, but it soon subsided;
though her rich mantle of fine cloth, and silken
calash, did not fail to draw the eyes of the
women upon her, with a ruder gaze than she
had yet encountered from the other sex
during
the hazardous adventures of the night. She
took an offered seat near the bright and
cheerful
blaze on the hearth, which imparted all the
light the room contained, and disposed herself to
wait in patience the return of her conductor, who
immediately took his departure for the
neighbouring
quarters of the American chief.
'Tis an awful time for women bodies to
journey
in! said a middle-aged woman near her, who
was busily engaged in knitting, though she also
bore the marks of a traveller in her dressI'm
sure if I had thought there'd ha' been such
contentions
,
I would never have crossed the
Connecticut
;
though I have an only child in camp!
To a mother, the distress must be great,
indeed
,
said Cecil, when she hears the report
of a contest in which she knows her children are
engaged.
Yes, Royal is engaged as a six-month's-man,
and he is partly agreed to stay 'till the king's
troops conclude to give up the town.
It seems to me, said a grave looking
yeoman
,
who occupied the opposite corner of the
fire-place
,
your child has an unfitting name for one
who fights against the crown!
Ah, he was so called before the king wore
his Scottish Boot! and what has once been
solemnly
named, in holy baptism, is not to be
changed with the shift of the times! They were
twins, and I called one Prince and the other
Royal; for they were born the day his present
majesty
came to man's estate. That, you know, was
before his heart had changed, and when the
people
of the Bay loved him little less than they did
their own flesh and blood.
Why, Goody, said the yeoman, smiling
good-humouredly
,
and rising to offer her a pinch of his
real Scotch, in token of amity, while he made so
free with her domestic mattersyou had then an
heir to the throne in your own family! The Prince
Royal they say comes next to the king, and by
your tell, one of them, at least, is a worthy fellow,
who is not likely to sell his heritage for a mess of
pottage! If I understand you, Royal is here
in service.
He's at this blessed moment in one of the
battering
rams in front of Boston neck, returned the
woman, and the Lord, he knows, 'tis an awful
calling, to be beating down the housen of people
of the same religion and blood with ourselves!
but so it must be, to prevail over the wicked
designs
of such as would live in pomp and idleness,
by the sweat and labour of their fellow-creatures.
The honest yeoman, who was somewhat more
familiar with the terms of modern warfare, than
the woman, smiled at her mistake, while he
pursued
the conversation with a peculiar gravity,
which rendered his humour doubly droll.
'Tis to be hoped the boy will not weary at the
weapon before the morning cometh. But why
does Prince linger behind, in such a moment!
Tarries
he with his father on the homestead, in safety,
being the younger born?
No, no, said the woman, shaking her head,
in sorrow, he dwells, I trust, with our common
Father, in heaven! Neither are you right in
calling him the home-child. He was my
first-born
,
and a comely youth he grew to be! When
the cry that the reg'lars were out at Lexington,
to kill and destroy, passed through the country, he
shouldered his musket, and came down with the
people, to know the reason the land was stained
with American blood. He was young, and full of
ambition, to be foremost among them who were
willing to fight for their birth-rights; and the last
I ever heard of him was in the midst of the
king's troops on Breed's. No, no; his body never
came off the hill! The neighbours sent me up
the clothes he left in camp, and 'tis one of his
socks that I'm now footing for his twin-brother.
The woman delivered this simple explanation
with perfect calmness, though, as she advanced
in the subject, large tears started from her eyes,
and following each other down her cheeks, fell
unheeded upon the humble garment of her dead
son.
This is the way our bravest striplings are
cut off, fighting with the scum of Europe!
exclaimed
the yeoman, with a warmth that showed
how powerfully his feelings were touchedI
hope the boy who lives, may find occasion to
revenge
his brother's death.
God forbid! God forbid! exclaimed the
weeping motherrevenge is an evil passion;
and least of all would I wish a child of mine to
go into the field of blood with so foul a breast.
God has given us this land to dwell in, and to rear
up temples and worshippers of his holy name,
and in giving it, he bestowed the right to defend
it against all earthly oppression. If 'twas right for
Prince to come, 'twas right for Royal to follow!
I believe I am reproved in justice,
returned
the man, looking around at the spectators,
with an eye that no longer teemed with a hidden
meaningGod bless you, my good woman; and
deliver you, with your remaining boy, and all of
us, from the scourge which has been inflicted
on the country for our sins. I go west, into the
mountains, with the sun, and if I can carry any
word of comfort from you to the good man at
home, it will not be a hill or two that shall
hinder
it.
The same thanks to you for the offer, as if
you did it, friend; my man would be right glad
to see you at his settlement, but I sicken
already with the noises and awful sights of
warfare, and shall not tarry long after my son
comes forth from the battle. I shall go down to
Cragie's-house in the morning, and look upon
the blessed man whom the people have chosen
from among themselves as a leader, and hurry
back again; for I plainly see that this is not
an abiding place for such as I!
You will then have to follow him into the
line of danger, for I saw him, within the hour,
riding with all his followers, towards the
water-side
;
and I doubt not that this unusual waste
of ammunition is intended for more than we
of little wit can guess.
Of whom speak you? Cecil involuntarily
asked.
Of whom should he speak, but of
Washington
?
returned a deep, low voice at her
elbow, whose remarkable sounds instantly
recalled
the tones of the aged messenger of death,
who had appeared at the bed-side of her
grandmother
.
Cecil started from her chair, and
recoiled
several paces from the person of Ralph, who
stood regarding her with a steady and searching
look, heedless of the observation they
attracted
,
as well as of the number and quality of the
spectators.
We are not strangers, young lady,
continued
the old man; and you will excuse me,
if I add, that the face of an acquaintance must
be grateful to one of your gentle sex, in a place
so unsettled and disorderly as this.
An acquaintance! repeated the unprotected
bride.
I said an acquaintance; we know each other,
surely, returned Ralph, with marked emphasis;
you will believe me when I add, that I have
seen the two men in the guard-room, which
is at hand.
Cecil cast a furtive glance behind her, and,
with some alarm, perceived that she was
separated
from Meriton and the stranger. Before
time was allowed for recollection, the old man
approached her with a courtly breeding that
was rendered more striking by the coarseness,
as well as negligence of his attire.
This is not a place for the niece of an
English
peer, he said; but I have long been at
home in this warlike village, and will conduct
you to another residence more suited to your sex
and condition.
For an instant Cecil hesitated, but observing
the wondering faces about her, and the intense
curiosity with which all in the room suspended
their several pursuits, to listen to each syllable,
she timidly accepted his offered hand, suffering
him to lead her, not only from the room, but the
house, in profound silence. The door through
which they left the building, was opposite to
that by which she had entered, and when they
found themselves in the open air, it was in a
different
street, and a short distance removed from the
crowd of revellers already mentioned.
I have left two attendants behind me, she
said, without whom 'tis impossible to proceed.
As they are watched by armed men, you
have no choice but to share their confinement,
or to submit to the temporary separation,
returned
the other, calmly. Should his
keepers
discover the character of him who led you
hither, his fate would be certain!
His character! repeated Cecil, again
shrinking
from the touch of the old man.
Surely my words are plain! I said his
character
.
Is he not the deadly, obstinate enemy
of liberty? And think you these countrymen
of ours so dull as to suffer one like him, to go
at large in their very camp!No, no, he
muttered
,
with a low, but exulting laugh; like
a fool has he tempted his fate, and like a dog
shall he meet it! Let us proceed; the house
is but a step from this, and you may summon
him to your presence if you will.
Cecil was rather impelled by her companion,
than induced to proceed, when, as he had said,
they soon stopped before the door of a humble and
retired building. An armed man paced along its
front, while the lengthened shadow of another
sentinel in the rear was every half-minute thrown
far into the street, in confirmation of the
watchfulness
that was kept over those who dwelt within.
Proceed, said Ralph, throwing open the
outer-door, without hesitation. Cecil complied,
but started at encountering another man,
trailing
a musket, as he paced to and fro in the
narrow passage that received her. Between this
sentinel and Ralph, there seemed to exist a good
understanding, for the latter addressed him with
perfect freedom
Has no order been yet received from
Washington
?
he asked.
None; and I rather conclude by the delay,
that nothing very favourable is to be expected.
The old man muttered to himself, but passed
an, and throwing open another door, said
Enter.
Again Cecil complied, the door closing on her
at the instant; but before she had time to
express
either her wonder or her alarm, she was
folded in the arms of her husband.
VOL. II. 19
CHAPTER XV.
Is she a Capulet?
O dear account! my life is my foe's debt.
Romeo
.
Ah
! Lincoln! Lincoln! cried the weeping
bride, gently extricating herself from the long
embrace of Lionel, at what a moment did
you desert me!
And how have I been punished, love! a night
of phrenzy, and a morrow of useless regrets!
How early have I been made to feel the strength
of those ties which unite us;unless, indeed, my
own folly may have already severed them for
ever!
Truant! I know you! and shall hereafter
weave a web, with woman's art, to keep you in my
toils! If you love me, Lionel, as I would fain
believe, let all the past be forgotten. I askI
wish, no explanation. You have been deceived,
and that repentant eye assures me of your
returning
reason. Let us now speak only of
yourself
.
Why do I find you thus guarded, more
like a criminal than an officer of the crown?
They have, indeed, bestowed especial
watchfulness
on my safety!
How came you in their power! and why do
they abuse their advantage?
'Tis easily explained. Presuming on the
tempestuousness
of the nightwhat a bridal was ours,
Cecil!
'Twas terrible! she answered, shuddering;
then with a bright and instant smile, as if sedulous
to chase every appearance of distrust or care
from her countenance, she continuedbut I
have no longer faith in omens, Lincoln! or, if
one has been given, is not the awful fulfilment
already
come? I know not how you value the
benedictions
of a parting soul, Lionel, but to me there
is holy consolation in knowing that my dying
parent
left her blessing on our sudden union!
Disregarding the hand, which, with gentle
earnestness
,
she had laid upon his shoulder, he
walked
gloomily away, into a distant corner of the
apartment.
Cecil, I do love you, as you would fain
believe
,
he said, and I listen readily to your wish
to bury the past in oblivion. But I leave my tale
unfinished!You know the night was such that
none would choose, uselessly, to brave its fury
I attempted to profit by the storm, and availing
myself of a flag, which is regularly granted to
the simpleton, Job Pray, I left the town.
Impatient
do
I say impatient! borne along rather by
a tempest of passions that mocked the feebler
elements
,
we ventured too muchCecil, I was not
alone!
I know itI know it, she said, hurriedly,
though speaking barely above her breathyou
ventured too much?
And encountered a piquet that would not
mistake a royal officer for an impoverished,
though privileged idiot. In our anxiety we
overlooked
believe
me, dearest Cecil, that if you
knew allthe scene I had witnessedthe motives
which urgedthey, at least, would, justify this
strange and seeming desertion.
Did I doubt it, would I forget my
condition
,
my recent loss, and my sex, to follow in
the footsteps of one unworthy of my solicitude!
returned the bride, colouring as much with
innate
modesty, as with the power of her emotions.
Think not I come, with girlish weakness, to
reproach
you with any fancied wrongs! I am your
wife, Major Lincoln; and as such would I serve you,
at a moment when I know all the tenderness of the
tie will most be needed. At the altar, and in the
presence of my God, have I acknowledged the
sacred duty; and shall I hesitate to discharge it
because the eyes of man are on me!
I shall go mad!I shall go mad! cried
Lionel
,
in ungovernable mental anguish, as he paced
the floor, in violent disorder.There are
moments
when I think that the curse, which
destroyed
the father, has already lighted on the son!
Lionel! said the soft, soothing voice of his
companion, at his elbow, is this to render me
more happy!the welcome you bestow on the
confiding girl who has committed her happiness to
your keeping! I see you relent, and will be more
just to us both; more dutiful to your God!
Now let us speak of your confinement. Surely,
you are not suspected of any criminal designs in
this rash visit to the camp of the Americans!
'Twere easy to convince their leaders that you
are innocent of so base a purpose!
'Tis difficult to evade the vigilance of those
who struggle for liberty! returned the low,
calm voice of Ralph, who stood before them,
unexpectedly. Major Lincoln has too long
listened
to the councils of tyrants and slaves, and
forgotten the land of his birth. If he would be
safe, let him retract the error, while yet he may,
with honour.
Honour! repeated Lionel, with unconcealed
disdainagain pacing the room with swift and
uneasy steps, without deigning any other notice
of the unwelcome intruder. Cecil bowed her
head, and sinking in a chair, concealed her face
in her small muff, as if to exclude some horrid
and fearful sight from her view.
The momentary silence was broken by the
sound of footsteps and of voices in the passage;
and at the next instant the door of the room
opening
,
Meriton was seen on its threshold. His
appearance
roused Cecil, who springing on her
feet, beckoned him away, with a sort of
phrenzied
earnestness, exclaiming
Not here! not here!for the love of heaven,
not here!
The valet hesitated, but catching a glimpse of
his master, his attachment got the ascendency of
his respect
God be praised for this blessed sight, Master
Lionel! he cried'tis the happiest hour I have
seen since I lost the look at the shores of old
England! If 'twas only at Ravenscliffe, or in Soho,
I should be the most contented fool in the three
kingdoms! Ah, Master Lionel, let us get out of
this province, into a country where there is no
rebels; or any thing worse than King, Lords, and
Commons!
Enough now; for this time, worthy Meriton,
enough! interrupted Cecil, breathing with
difficulty
,
in her eagerness to be heard.Go
return
to the innthe collegesany wheredo but
go!
Don't send a loyal subject, Ma'am, again
among the rebels, I desire to entreat of you.
Such awful blasphemies, sir, as I heard while I
19*
was there! They spoke of his sacred majesty just
as freely, sir, as if he had been a gentleman, like
yourself. Joyful was the news of my release!
And had it been a guard-room on the
opposite
shore, said Ralph, the liberties they used
with your earthly monarch, would have been as
freely taken with the King of kings!
You shall remain then, said Cecil, probably
mistaking the look of high disdain which Meriton
bestowed on his aged fellow-voyager, for one of
a very different meaningbut not here. You
have other apartments, Major Lincoln; let my
attendants be received thereyou surely would
not admit the menials to our interview!
Why this sudden terror, love! Here, if not
happy, you at least are safe. Go, Meriton, into
the adjoining room; if wanted, there is admission
through this door of communication.
The valet murmured some half-uttered
sentences
,
of which only the emphatic word
genteel
was audible, while the direction of his
discontented
eye, sufficiently betrayed that Ralph
was the subject of his meditations. The old man
followed his footsteps, and the door of the
passage
soon closed on both, leaving Cecil standing,
like a beautiful statue, in an attitude of absorbed
thought. When the noise of her attendants, as
they quietly entered the adjoining room, was
heard, she breathed again, with a tremulous sigh,
that seemed to raise a weight of apprehension
from her heart.
Fear not for me, Cecil, and least of all for
yourself, said Lionel, drawing her to his bosom
with fond solicitudemy headlong rashness,
or, rather, that fatal bane to the happiness of my
house, the distempered feeling which you must
have often seen and deplored, has indeed led me
into a seeming danger. But I have a reason for my
conduct, which avowed, shall lull the suspicions
of even our enemies to sleep!
I have no suspicionsno knowledge of any
imperfectionsno regrets, Lionel; nothing but
the most ardent wishes for your peace of mind;
andif I might explain!yes, now is a time
Lionel, kind, but truant Lionel
Her words were interrupted by Ralph, who
appeared again in the room, with that noiseless
step, which, in conjunction with his great age and
attenuated frame, sometimes gave to his
movements
and aspect the character of a being
superior
to the attributes of humanity. On his arm
he bore an over-coat and a hat, both of which
Cecil recognized, at a glance, as the property of
the unknown man who had attended her person
throughout all the vicissitudes of that eventful
night.
See! said Ralph, exhibiting his spoils with
a ghastly, but meaning smile, see in how many
forms Liberty appears to aid her votaries! Here
is the guise in which she will now be courted!.
Wear them, young man, and be free!
Believe him notlisten not, whispered
Cecil
,
while she shrunk from his approach in
undisguised
terrornay, do listen, but act with
caution
!
Dost thou delay to receive the blessed boon
of freedom, when offered? demanded Ralph;
wouldst thou remain, and brave the angry
justice
of the American chief, and make thy wife, of
a day, a widow for an age!
In what manner am I to profit by this dress?
said Lionelto submit to the degradation of a
disguise, success should be certain.
Turn thy haughty eyes, young man, on the
picture of innocence and terror, at thy side. For
the sake of her whose fate is wrapped in thine, if
not for your own, consult thy safety, and fly
another
minute may be too late.
Oh! hesitate not a moment longer, Lincoln,
cried Cecil, with a change of purpose as sudden
as the impulse was powerfulfly, leave me;
my sex and station will be
Never, said Lionel, casting the garment from
him, in cool disdain.Once, when Death was
busy, did I abandon thee; but, ere I do it again,
his blow must fall on me!
I will followI will rejoin you.
You shall not part, said Ralph, once more
raising the rejected coat, and lending his aid to
envelop the form of Lionel, who stood passive
under the united efforts of his bride and her
aged assistantRemain here, the latter added,
when their brief task was ended, and await the
summons to freedom. And thou, sweet flower
of innocence and love, follow, and share in the
honour of liberating him who has enslaved
thee!
Cecil blushed with virgin shame, at the strength
of his expressions, but bowed her head in silent
acquiescence to his will. Proceeding to the door,
he beckoned her to approach, indicating, by an
expressive gesture to Lionel, that he was to
remain
stationary. When Cecil had complied,
and they were in the narrow passage of the
building
,
Ralph, instead of betraying any apprehension
of the sentinel who paced its length, fearlessly
approached, and addressed him with the
confidence
of a known friend
See! he said, removing the calash from
before the pale features of his companion, how
terror for the fate of her husband has caused
the good child to weep! She quits him now,
friend, with one of her attendants, while the
other tarries to administer to his master's wants.
Look at her; is't not a sweet, though
mourning
partner, to smooth the path of a soldier's
life.
The man seemed awkwardly sensible of the
unusual
charms that Ralph so unceremoniously
exhibited
to his view, and while he stood in admiring
embarrassment, ashamed to gaze, and yet
unwilling
to retire, Cecil traced the light footsteps of the
old man, entering the room occupied by Meriton
and the stranger. She was still in the act of
veiling
her features from the eyes of the sentinel,
when Ralph re-appeared, attended by a figure
muffled in the well-known over-coat.
Notwithstanding
the flopped hat, and studied
concealment
of his gait, the keen eyes of the wife
penetrated
the disguise of her husband, and
recollecting
,
at the same instant, the door of
communication
between the two apartments, the whole
artifice
was at once revealed. With trembling
eagerness she glided past the sentinel, and
pressed
to the side of Lionel, with a dependence that
might have betrayed the deception to one more
accustomed to the forms of life, than was the
honest
countrymen who had, so recently, thrown aside
the flail to carry a musket.
Ralph allowed the sentinel no time to
deliberate
,
but waving his hand in token of adieu, he
led the way into the street, with his
accustomed
activity. Here they found themselves in
the presence of the other soldier, who moved to
and fro, along the alloted ground in front of the
building, rendering the watchfulness by which they
were environed, doubly embarrassing.
Following
the example of their aged conductor, Lionel
and his trembling companion walked with
apparent
indifference towards this man, who, as it
proved, was better deserving of his trust than
his fellow, within doors. Dropping his musket
across their path, in a manner which announced
an intention to inquire into their movements,
before
he suffered them to proceed, he roughly
demanded
How's this, old gentleman! you come out of
the prisoners' rooms by squads! one, two, three;
our English gallant might be among you, and
there would still be two left! Come, come, old
father, render some account of yourself, and of
your command. For, to be plain with you, there
are those who think you are no better than a spy
of Howe's, notwithstanding you are left to run up
and down the camp, as you please. In plain
Yankee
dialect, and that's intelligible English, you
have been caught in bad company of late, and
there has been hard talk about shutting you up,
as well as your comrade!
Hear ye that! said Ralph, calmly smiling,
and addressing himself to his companions, instead
of the man whose interrogatories he was expected
to answerthink you the hirelings of the crown
are thus alert! Would not the slaves be sleeping
the moment the eyes of their tyrants are turned
on their own lawless pleasures! Thus it is with
Liberty! The sacred spirit hallows its meanest
votaries, and elevates the private to all the virtues
of the proudest captain!
Come, come, returned the flattered sentinel,
throwing his musket back to his shoulder again,
I believe a man gains nothing by battling you
with words! I should have spent a year or two
inside
yonder colleges to dive at all your meaning.
Though I can guess you are more than half-right
in one thing; for if a poor fellow who loves his
country, and the good cause, finds it so hard to
keep his eyes open on post, what must it be to a
half-starved devil on six-pence a-day! Go along,
go along, old father; there is one less of you than
went in, and if there was any thing wrong, the
man in the house should know it!
As he concluded, the sentinel continued his
walk, humming a verse of Yankee-doodle, in
excellent
favour with himself and all mankind, with
the sweeping exception of his country's enemies.
To say that this was not the first instance of
well-meaning integrity being cajoled by the
jargon
of liberty, might be an assertion too
hazardous
;
but that it has not been the last, we
conscientiously
believe, though no immediate
example
may present itself to quote in support of such
heretical credulity.
Ralph appeared, however, perfectly innocent
of intending to utter more than the spirit of the
times justified; for, when left to his own pleasure,
he pursued his way, muttering rapidly to himself,
and with an earnestness that attested his sincerity.
When they had turned a corner, at a little distance
from any pressing danger, he relaxed in his
movements
,
and suffering his eager companions to
approach
,
he stole to the side of Lionel, and
clenching
his hand fiercely, he whispered in a voice
half choked by inward exultation
I have him now? he is no longer dangerous!
AyayI have him closely watched by the
vigilance of three incorruptible patriots!
Of whom speak you, demanded Lionel
what is his offence, and where is your captive?
A dog! a man in form, but a tiger in heart!
Ay! but I have him! the old man continued,
with a hollow laugh, that seemed to heave up
from his inmost soula dog; a veritable dog!
I have him, and God grant that he may drink of
the cup of slavery to its dregs!
Old man, said Lionel, firmly, that I have
followed you thus far on no unworthy errand,
you best may testifyI have forgotten the oath
which, at the altar, I had sworn to, to cherish
this sweet and spotless being at my side, at your
instigation, aided by the maddening
circumstances
of a moment; but the delusion has
already passed away! Here we part for ever,
unless your solemn and often-repeated promises
are, on the instant, redeemed.
The high exultation which had, so lately,
rendered the emaciated countenance of Ralph
hideously ghastly, disappeared like a passing
shadow, and he listened to the words of
Lionel
with calm and settled attention. But when
he would have answered, he was interrupted by
Cecil, who uttered, in a voice nearly suppressed
by her fears
Oh! delay not a moment! Let us proceed;
any where, or any-how! even now the
pursuers
may be on our track. I am strong,
dearest
Lionel, and will follow to the ends of the
earth, so you but lead!
Lionel Lincoln, I have not deceived thee!
said the old man, solemnly. Providence has
already led us on our way, and a few minutes will
bring us to our goalsuffer, then, that gentle
trembler to return into the village, and follow!
Not an inch! returned Lionel, pressing
Cecil still closer to his sidehere we part, or
your promises are fulfilled.
Nay, go with himgo, again whispered the
being who clung to him in trembling dependence.
This very controversy may prove your ruin
did I not say I would accompany you,
Lincoln
?
Lead on, then, said her husband,
motioning
Ralph to proceedonce again will I
confide
in you; but use the trust with discretion,
for my guardian spirit is at hand, and remember,
thou no longer leadest a lunatic!
The moon fell upon the wan features of the
old man, and exhibited their contented smile, as
he silently turned away, and resumed his
progress
with his wonted, rapid, and noiseless tread.
Their route still lay towards the skirts of the
village. While the buildings of the University
were yet in the near view, and the loud laugh of
the idlers about the inn, with the frequent
challenges of the sentinels, were still distinctly
audible, their conductor bent his way beneath
the walls of a church, that rose in solemn
solitude
in the deceptive light of the evening.
Pointing upward at its somewhat unusual,
because
regular architecture, Ralph muttered as he
passed
Here, at least, God possesses his own,
without
insult!
Lionel and Cecil slightly glanced their eyes
at the silent walls, and followed into a small
enclosure
,
through a gap in its humble and
dilapidated
fence. Here the former again paused,
and spoke
I will go no further, he said, unconsciously
strengthening the declaration by placing his foot
firmly on a mound of frozen earth, in an attitude
of resistance'tis time to cease thinking of
'self, and to listen to the weakness of her whom
I support!
Think not of me, dearest Lincoln
Cecil was interrupted by the voice of the old
man, who raising his hat, and baring his gray
locks to the mild rays of the planet, answered,
with tremulous emotion
Thy task is already ended! Thou hast
reached
the spot where moulder the bones of one who
long supported thee. Unthinking boy, that
sacrilegious
foot treads on thy mother's grave!
VOL. II. 20
CHAPTER XVI.
Oh, age has weary days,
And nights o' sleepless pain!
Thou golden time o' youthful prime,
Why com'st thou not again.
Burns
.
The
stillness that succeeded this unexpected
annunciation was like the cold silence of those
who slumbered on every side of them. Lionel
recoiled, a pace, in horror; then imitating the
action of the old man, he uncovered his head,
in pious reverence of the parent, whose form
floated dimly in his imagination, like the
earliest
recollections of infancy, or the imperfect
fancies of some dream. When time was given
for these sudden emotions to subside, he turned
to Ralph, and said
And was it here that you would bring me, to
listen to the sorrows of my family?
An expression of piteous auguish crossed the
features of the other, as he answered, in a voice
which was subdued to softness
Even herehere, in the presence of thy
mother's grave, shalt thou hear the tale!
Then let it be here! said Lionel, whose
eye was already kindling with a wild and
disordered
meaning, that curdled the blood of the
anxious Cecil, who watched its expression with
a woman's solicitude.Here, on this hallowed
spot, will I listen, and swear the vengeance that is
due, if all thy previous intimations should be
just
No, no, nolisten nottarry not! said
Cecil
,
clinging to his side in undisguised alarm
Lincoln, you are not equal to the scene!
I am equal to any thing, in such a cause.
Nay, Lionel, you overrate your powers!
Think only of your safety, now; at another, and
happier moment you shall know allyesI
Cecilthy bride, thy wife, promise that all shall
be revealed
Thou!
It is the descendant of the widow of John
Lechmere who speaks, and thy ears will not
refuse
the sounds, said Ralph, with a smile that
acted like a taunt on the awakened impulses of
the young manGothou art fitter for a bridal
than a church-yard!
I have told you that I am equal to any thing,
sternly answered Lionel; here will I sit, on
this humble tablet, to hear all that you can utter,
though the rebel legions encircle me to my
death!
What! dar'st brave the averted eye of one so
dear to thy heart!
All, or any thing, exclaimed the excited
youth, with so pious an object.
Bravely answered! and thy reward is nigh
nay, look not on the syren, or thou wilt relent.
My wife, said Lionel, extending his hand,
kindly, towards the shrinking form of Cecil.
Thy mother! interrupted Ralph, pointing
with his emaciated hand to the cold residence of
the dead.
Lionel sunk on the dilapidated grave-stone to
which he had just alluded, and gathering his coat
about him, he rested an arm upon his knee,
while its hand supported his quivering chin,
as if he were desperately bent on his gloomy
purpose. The old man smiled with his usual
ghastly expression, as he witnessed this proof of his
success, and he took a similar seat on the
opposite
side of the grave, which seemed the focus of
their common interest. Here he dropped his
face between his hands, and appeared to muse
like one who was collecting his thoughts for the
coming emergency. During this short and
impressive
pause, Lionel felt the trembling form of
Cecil drawing to his side, and before his aged
companion spoke, her unveiled and pallid
countenance
was once more watching the changes of
his own features, in submissive, but anxious
attention
.
Thou knowest already, Lionel Lincoln,
commenced Ralph, slowly raising his body to an
upright attitude, how, in past ages, thy family
sought these colonies, to find religious quiet, and
the peace of the just. And thou also
knowest
,
for often did we beguile the long watches
of the night in discoursing of these things, while
the never-tiring ocean was rolling its waters,
unheeded
around, how Death came into its elder
branch, which still dwelt amid the luxury and
corruption of the English Court, and left thy
father the heir of all its riches and honours.
How much of this is unknown to the meanest
gossip in the province of Massachusetts-Bay!
interrupted the impatient Lionel.
But they do not know, that for years before
this accumulation of fortune actually occurred,
it was deemed to be inevitable by the decrees
of Providence; they do not know how much
more value the orphan son of the unprovided
soldier, found in the eyes of those even of his
own blood, by the expectation; nor do they know
how the worldly-minded Priscilla Lechmere,
thy father's aunt, would have compassed heaven
and earth, to have seen that wealth, and those
honours, to which it was her greatest boast to
claim alliance descend in the line of her own
body.
But 'twas impossible! she was of the female
branch; neither had she a son!
Nothing seems impossible to those on whose
peace of mind the worm of ambition feeds
thou knowest well she left a grand-child; had
not that child a mother!
Lionel felt a painful conviction of the
connection
,
as the trembling object of these
remarks
sunk her head in shame and sorrow on
his bosom, keenly alive to the justice of the
character drawn of her deceased relative, by
the mysterious being who had just spoken.
God forbid that I, a Christian, and a
gentleman
,
continued the old man, a little proudly,
should utter a syllable to taint the spotless name
of one so free from blemish as she of whom I speak.
The sweet child who clings to thee, in dread,
Lionel, was not more pure and innocent than she
who bore her. And long before ambition had
wove its toils for the miserable Priscilla, the heart
of her daughter was the property of the gallant
and honourable Englishman, to whom in later
years she was wedded.
As Cecil heard this soothing commendation
of her more immediate parents, she again raised
her face into the light of the moon, and
remained
,
where she was already kneeling, at the side
of Lionel, no longer an uneasy, but a deeply
interested listener to what followed.
As the wishes of my unhappy aunt were not
realized, said Major Lincoln, in what
manner
could they affect the fortunes of my father?
20*
Thou shalt hear. In the same dwelling
lived
another, even fairer, and, to the eye, as pure
as the daughter of Priscilla. She was the relative,
the god-child, and the ward of that miserable
woman. The beauty, and seeming virtues of this
apparent angel in human form, caught the young
eye of thy father, and in defiance of arts and
schemes, before the long-expected title and
fortune
came, they were wedded, and thou wert
born, Lionel, to render the boon of Fate doubly
welcome.
And then
And then thy father hastened to the land of
his ancestors, to claim his own, and to prepare the
way for the reception of yourself, and his
beloved
Priscillafor then there were two Pris
cilla's; and now both sleep with the dead!
All having life and nature, can claim the quiet of
the grave, but I, continued the old man,
glancing
his hollow eye upward, with a look of
hopeless
miseryI, who have seen ages pass since
the blood of youth has been chilled, and
generation
after generation swept away, must still linger
in the haunts of men! but 'tis to aid in the great
work which commences here, but which shall not
end until a continent be regenerate.
Lionel suffered a minute to pass without a
question, in deference to this burst of feeling;
but soon making an impatient movement, it
drew the eyes of Ralph once more upon him,
and the old man continued
Month after month, for two long and tedious
years, did thy father linger in England,
struggling
for his own. At length he prevailed. He
then hastened hither; but there was no wifeno
fond and loving Priscilla, like that tender flower
that reposes in thy bosom, to welcome his return
I know it, said Lionel, nearly choked by
his pious recollectionsshe was dead.
She was more, returned Ralph, in a voice
so deep that it sounded like one speaking from
the graveshe was dishonoured!
'Tis false!
'Tis true; true as that holy gospel which
comes to men through the inspired ministers of
God!
'Tis false, repeated Lionel, fiercely
blacker than the darkest thoughts of the foul
spirit of evil!
I say, rash boy, 'tis true! She died in giving
birth to the fruits of her infamy. When
Priscilla
Lechmere met thy heart-stricken parent
with the damming tale, he read in her exulting
eye, the treason of her mind, and, like thee, he
dared to call heaven to witness, that thy mother
was defamed. But there was one known to him,
under circumstances that forbad the thoughts of
deceit, who sworeay, took the blessed name
of Him who reads all hearts, for warranty of her
truth!and she confirmed it.
The infamous seducer! said Lionel,
hoarsely
,
his body turning unconsciously away from
Cecildoes he yet live? Give him to my
vengeance
,
old man, and I will yet bless you for your
accursed history!
Lionel, Lionel, said the soothing voice of
his bride, do you credit him?
Credit him! said Ralph, with a horrid,
inward
laugh, as if he would deride the idea of
incredulity
;
all this must he believe, and more!
Once again, weak girl, did thy grandmother throw
out her lures for the wealthy baronet, and when
he would not become her son, then did she league
with the spirits of hell to compass his ruin.
Revenge
took place of ambition, and thy husband's
father was the victim!
Say on! cried Lionel, nearly ceasing to
breathe in the intensity of his interest.
The blow had cut him to the heart, and for a
time, his reason was crushed beneath its weight.
Yet 'twas but for an hour, compared to the
eternity
a man is doomed to live! They profited by
the temporary derangement, and when his
wandering
faculties were lulled to quiet, he found
himself the tenant of a mad-house, where, for
twenty long years, was he herded with the defaced
images of his maker, by the arts of the base
widow of John Lechmere.
Can this be true! Can this be true! cried
Lionel, clasping his hands wildly, and springing
to his feet, with a violence that cast the tender
form that still clung to him, aside, like a
worthless
toyCan this be proved? How knowest
thou these facts?
The calm, but melancholy smile that was wont
to light the wan features of the old man, when
he alluded to his own existence, was once more
visible, as he answered
There is but little hid from the knowledge
acquired by length of days; besides, have I not
secret means of intelligence that are unknown to
thee! Remember what, in our frequent interviews,
I have revealed; recall the death-bed scene of
Priscilla Lechmere, and ask thyself if there be not
truth in thy aged friend!
Give me all! hold not back a title of thy
accursed talegive me allor take back each
syllable thou hast uttered.
Thou shalt have all thou askest, Lionel
Lincoln
,
and more, returned Ralph, throwing into
his manner and voice its utmost powers of
solemnity
and persuasionprovided thou wilt swear
eternal hatred to that country and those laws, by
which an innocent and unoffending man can be
levelled with the beasts of the field, and be made
to rave even at his maker, in the hitterness of his
sufferings.
More than thatten thousand times more
than that will I swearI will league with this
rebellion
Lionel, Lionelwhat is't you do!
interrupted
the heart-stricken Cecil.
But her voice was stilled by loud and busy
cries, which broke out of the village, above
the hum of revelry, and was instantly succeeded
by the trampling of footsteps, as men rushed over
the frozen ground, apparently by hundreds, and
with headlong rapidity. Ralph, who was not less
quick to hear these sounds than the timid bride,
glided from the grave, and approached the
high-way
,
whither he was slowly followed by his
companions; Lionel utterly indifferent whither he
proceeded, and Cecil trembling in every limb,
with terror for the safety of him who so little
regarded his own danger.
They are abroad, and think to find an
enemy
,
said the old man, raising his hand with a
gesture to command attention; but he has
sworn to join their standards, and gladly will
they receive any of his name and family!
No, nohe has pledged himself to no
dishonour
,
cried CecilFly, Lincoln, while you
are free, and leave me to meet the pursuers
they will respect my weakness.
Fortunately the allusion to herself awakened
Lionel from the dull forgetfulness into which his
faculties had fallen. Encircling her slight figure
with his arm, he turned swiftly from the spot,
saying, as he urged her forward
Old man, when this precious charge is in
safety, thy truth or falsehood shall be proved.
But Ralph, whose unincumbered person, and
iron frame, which seemed to mock the ravages
of time, gave a vast superiority over the impeded
progress of the other, moved swiftly ahead,
waving his hand on high, as if to indicate his
intention
to join in the flight, while he led the way
into the fields adjacent to the church-yard they
had quitted.
The noise of the pursuers soon became more
distinct, and in the intervals of the distant
cannonade
,
the cries and directions of those who
conducted
the chase were distinctly audible.
Notwithstanding
the vigorous arm of her supporter,
Cecil was soon sensible that her delicate frame was
unequal to continue the exertions necessary to
insure
their safety. They had entered another road,
which lay at no great distance from the first,
when she paused, and reluctantly declared her
inability to proceed.
Then, here will we await our captors, said
Lionel, with forced composurelet the rebels
beware how they abuse their slight advantage!
The words were scarcely uttered, when a cart,
drawn by a double team, turned an angle in the
highway, near them, and its driver appeared
within a few feet of the spot where they stood.
He was a man far advanced in years, but still
wielded his long goad with a dexterity which
had been imparted by the practice of more than
half a century. The sight of this man, alone,
and removed from immediate aid, suggested a
desperate thought for self-preservation to Lionel.
Quitting the side of his exhausted companion, he
advanced upon him with an air so fierce that it
might have created alarm in one who had the
smallest reason to apprehend any danger.
Whither go you with that cart, sternly
demanded
the young man, on the instant.
To the point, was the ready answer; yes,
yesold and youngbig and littlemen and
cre'turs
four-wheels
and two-wheelsevery thing
goes to the point to-night, as you can guess, fri'nd!
Why, he continued, dropping one end of his
goad on the ground, and supporting himself by
grasping it with both his handsI was
eighty-three
the fourteenth of the last March, and I hope,
God willing, that when the next birth-day comes,
there wont be a red coat left in the town of
Boston
.
To my notion, friend, they have held the
place long enough, and it's time to quit. My
boys are in the camp, soldiering a turnthe old
woman has been as busy as a bee, sin' sun-down,
helping me to load-up what you see, and I am
carrying it over to Dorchester, and not a farthing
shall it ever cost the Congress!
And you are going to Dorchester-neck with
your bundles of hay! said Lionel, eyeing both
him and his passing team, in hesitation whether
to attempt violence on one so infirm and
helpless
.
Anan! you must speak up, soldier-fashion,
as you did at first, for I am a little deaf,
returned
the carter. Yes, yes, they spared me in
the press, for they said I had done enough; but
I say a man has never done enough for his own
country, when any thing is left to be done. I'm
told they are carrying over fashines, as they call
'em, and pressed-hay, for their forts.As hay is
more in my fashion than any other fashion, I've
bundled up a stout pile on't here, and if that wont
do, why, let Washington come; he is welcome
to the barn, stacks and all!
While you are so liberal to the Congress, can
you help a female in distress, who would wish to
go in the direction of your route, but is too feeble
to walk?
With all my heart, said the other, turning
round in quest of her whom he was desired to
assistI hope she is handy; for the night wears
on, and I shouldn't like to have the English send
a bullet at our people on Dorchester hills, before
my hay gets there to help stop it.
She shall not detain you an instant, said
Lionel, springing to the place where Cecil stood,
partly concealed by the fence, and supporting
her to the side of the rude vehicleyou shall
be amply rewarded for this service.
Reward! Perhaps she is the wife or daughter
of a soldier, in which case she should be drawn
in her coach and four, instead of a cart and double
team.
Yes, yesyou are right, she is boththe
wife of one, and the daughter of another soldier.
Ay! God bless her! I warrant-me old Put
was more than half-right, when he said the women
would stop the two ridgements, that the proud
parliamenter
boasted could march through the
colonies
,
from Hampshire to Georgi'well, fri'nds,
are ye situated?
Perfectly, said Lionel, who had been
preparing
seats for himself and Cecil among the
bundles
of hay, and assisting his companion into her
place during the dialoguewe will detain you
no longer.
The carter, who was no less than the owner of
a hundred acres of good land in the vicinity,
signified
his readiness, and sweeping through the air
with his goad, he brought his cattle to the proper
direction, and slowly moved on. During this
hurried scene, Ralph had continued hid by the
shadows of the fence. When the cart
proceeded
,
he waved his hand, and gliding across the
road, was soon lost to the eye in the misty
distance
,
with which his gray apparel blended, like
a spectre vanishing in air.
In the mean time the pursuers had not been
idle. Voices were heard in different directions, and
dim forms were to be seen rushing through the
fields, by the aid of the deceptive light of the
moon. To add to the embarrassment of their
situation, Lionel found, when too late, that the
route to Dorchester lay directly through the
village of Cambridge. When he perceived they
were approaching the streets, he would have left
the cart, had not the experiment been too
dangerous
,
in the midst of the disturbed soldiery,
who now flew by on every side of them. In such a
strait, his safest course was to continue motionless
and silent, secreting his own form, and that of
Cecil, as much as possible, among the bundles of
hay. Contrary to all the just expectations which
the impatient patriotism of the old yeoman had
excited, instead of driving steadily through the
place, he turned his cattle a little from the direct
route, and stopped in front of the very inn, where
Cecil had, so lately, been conducted by her guide
from the point.
Here the same noisy and thoughtless revelry
existed
as before. The arrival of such an`equipage,
at once drew a crowd to the spot, and the uneasy
pair on the top of the load, became unwilling
listeners
to the conversation.
What, old one, hard at it for Congress!
cried a man, approaching with a mug in his hand;
come, wet your throat, my venerable father of
Liberty, for you are too old to be a son!
Yes, yes, answered the exulting farmer,
I am father and son, too! I have four boys in
camp, and seven grand'uns, in the bargain; and
that would be eleven good triggers in one family,
if five good muskets had so many locksbut the
VOL. II. 21
youngest men have got a ducking-gun, and a
double
barrel atween them, howsomever; and Aaron
the boy, carries as good a horse-pistol, I calculate,
as any there is going in the Bay! But what an
uneasy
time you have on't to-night! There's more
powder wasted in mocking thunder, than would
fight old Bunker over again, at `white o' the eye'
distance!
'Tis the way of war, old man; and we want to
keep the reg'lars from looking at Dorchester.
If they did, they couldn't see far to-night,
But, now do tell me; I am an old man, and have
a grain of cur'osity in the flesh; my woman says
that Howe casts out his carcasses at you; which I
hold to be an irreligious deception?
As true as the gospel.
Well, there is no calculating on the
wastefulness
of an ungodly spirit! said the worthy
yeoman, shaking his headI could believe any
wickedness of him but that! As cre'turs must
be getting scarce in the town, I conclude he makes
use of his own slain?
Certain, answered the soldier, winking at
his companionsBreed's hill has kept him in
ammunition all winter.
'Tis awful, awful! to see a fellow-cre'tur
flying through the air, after the spirit has
departed
to judgment! War is a dreadful calling; but,
then, what is a man without liberty!
Hark ye, old gentleman, talking of flying,
have you seen any thing of two men and a woman,
flying up the road as you came in?
Anan! I'm a little hard o'hearingwomen,
too! do they shoot their Jezebels into our camp!
There is no wickedness the king's ministers wont
attempt to circumvent our weak naturs!
Did you see two men and a woman, running
away as you came down the road? bawled the
fellow in his ear.
Two! did you say two? asked the yeoman,
turning his head a little on one side, in an attitude
of sagacious musing.
Yes, two men.
No, I didn't see two. Running out of town,
did you say?
Ay, running, as if the devil was after them.
No; I didn't see two; nor any body running
awayit's a sartain sight of guilt to run away
is there any reward offered? said the old man,
suddenly interrupting himself, and again
communing
with his own thoughts.
Not yetthey've just escaped.
The surest way to catch a thief is to offer a
smart rewardnoI didn't see two menyou
are sartain there was two?
Push on with that cart! drive on, drive on,
cried a mounted officer of the quarter-master's
department, who came scouring through the street,
at that moment, awakening all the slumbering ideas
of haste, which the old farmer had suffered to lie
dormant so long. Once more flourishing his goad,
he put his team in motion, wishing the revellers
goodnight as he proceeded. It was, however,
long after he had left the village, and crossed the
Charles, before he ceased to make frequent and
sudden halts in the highway, as if doubtful whether
to continue his route, or to return. At length
he stopped the cart, and clambering up on the
hay, he took a seat, where with one eye he could
regulate his cattle, and with the other examine
his companions. This investigation continued
another
hour, neither party uttering a syllable, when
the teamster appeared satisfied that his suspicions
were unjust, and abandoned them. Perhaps the
difficulties of the road assisted in dissipating his
doubts, for as they proceeded, return carts were
met at every few rods, rendering his undivided
attention to his own team indispensable.
Lionel, whose gloomy thoughts had been
chased
from his mind by the constant excitement of
the foregoing scenes, now felt relieved from
any immediate apprehensions. He whispered his
soothing hopes of a final escape to Cecil, and
folding her in his coat, to shield her from the
night-air, he was pleased to find, ere long, by her
gentle breathing, that, overcome by fatigue, she
was slumbering in forgetfulness on his bosom.
Midnight had long passed when they came in
sight of the eminences beyond Dorchester-neck.
Cecil had awoke, and Lionel was already devising
some plausible excuse for quitting the cart,
without
reviving the suspicions of the teamster. At
length a favourable spot occurred, where they
were alone, and the formation of the ground was
adapted to such a purpose. Lionel was on the point
of speaking, when the cattle stopped, and Ralph
suddenly appeared in the highway, at their heads.
Make room, friend, for the oxen, said the
farmerdumb beasts wont pass in the face of
man.
Alight, said Ralph, seconding his words
with a wide sweep of his arm towards the fields.
Lionel quickly obeyed, and by the time the
driver had descended also, the whole party stood
together in the road.
You have conferred a greater obligation than
you are aware of, said Lionel to the driver.
Here are five guineas.
For what? for riding on a load of hay a few
miles!no, nokindness is no such boughten
article
in the Bay, that a man need pay for it! but,
friend, money seems plenty with you, for these
difficult days!
Then thanks, a thousand timesI can stay
to offer you no more.
He was yet speaking, when, obedient to an
impatient
gesture from Ralph, he lifted Cecil over
the fence, and in a moment they disappeared
from the eyes of the astonished farmer.
Halloo, friend, cried the worthy advocate
for his country, running after them as fast as old
age would allowwere there three of you, when
I took ye up?
The fugitives heard the call of the simple
and garrulous old man, but, as will easily be
imagined, did not deem it prudent to stop and
discuss the point in question between them.
Before
they had gone far, the furious cry of, take
care of that team! with the rattling of wheels,
announced that their pursuer was recalled to his
duty, by an arrival of empty wagons; and before
the distance rendered sounds unintelligible, they
heard the noisy explanation, which their late
companion was giving to the others, of the whole
transaction. They were not, however,
pursued
;
the teamsters having more pressing objects
in view than the detection of thieves, or even of
pocketing a reward.
Ralph led his companions, after a brief
explanation
,
by a long and circuitous path, to the
shores of the bay. Here they found, hid in the
rushes of a shallow inlet, a small boat, that Lionel
recognised as the little vessel in which Job Pray
was wont to pursue his usual avocation of a
fisherman
.
Entering it without delay, he seized the
oars, and aided by a flowing tide, he industriously
urged it towards the distant spires of Boston.
The parting shades of the night were yet
struggling
with the advance of day, when a powerful
flash of light illuminated the hazy horizon, and
the roar of cannon, which had ceased towards
morning, was again heard. But this time the
sounds came from the water, and a cloud rose
above the smoking harbour, announcing that the
21*
ships were again enlisted in the contest. This
sudden cannonade induced Lionel to steer his
boat between the islands; for the castle, and
southern batteries of the town, were all soon
united
in pouring out their vengeance on the
labourers
,
who still occupied the heights of Dorchester.
As the little vessel glided by a tall frigate, Cecil saw
the boy who had been her first escort in the
wanderings
of the preceding night, standing on its
taffrail, rubbing his eyes with wonder, and staring
at those hills, whose possession he had prophesied
would lead to such bloody results. In short,
while he laboured at the oars, Lionel
witnessed
the opening scene of Breed's acted anew, as
battery after battery, and ship after ship, brought
their guns to bear on the hardy countrymen
who had, once more, hastened a crisis by their
daring enterprise. Their boat passed
unheeded
,
in the excitement and bustle of the moment,
and the mists of the morning had not yet
dissipated
,
when it shot by the wharves of Boston,
and turning into the narrow entrance of the
town-dock
,
it touched the land, near the warehouse,
where it had so often been moored, in more
peaceable
times, by its simple master.
CHAPTER XVII.
Now cracks a noble heart;good-night,
Sweet Prince.
Shakspeare
.
Lionel
assisted Cecil to ascend the difficult
water-stairs, and still attended by their aged
companion, they soon stood on the drawbridge
that connected the piers which formed the mouth
of the narrow basin.
Here we again part, he said, addressing
himself to Ralph; at another opportunity let
us resume your melancholy tale.
None so fitting as the present: the time, the
place, and the state of the town, are all
favourable
.
Lionel cast his eyes around on the dull misery
which pervaded the neglected area. A few
half-dressed
soldiers and alarmed townsmen, were
seen by the gray light of the morning, rushing
across the square towards the point, whence the
sounds of cannon proceeded. In the hurry of the
moment, their own arrival was not noted.
The placethe time! he slowly repeated.
Ay, both. At what moment can the friend
of liberty pass more unheeded, amongst these
miscreant hirelings, than now, when fear has
broken their slumbers! You is the place,
he said, pointing to the warehouse, where all
that I have uttered will find its confirmation.
Major Lincoln communed momentarily with his
thoughts. It is probable that in the rapid glances
of his mind, he traced the mysterious connexion
between the abject tenant of the adjacent
building
,
and the deceased grandmother of his bride,
whose active agency in producing the calamities
of his family had now been openly
acknowledged
.
It was soon apparent that he wavered in his
purpose, nor was he slow to declare it.
I will attend you, he said; for who can
say what the hardihood of the rebels may next
attempt, and future occasions may be wanting.
I will first see this gentle charge of mine
Lincoln, I cannotmust not leave you,
interrupted Cecil, with earnest fervourgo,
listen, and learn all; surely there can be
nothing
that a wife may not know!
Without waiting for further objection, Ralph
made a hurried gesture of compliance, and
turning
,
he led the way, with his usual, swift
footsteps
,
into the low and dark tenement of Abigail
Pray. The commotion of the town had not yet
reached this despised and neglected building,
which was even more than ordinarily gloomy and
still. As they picked their way, however, among
the scattered hemp, across the scene of the
preceding
night's riot, a few stifled groans proceeded
from one of the towers, and directed them where
to seek its abused and suffering inmates. On
opening the door of this little apartment, not
only Lionel and Cecil paused, but even the
immovable old man, appeared to hesitate, in
wonder.
The heart stricken mother of the simpleton
was seated on her humble stool, busied in
repairing
some mean and worthless garments which
had, seemingly, been exposed to the wasteful
carelessness
of her reckless child. But while her fingers
performed their functions with mechanical skill,
her contracted brow, working muscles, and hard,
dry eyes, betrayed the force of the mental
suffering
that she struggled to conceal. Job still lay
stretched on his abject pallet, though his breathing
was louder and more laboured than when we last
left him, while his sunken features indicated the
slow, but encroaching advances of the disease.
Polwarth was seated at his side, holding a pulse,
with an air of medical deliberation; and
attempting
,
every few moments, to confirm his hopes or
fears, as each preponderated in turn, by
examining
the glazed eyes of the subject of his care.
Upon a party thus occupied, and with feelings
so much engrossed, even the sudden entrance of
the intruders was not likely to make any very
sensible
impression. The languid and unmeaning
look of Job wandered momentarily towards the
door, and then became again fixed on vacancy.
A gleam of joy shot into the honest visage of the
captain when he first beheld Lionel,
accompanied
by Cecil, but it was instantly chased away
by the settled meaning of care which had gotten
the mastery of his usually coutented expression.
The greatest alteration was produced in the
aspect of the woman, who bowed her head to
her bosom, with a universal shudder of her frame,
as Ralph stood unexpectedly before her. But from
her also, the sudden emotion passed speedily
away, her hands resuming their humble
occupation
,
with the same mechanical and involuntary
movements, as before.
Explain this scene of silent sorrow! said
Eionel to his friendhow came you in this
haunt of wretchedness, and who has harmed the
lad?
Your question conveys its own answer, Major
Lincoln, returned Polwarth, with a manner so
deliberate, that he refused to raise his steady look
from the face of the suffererI am here, because
they are wretched!
The motive is commendable! but what aileth
the youth?
The functions of nature seem suspended by
some remarkable calamity! I found him suffering
from inanition, and notwithstanding I applied as
hearty and nutritious a meal as the strongest man
in the garrison could require, the symptoms, as
you see, are strangely threatening!
He has taken the contagion of the town, and
you have fed him, when his fever was at the
highest!
Is small-pox to be considered more than a
symptom, when a man has the damnable disease of
starvation! go togo to, Leo, you read the
Latin
poets so much at the schools, that no leisure is
left to bestow on the philosophy of nature. There
is an inward monitor that teaches every child the
remedy for hunger.
Lionel felt no disposition to contend with his
friend on a point where the other's opinions were
so dogmatical, but turning to the woman, he
said
The experience of a professional nurse should
have taught you, at least, more care.
Can experience steel a mother to the
yearnings
of her offspring for food! returned the
forlorn
Abigailno, nothe ear cannot be deaf to
such a moaning, and wisdom is as folly when the
heart bleeds.
Lincoln, you chide unkindly, said Cecil
let us rather attempt to avert the danger, than
quarrel with its cause.
It is too lateit is too late, returned the
disconsolate mother; his hours are already
numbered, and Death is on him. I can now
only pray that God will lighten his curse, and
suffer the parting spirit to know his Almighty
power.
Throw aside these worthless rags, said
Cecil
,
gently attempting to take the clothes, nor
fatigue yourself longer, at such a sacred moment,
with unnecessary labour.
Young lady, you little know a mother's
longings
;
may you never know her sorrows! I have
been doing for the child these seven-and-twenty
years; rob me not of the pleasure, now that so
little
remains to be done.
Is he then so old! exclaimed Lionel, in
surprise.
Old as he is, 'tis young for a child to die!
He wants the look of reason; heaven in its mercy
grant that he may be found to have a face of
innocence
!
Hitherto Ralph had remained where he first
stood, as if riveted to the floor, with his eyes
fastened
on the countenance of the sufferer. He now
turned to Lionel, and in a voice rendered even
plaintive by his deep emotion, he asked the
simple
question
Will he die?
I fear itthat look is not easily to be
mistaken
.
With a step so light that it was inaudible, the
old man moved to the bed, and seated himself on
the side, opposite to Polwarth. Without
regarding
the wondering look of the captain, he waved
his hand on high, as if to exhort to silence, and
then gazing on the features of the sick, with
melancholy
interest, he said
Here, then, is death again! None are so
young as to be unheeded; 'tis only the old that
cannot die. Tell me, Job, what seest thou in the
visions of thy mindthe unknown places of the
damned, or the brightness of such as stand in
presence of their God?
At the well-known sound of his voice, the
glazed eye of the simpleton lighted with a ray of
reason, and was turned towards the speaker, once
more, teeming with a look of meek assurance. The
rattling in his throat, for a moment, increased,
and then ceased entirely; when a voice so deep,
that it appeared to issue from the depths of his
chest, was heard, saying
The Lord wont harm him who never harm'd
the creaturs of the Lord?
Emperors and kings, yea, the great of the
earth, might envy thee thy lot, thou unknown
child of wretchedness! returned Ralphnot
yet thirty years of probation, and already thou
throwest aside the clay! Like thee did I grow to
manhood, and learn how hard it is to live; but
like thee I cannot die!Tell me, boy, dost thou
enjoy the freedom of the spirit, or hast thou still
pain and pleasure in the flesh? Dost see beyond
the tomb, and trace thy route through the
pathless
air, or is all yet hid in the darkness of the
grave?
Job is going where the Lord has hid his
reason
,
answered the same hollow voice as before;
his prayers wont be foolish any longer.
Pray, then, for one aged and forlorn; who
has borne the burden of life 'till Death has
forgotten
him, and who wearies of the things of earth,
where all is treachery and sin. But stay, depart
not, 'till thy spirit can bear the signs of repentance
from yon sinful woman, into the regions of day.
Abigail groaned aloud; her hands again
refused
their occupation, and her head once more sunk
on her bosom in abject misery. From this
posture
of self-abasement and grief, the woman
raised
herself to her feet, and putting aside the
careless
tresses of dark hair, which, though, here and
there, streaked with gray, retained much of their
youthful gloss, she looked about her with a face
so haggard, and eyes so full of meaning, that the
common attention was instantly attracted to her
movements.
The time has come, and neither fear nor
shame shall longer tie my tongue, she said.
The hand of providence is too manifest in this
assemblage around the death-bed of that boy, to
be unheeded. Major Lincoln, in that stricken
and helpless child, you see one who shares your
blood, though he has ever been a stranger to your
happiness. Job is your brother!
Grief has maddened her! exclaimed the
anxious
Cecilshe knows not what she utters.
'Tis true! said the calm tones of Ralph.
Listen, continued Abigail; a terrible
witness
,
sent hither by heaven, speaks to attest I tell
no lie. The secret of my transgression is known
to him, when I had thought it buried in the
affection
of one only who owed me every thing.
Woman! said Lionel, in attempting to
deceive me, you deceive yourself. Though a voice
from heaven should declare the truth of thy
damnable
tale, still would I deny that foul object being
the child of my beauteous mother.
Foul and wretched as you see him, he is the
offspring of one not less fair, though far less
fortunate
,
than thy own boasted parent, proud child
of Prosperity! call on heaven as thou wilt, with
that blasphemous tongue, he is no less thy
brother
,
and the elder born.
'Tis true'tis true'tis most solemnly a
truth! repeated the unmoved and aged stranger.
VOL. II. 22
It cannot be! cried CecilLincoln,
credit
them not, they contradict themselves.
Out of thy own mouth will I find reasons to
convince you, said Abigail. Hast thou not
owned the influence of the son at the altar? Why
should one, vain, ignorant and young as I was, be
insensible to the seductions of the father!
The child is then, thine! exclaimed
Lionel
,
once more breathing with freedom
proceed
with thy tale; you confide it to friends!
Yesyes, cried Abigail, clasping her hands,
and speaking with bitter emphasis; you have
all the consolation of proving the difference
between
the guilt of woman and that of man?
Major
Lincoln, accursed and polluted as you see me,
thy own mother was not more innocent nor fair,
when my youthful beauty caught thy father's
eye. He was great and powerful, and I unknown
and frailyon miserable proof of our
transgression
did not appear, until he had met your
happier
mother!
Can this be so?
The holy gospels are not more true!
murmured
Ralph.
And my father! did hecould he desert
thee in thy need?
Shame came when virtue and pride had been
long forgotten. I was a dependant of his own
proud race, and opportunities were not wanting
to mark his wandering looks and growing love
for the chaste Priscilla. He never knew my state.
While I was stricken to the earth by the fruits
of guilt he proved how easy it is for us to forget,
in the days of prosperity, the companions of our
shame. At length, you were born; and unknown
to him, I received his new-born heir from the
hands of his jealous aunt. What accursed thoughts
beset me at that bitter moment! But, praised
be God in heaven, they passed away, and I was
spared the sin of murder!
Murder!
Even of murder. You know not the desperate
thoughts the wretched harbour for relief! But
opportunity was not long wanting, and I enjoyed
the momentary, hellish pleasure of revenge. Your
father went in quest of his rights, and disease
attacked
his beloved wife. Yes, foul and unseemly
as is my wretched child, the beauty of thy mother
was changed to a look still more hideous! Such
as Job now seems, was the injured woman on
her death-bed. I feel all thy justice, Lord of
power, and bow before thy will!
Injured woman! repeated Lionel, say
on, and I will bless thee!
Abigail gave a groan, so deep and hollow, that,
for a moment, the listeners believed it was the
parting struggle of the spirit of her son, and she
sunk, helplessly, into her seat, again concealing
her features in her dress.
Injured woman! slowly repeated Ralph,
with the most taunting contempt in his accents
what punishment does not a wanton merit?
Ay, injured! cried the awakened son
my life on it, thy tale, at least, is false.
The old man was silent, but his lips moved
rapidly
,
as if he muttered an incredulous reply to
himself, while a scornful smile cast its bright
and peculiar meaning across the wasted
lineaments
of his face.
I know not what you may have heard from
others, continued Abigail, speaking so low that
her words were nearly lost in the difficult and
measured breathing of Jobbut I call heaven
to witness that you, now, shall hear no lie. The
laws of the province commanded that the victims
of the foul distemper should be kept apart, and
your mother was placed at the mercy of myself,
and one other, who loved her still less than I.
Just providence! you did no violence?
The disease spared us such a crime. She
died in her new deformity, while I remained a
looker-on, if not in the beauty of my innocence,
still free from the withering touch of scorn and
want. Yes, I found a sinful, but flattering
consolation
in that thought! Vain, weak, and
foolish
as I had been, never did I regard my own
fresh beauty, with half the inward pleasure that
I looked upon the foulness of my rival. Your
aunt, tooshe was not without the instigations
of the worker of mischief.
Speak only of my mother, interrupted the
impatient Lionelof my aunt, I already know
the whole.
Unmoved and calculating as she was, how
little
did she understand good from evil! She even
thought to crack the heart-strings, and render
whole, by her weak inventions, that which the
power of God could only create. The gentle
spirit of thy mother had hardly departed, before
a vile plot was hatched to destroy the purity
of her fame. Blinded fools that we were! She
thought to lead by her soothing arts, aided by his
wounded affections, the husband to the feet of
her own daughter, the innocent mother of her
who stands beside thee; and I was so vain as to
hope, that, in time, justice and my boy, might
plead with the father and seducer, and raise me to
the envied station of her whom I hated.
And this foul calumny you repeated, with all
its basest colouring, to my abused father?
We didwe did; yes, God, he knows we
did! and when he hesitated to believe, I took
the holy evangelists as witnesses of my truth!
And he, said Lionel, nearly choked by his
emotionshe believed it!
When he heard the solemn oath of one, whose
whole guilt he thought lay in her weakness to
himself
,
he did. As we listened to his terrible
denunciations
,
and saw the frown which darkened his
manly
beauty, we both thought we had succeeded. But
how little did we know the difference between
rooted
passion and passing inclination! The heart
we thought to alienate from its dead partner, we
destroyed; and the reason we conspired to
deceive
,
was maddened!
When her voice ceased, so profound a silence
reigned in the place, that the roar of the distant
cannonade sounded close at hand, and even the
low murmurs of the excited town swept by, like
the whisperings of the wind. Job suddenly ceased
to breathe, as though his spirit had only lingered
to hear the confession of his mother, and
Polwarth
dropped the arm of the dead simpleton,
unconscious of the interest he had so lately taken
in his fate. In the midst of this death like
stillness
,
the old man stole from the side of the body,
and stood before the self-condemned Abigail,
whose form was writhing under her mental anguish.
Crouching more like a tiger than a man, he sprang
upon her, with a cry so sudden, so wild, and so
horrid, that it caused all within its hearing to
shudder with instant dread.
Beldame! he shouted, I have thee now!
Bring hither the book! the blessed, holy word of
God! Let her swear, let her swear! Let her damn
her perjured soul, in impious oaths!
Monster! release the woman! cried Lionel,
advancing to the assistance of the struggling
penitent
;
thou, too, hoary-headed wretch, hast
deceived
me!
22*
Lincoln! Lincoln! shrieked Cecil, stay
that unnatural hand! you raise it on thy father!
Lionel staggered back to the wall, where he
stood motionless, and gasping for breath. Left,
to work his own frantic will, the maniac would
speedily have terminated the sorrows of the
wretched woman, had not the door been burst
open with a crash, and the stranger who was left
by the cunning of the madman, in the custody of
the Americans, rushed to the rescue.
I know your yell, my gentle baronet! cried
the aroused keeper, for such in truth he was, and
I have a mark for your malice, which would have
gladly had me hung! But I have not followed you
from kingdom to kingdom, from Europe to
America
,
to be cheated by a lunatic!
It was apparent, by the lowering look of the
fellow, how deeply he resented the danger he
had just escaped, as he sprang forward to seize
his prisoner. Ralph abandoned his hold the
instant
this hated object appeared, and he darted
upon the breast of the other with the undaunted
fury that a lion, at bay, would turn upon its foe.
The struggle was fierce and obstinate. Hoarse
oaths, and the most savage execrations burst from
the incensed keeper, and were blended with the
wildest ravings of madness from Ralph. The
excited
powers of the maniac at length prevailed, and
his antagonist fell under their irresistible
impulse
.
Quicker than thought, Ralph was seen
hovering on the chest of his victim, while he
grasped his throat with fingers of iron.
Vengeance is holy! cried the maniac,
bursting
into a shout of horrid laughter, at his triumph,
and shaking his gray locks till they flowed in wild
confusion around his glowing eye-balls;Urim
and Thummim are the words of glory!
Liberty
is the shout! die, damned dog! die like the
fiends in darkness, and leave freedom to the air!
By a mighty effort the gasping man released
his throat a little from the gripe that nearly
throttled him, and cried, with difficulty
For the love of heavenly justice, come to my
aid! will you see a man thus murdered?
But he addressed himself to the sympathies
of the listeners in vain. The females had hid
their faces, in natural horror; the maimed
Polwarth
was yet without his artificial limb; and
Lionel still looked upon the savage fray with a
vacant eye. At this moment of despair, the hand
of the keeper was seen plunging, with violence,
into the side of Ralph, who sprang upon his feet at
the third blow, laughing immoderately, but with
sounds so wild and deep, that they seemed to shake
his inmost soul. His antagonist profited by the
occasion, and darted from the room with the
headlong precipitation of guilt.
The countenance of the maniac, as he now
stood, struggling between life and death, changed
with each fleeting impulse. The blood flowed
freely from the wounds in his side, and as the
fatal
tide ebbed away, a ray of passing reason
lighted his pallid and ghastly features. His
inward
laugh entirely ceased. The glaring
eye-balls
became stationary, and his look, gradually
softening, settled on the appalled pair, who took
the deepest interest in his welfare. A calm and
decent expression possessed those lineaments
which had just exhibited the deepest marks of the
wrath of God. His lips moved in a vain effort
to speak; and stretching forth his arms, in the
attitude of benediction, like the mysterious
shadow
of the chapel, he fell backward on the body of
the lifeless and long-neglected Job, himself
perfectly
dead.
CHAPTER XVIII.
I saw an aged man upon his bier,
His hair was thin and white, and on his brow
A record of the cares of many a year;
Cares that were ended and forgotten now.
And there was sadness round, and faces bow'd,
And woman's tears fell fast, and children wail'd aloud.
Bryant
As the day advanced, the garrison of Boston
was put in motion. The same bustle, the same
activity, the same gallant bearing in some, and
dread reluctance in others, were exhibited, as on
the morning of the fight of the preceding
summer
.
The haughty temper of the royal
commander
could ill brook the bold enterprise of the
colonists; and, at an early hour, orders were
issued
to prepare to dislodge them. Every gun that
could be brought to bear upon the hills was
employed
to molest the Americans, who calmly
continued
their labours, while shot were whistling
around them on every side. Towards evening a
large force was embarked, and conveyed to the
castle. Washington appeared on the heights, in
person, and every military evidence of the
intention
of a resolute attack on one part, and of a
stout resistance on the other, became apparent.
But the fatal experience of Breed's had taught
a lesson that was still remembered. The same
leaders were to be the principal actors in the
coming scene, and it was necessary to use the
remnants of many of the very regiments which
had bled so freely on the former occasion. The
half-trained husbandmen of the colonies were no
longer despised; and the bold operations of the
past winter, had taught the English generals that,
as subordination increased among their foes, their
movements were conducted with a more vigorous
direction of their numbers. The day was
accordingly
wasted in preparations. Thousands of men
slept on their arms that night, in either army,
in the expectation of rising, on the following
morning, to be led to the field of slaughter.
It is not improbable, from the tardiness of their
movements, that a large majority of the royal
forces did not regret the providential interposition,
which certainly saved them torrents of blood, and
not improbably, the ignominy of a defeat. One
of the sudden tempests of the climate arose in the
darkness, driving before it men and beasts, to
seek protection, in their imbecility, from the more
powerful warring of the elements. The golden
moments were lost; and, after enduring so
many
privations, and expending so many lives, in
vain, Howe sullenly commenced his
arrangements
to abandon a town, on which the English
ministry had, for years, lavished their indignation,
with all the acrimony, and, as it now seemed,
with the impotency of a blind revenge.
To carry into effect this sudden and necessary
determination, was not the work of an hour. As
it was the desire of the Americans, however, to
receive their town back again as little injured as
possible, they forbore to push the advantage they
possessed, by occupying those heights, which, in a
great measure, commanded the anchorage, as well
as a new and vulnerable face of the defences of
the king's army. While the semblance of
hostilities
was maintained by an irregular and
impotent
cannonade, conducted with so little spirit as
to wear the appearance of being intended only to
amuse, one side was diligently occupied in
preparing
to depart, and the other was passively
awaiting
the moment when they might peaceably
repossess
their own. It is unnecessary to remind
the reader, that the entire command of the sea, by
the British, would have rendered any serious
attempt
to arrest their movements, perfectly futile.
In this manner a week was passed, after the
tempest
had abatedthe place exhibiting
throughout
this period, all the hurry and bustle, the joy
and distress that such an unlooked-for event was
likely to create.
Toward the close of one of those busy and
stirring days, a short funeral train was seen
issuing from a building which had long been
known as the residence of one of the
proudest
families in the province. Above the
outer-door
of the mansion was suspended a gloomy
hatchment, charged with the `courant' deer of
Lincoln, encircled by the usnal mementos of
mortality, and bearing the rare symbol of the
bloody-hand.This emblem of heraldic grief,
which was never adopted in the provinces, except
at the death of one of high importance, a custom
that has long since disappeared with the usages
of the monarchy, had caught the eyes of a few idle
boys, who alone were sufficiently unoccupied, at
that pressing moment, to note its exhibition. With
the addition of these truant urchins, the
melancholy
procession took its way toward the
neighbouring
church-yard of the king's chapel.
The large bier was covered by a pall so ample
that it swept the stones of the threshold, while
entering into the body of the church. Here it
was met by the divine we have had occasion to
mention more than once, who gazed, with a look
of strange interest, at the solitary and youthful
mourner, that closely followed in his dark weeds.
The ceremony, however, proceeded with the
usual solemuity, and the attendants slowly
moved
deeper into the sacred edifice. Next to the
young man, came the well-known persons of the
British commander-in-chief, and of his
quickwitted
and favourite lieutenant. Between them,
walked an officer of inferior rank, who,
notwithstanding
his maimed condition, had been able, by
the deliberation of the march, to beguile the ears
of his companions, to the very moment of
meeting
the clergyman, with some tale of no little
interest, and great apparent mystery. The
remainder
of the train, which consisted only of the
family of the two generals, and a few menials,
came last, if we except the idlers, who stole
euriously
in their footsteps.
When the service was ended, the same private
communication was resumed between the two
chieftains, and their companion, and continued
until they arrived at the open vault, in a distant
corner of the enclosure. Here the low
conversation
ended, and the eye of Howe, which had
hitherto been riveted in deep attention on the
speaker, began to wander in the direction of the
dangerous hills occupied by his enemies. The
interruption seemed to have broken the charm of
the secret conversation, and the anxious
countenances
of both the leaders betrayed how soon
their thoughts had wandered from a tale of great
private distress, to their own heavier cares and
duties.
The bier was placed before the opening, and
the assistants of the sexton advanced to perform
their office. When the pall was removed, to the
evident amazement of most of the spectators, two
coffins were exposed to view. One was clothed
in black-velvet, studded with silver nails, and
ornamented after the richest fashions of human
pride, while the other lay in the simple nakedness
of the clouded wood. On the breast of the first,
rose a heavy silver plate, bearing a long
inscription
,
and decorated with the usual devices of
heraldry
;
and on the latter, were simply carved on
the lid, the two initial letters J. P.
The impatient looks of the English generals
intimated to Dr. Liturgy the value of every
moment, and in less time than we consume in
relating it, the bodies of the high-descended man
of wealth, and of his nameless companion, were
lowered into the vault, and left to decay, in
silent
contact, with that of the woman who, in
life, had been so severe a scourge to both.
After a besitation of a single moment, in
deference
to the young mourner, the gentlemen
present
,
perceiving that he manifested a wish to
remain
,
quitted the place in a body, with the
exception
of the maimed officer, already mentioned,
whom the reader has at once recognised to be
Polwarth. When the men had replaced the stone
above the mouth of the vault, securing it by a
stout bar of iron and a beavy lock, they
delivered
the key to the principal actor in the scene.
He received it in silence, and dropping gold into
their hands, motioned to them to depart.
In another instant a careless observer would
have thought that Lionel and his friend were
the only living possessors of the church-yard.
But under the adjoining wall, partly hid from
observation by the numerous head-stones, was the
form of a woman, bowed to the earth, while her
figure was concealed by the cloak she had
gathered
sbapelessly about her. As soon as the
gentlemen
perceived they were alone, they slowly
advanced
to the side of this desolate being.
Their approaching footsteps were not
unheeded
,
though, instead of facing those who so
evidently
wished to address her, she turned to the wall,
and began to trace, with unconscious fingers, the
letters of a tablet in slate, which was let into the
brick-work, to mark the position of the tomb of
the Lechmeres.
We can do no more, said the young
mourner
all
now rests with a mightier hand than any
of earth.
The squalid limb that was thrust from beneath
the red garment, trembled, but it still continued
its unmeaning employment.
Sir Lionel Lincoln speaks to you, said
Polwarth
,
on whose arm the youthful baronet leaned.
Who! shrieked Abigail Pray, casting aside
her covering, and baring those sunken features,
on which misery had made terrible additional
inroads, within a few daysI had forgottenI
had forgotten! the son succeeds the father; but the
mother must follow her child to the grave!
He is honourably interred with those of his
blood, and by the side of one who loved his
simple
integrity!
Yes, he is better lodged in death, than he
was in life! Thank God! he can never know
cold nor hunger more!
You will find that I have made a provision
for your future comfort; and I trust, that the
close of your life will be happier than its prime.
I am alone, said the woman, hoarsely.
The old will avoid me, and the young will look
upon me in scorn! Perjury and revenge lie
heavy on my soul!
VOL. II. 23
The young baronet was silent, but Polwarth
assumed the right to reply
I will not pretend to assert, said the worthy
captain, that these are not both wicked
companions
;
but I have no doubt you will find
somewhere
in the Bible, a suitable consolation for each
particular offence. Let me recommend to you a
hearty diet, and I'll answer for an easy conscience.
I never knew the prescription fail. Look about
you in the worlddoes your well-fed villain
feel remorse! No; t's only when his stomach is
empty that he begins to think of his errors! I
would also suggest the expediency of
commencing
soon, with something substantial, as you show,
altogether, too much bone, at present, for a
thriving
condition. I would not wish to say any
thing distressing, but we both of us may
remember
a case, where the nourishment came too
late.
Yes, yes, it came too late! murmured the
conscience-stricken womanall comes too late!
even the penitence, I fear!
Say not so, observed Lionel; you do
outrage
to the promises of one who never spoke
false.
Abigail stole a fearful glance at him, which
expressed
all the secret terror of her soul, as she
half whispered
Who witnessed the end of Madam Lechmere!
did her spirit pass in peace?
Sir Lionel, again, remained profoundly silent.
I thought it, she continued'tis not a sin
to be forgotten on a death-bed! To plot evil, and
call on God, aloud, to look upon it! Ay! and to
madden a brain, and strip a soul like his to
nakedness
!
Go, she added, beckoning them away with
earnestnessye are young and happy; why
should ye linger near the grave! Leave me,
that I may pray among the tombs! If any thing
oan smooth the bitter moment, it is prayer.
Lionel dropped the key he held in his hand
at her feet, and said, before he left her
Yon vault is closed for ever, unless, at your
request, it should be opened at some future time,
to place you by the side of your son. The
children
of those who built it, are already gathered
there, with the exception of two, who go to the
other hemisphere to leave their bones. Take it,
and may heaven forgive you, as I do.
He let fall a heavy purse by the side of the
key, and, without uttering more, he again took
the arm of Polwarth, and together they left
the place. As they turned through the gate-way,
into the street, each stole a glance at the distant
woman. She had risen to her knees; her hands
had grasped a head-stone, and her face was
bowed
nearly to the earth, while by the writhing of
her form, and the humility of her attitude, it was
apparent that her spirit struggled powerfully with
the Lord for mercy.
Three days afterwards, the Americans entered,
triumphantly, on the retiring footsteps of the
royal army. The first among them, who
hastened
to visit the graves of their fathers, found
the body of a woman, who had, seemingly, died
under the severity of the season. She had
unlocked
the vault, in a vain effort to reach her child,
and there her strength had failed her. Her
limbs were decently stretched on the faded grass,
while her features were composed, exhibiting in
death the bland traces of that remarkable beauty
which had distinguished and betrayed her youth.
The gold still lay neglected, where it had fallen.
The amazed townsmen avoided this spectacle
with horror, rushing into other places to gaze at
the changes and the destruction of their beloved
birth-place. But a follower of the royal army, who
had lingered to plunder, and who had witnessed
the interview between the officers and Abigail,
shortly succeeded them. He lifted the flag, and
lowering the body, closed the vault; then hurling
away the key, he seized the money, and departed.
The slate has long since mouldered from the
wall; the sod has covered the stone, and few are
left who can designate the spot where the proud
families of Lechmere and Lincoln were wont to
inter their dead.
Sir Lionel and Polwarth proceeded, in the
deepest silence, to the long-wharf, where a boat
received them. They were rowed to the
much-admired
frigate, that was standing off-and-on,
under
easy sail, waiting their arrival. On her decks
they met Agnes Danforth, with her eyes
softened
by tears, though a rich flush mantled on
her cheeks, at witnessing the compelled
departure
of those invaders she had never loved.
I have only remained to give you a
parting-kiss
,
cousin Lionel, said the frank girl,
affectionately
saluting him, and now shall take my
leave, without repeating those wishes that you
know are so often conveyed in my prayers.
You will then leave us? said the young
baronet, smiling for the first time in
many-a-day
.
You know that this cruelty
He was interrupted by a loud hem from
Polwarth
,
who advanced, and taking the hand of the
lady, repeated his wish to retain it for ever, for at
least the fiftieth time. She heard him, in silence,
and with much apparent respect, though an arch
smile stole upon her gravity, before he had ended.
She then thanked him with suitable grace, and gave
a final and decided refusal. The captain sustained
the repulse like one who had seen much similar
service, and politely lent his assistance to help the
obdurate girl into her boat. Here she was
received
by a young man who was apparelled like
an American officer. Sir Lionel thought the
bloom on her cheek deepened, as her companion,
assiduously, drew a cloak around her form to
protect her from the chill of the water. Instead of
returning to the town, the boat, which hore a flag,
pulled directly for the shore occupied by the
Americans. The following week Agnes was
united to this gentleman, in the bosom of her own
family. They soon after took quiet possession
of the house in Tremont-street, and of all the
large real estate left by Mrs. Lechmere, which
had been previously bestowed on her, by Cecil,
as a dowry.
As soon as his passengers appeared, the captain
of the frigate communicated with his admiral, by
signal, and received, in return, the expected
order
to proceed in the execution of his trust. In
a few minutes the swift vessel was gliding by the
heights of Dorchester, training her guns on the
adverse hills, and hurriedly spreading her
canvass
as she passed. The Americans, however,
looked on in sullen silence, and she was suffered
to gain the open ocean, unmolested, when she
made the best of her way to England, with the
important intelligence of the intended evacuation.
She was speedily followed by the fleet, since
which period the long-oppressed and devoted
town of Boston has never been visited by an
armed
enemy.
During their passage to England, sufficient
time was allowed Lionel, and his gentle
companion
,
to reflect on all that had occurred.
Together
,
and in the fullest confidence, they traced
the wanderings of intellect which had so closely
and mysteriously connected the deranged father
with his impotent child; and as they reasoned,
by descending to the secret springs of his
disordered
impulses, they were easily enabled to
divest
the incidents we have endeavoured to
relate
,
of all their obscurity and doubt.
The keeper who had been sent in quest of
the fugitive madman, never returned to his
native
land. No offers of forgiveness could
induce
the unwilling agent in the death of the
Baronet
,
to trust his person, again, within the
influence
of the British laws. Perhaps he was conscious
of a motive that none but an inward monitor
might detect. Lionel, tired at length with
importuning
without success, commissioned the
husband of Agnes to place him in a situation,
where, by industry, his future comfort was
amply
secured.
Polwarth died quite lately. Notwithstanding
his maimed limb, he contrived, by the assistance
of his friend, to ascend the ladder of
promotion
,
by regular gradations, nearly to its summit.
At the close of his long life, he wrote Gen.,
Bart. and M. P. after his name. When England
was threatened with the French invasion, the
garrison
he commanded was distinguished for being
better provisioned than any other in the realm,
and no doubt it would have made a resistance
equal to its resources. In Parliament, where he
sat for one of the Lincoln boroughs, he was
chiefly
distinguished for the patience with which he
listened to the debates, and for the
remarkable
cordiality of the `ay' that he pronounced
on every vote for supplies. To the day of his
death, he was a strenuous advocate for the
virtues
of a rich diet, in all cases of physical
suffering
,
especially, as he would add, with an
obstinacy
that fed itself, in instances of debility
from febrile symptoms.
Within a year of their arrival, the uncle of Cecil
died, having shortly before followed an only son
to the grave. By this unlooked-for event, Lady
Lincoln became the possessor of his large estates,
as well as of an ancient Barony, that
descended
to the heirs general. From this time, until
the eruption of the French revolution, Sir
Lionel
Lincoln, and Lady Cardonnell, as Cecil was
now styled, lived together in sweetest concord,
the gentle influence of her affection moulding
and bending the feverish temperament of her
husband, at will. The heir-loom of the family,
that distempered feeling so often mentioned, was
forgotten, in the even tenor of their happiness.
When the heaviest pressure on the British
constitution
was apprehended, and it became the
policy of the minister to enlist the wealth and
talent of his nation in its support, by propping the
existing administration, the rich Baronet
received
a peerage in his own person. Before the end
of the century he was further advanced to a
dormant
Earldom, that had, in former ages, been
one of the honours of an elder branch of his
family.
Of all the principal actors in the foregoing
tale, not one is now living. Even the roses of
Cecil
and Agnes have long since ceased to bloom,
and Death has gathered them, in peace and
innocence
,
with all that had gone before. The
historical
facts of our legend are beginning to be
obscured by time; and it is more than
probable
,
that the prosperous and affluent English
peer, who now enjoys the honours of the house
of Lincoln, never knew the secret history of his
family, while it sojourned in a remote province
of the British empire.
FINIS.